2
PROBUS.
The
record which follows, is by the hand of me,
Nichomachus
, once the happy servant of the great Queen
of Palmyra, than whom the world never saw a queen
more illustrious, nor a woman adorned with brighter
virtues
.
But my design is not to write her eulogy, nor
recite
the wonderful story of her life. That task requires
a stronger and a more impartial hand than mine. The
life of Zenobia by Nichomachus, would be the portrait
of a mother and a divinity, drawn by the pen of a child
and a worshipper.
My object is a humbler, but perhaps also a more
useful
one. It is to collect and arrange, in their proper
order
,
such of the letters of the most noble
Lucius
Manlius
Piso
, as shall throw most light upon his character
and times, supplying all defects of incident, and filling
up all chasms that may occur, out of the knowledge
which, more exactly than any one else, I have been able
to gather concerning all that relates to the distinguished
family of the Pisos, after its connection with the more
distinguished one still, of the Queen of Palmyra.
It is in this manner that I propose to amuse the few
remaining days of a green old age, not without hope
both to amuse and benefit others also. This is a labor,
as those will discover who read, not unsuitable to one
who stands trembling on the verge of life, and whom a
single rude blast may in a moment consign to the
embraces
of the universal mother. I will not deny that
my chief satisfaction springs from the fact, that in
collecting
these letters, and binding them together by a
connecting narrative, I am engaged in the honorable
task of tracing out some of the steps by which the new
religion has risen to its present height of power. For
whether true or false, neither friend nor foe, neither
philosopher
nor fool, can refuse to admit the regenerating
and genial influences of its so wide reception upon the
Roman character and manners. If not the gift of the
gods, it is every way worthy a divine origin; and I
cannot
but feel myself to be worthily occupied in recording
the deeds, the virtues, and the sufferings, of those who
put their faith in it, and, in times of danger and
oppression
,
stood forth to defend it. Age is slow of belief.
The thoughts then cling with a violent pertinacity to the
fictions of its youth, once held to be the most sacred
realities
.
But for this I should, I believe, myself long
ago have been a Christian. I daily pray to the
Supreme
Power that my stubborn nature may yet so far
yield, that I may be able, with a free and full assent, to
call myself a follower of Christ. A Greek by birth, a
Palmyrene by choice and adoption, a Roman by
necessity
and these are all honorable names  I would yet
rather be a Christian than either. Strange that, with
so strong desires after a greater good, I should remain
fixed where I have ever been! Stranger still, seeing I
have moved so long in the same sphere with the
excellent
Piso, the divine Julia  that emanation of God
and the god-like Probus! But there is no riddle so
hard for man to read as himself. I sometimes feel most
inclined toward the dark fatalism of the stoics, since it
places all things beyond the region of conjecture or
doubt.
Yet if I may not be a Christian myself  I do not,
however, cease both to hope and pray  I am happy in
this, that I am permitted by the Divine Providence to
behold, in these the last days of life, the quiet
supremacy
of a faith which has already added so much to the
common happiness, and promises so much more.
Having
stood in the midst, and looked upon the horrors of
two persecutions of the Christians  the first by
Aurelian
and the last by Diocletianand which last seemed at
one moment as if it would accomplish its work, and blot
out the very name of Christian  I have no language
in which to express the satisfaction with which I sit
down beneath the peaceful shadows of a Christian
throne, and behold the general security and exulting
freedom enjoyed by the many millions throughout the
vast empire of the great Constantine. Now,
everywhere
around, the Christians are seen, undeterred by
any apprehension of violence, with busy hands
rerecting
the demolished temples of their pure and spiritual
faith; yet not unmindful, in the meantime, of the labor
yet to be done, to draw away the remaining multitudes
of idolaters from the superstitions which, while they
infatuate
,
degrade and brutalize them. With the zeal of
the early apostles of this religion, they are applying
themselves, with untiring diligence, to soften and subdue
the stony heart of hoary Paganism, receiving but too
often, as their only return, curses and threats  now
happily vain  but often again retiring from the assault,
leading in glad triumph captive multitudes. Often, as
I sit at my window, overlooking, from the southern
slope of the Quirinal, the magnificent Temple of the
Sun, the proudest monument of Aurelian's reign, do I
pause to observe the labors of the artificers who, just as
it were beneath the shadow of its columns, are placing
the last stones upon the dome of a Christian church.
Into that church the worshippers shall enter unmolested;
mingling peacefully, as they go and return, with the
crowds that throng the more gorgeous temple of the
idolaters. Side by side, undisturbed and free, do the
Pagans and Christians, Greeks, Jews, and Egyptians,
now observe the rites, and offer the worship, of their
varying
faiths. This happiness we owe to the wise and
merciful laws of the great Constantine. So was it, long
since, in Palmyra, under the benevolent rule of Zenobia.
May the time never come, when Christians shall do
otherwise than now; when, remembering the wrongs
they have received, they shall retaliate torture and
death upon the blind adherents of the ancient
superstitions
!
These letters of Piso to Fausta the daughter of
Gracchus
,
now follow.
2*
LETTER I.
FROM PISO TO FAUSTA.
I am
not surprised, Fausta, that you complain of my
silence. It were strange indeed if you did not. But
as for most of our misdeeds we have excuses ready at
hand, so have I for this. First of all, I was not
ignorant
that, however I might fail you, from your other
greater friend you would experience no such neglect;
but on the contrary would be supplied, with sufficient
fullness and regularity, with all that could be worth
knowing, concerning either our public or private affairs.
For her sake, too, I was not unwilling, that at first the
burden of this correspondence, if I may so term it,
should rest where it has, since it has afforded, I am
persuaded
,
a pleasure, and provided an occupation that
could have been found nowhere else. Just as a flood of
tears brings relief to a bosom laboring under a heavy
sorrow, so has this pouring out of herself to you, in
frequent
letters, served to withdraw her mind from
recollections
which, dwelt upon as they were at first, would
soon have ended that life in which all ours seem
bound up.
Then again, if you accept the validity of this excuse,
I have another, which, as a woman, you will at once
allow the force of. You will not deem it a better one
than the other, but doubtless as good. It is this: that
for a long time I have been engaged in taking possession
of my new dwelling upon the Clian, not far from that
of Portia. Of this you may have heard, in the letters
which have reached you; but that will not prevent me
from describing to you, with more exactness than any
other can have done it, the home of your old and fast
friend, Lucius Manlius Piso; for I think it adds greatly
to the pleasure with which we think of an absent friend,
to be able to see, as in a picture, the form and material
and position of the house he inhabits, and even the very
aspect and furniture of the room in which he is
accustomed
to pass the most of his time. This to me is a
satisfaction greater than you can well conceive, when, in
my ruminating hours, which are many, I return to
Palmyra
,
and place myself in the circle with Gracchus,
Calpurnius
,
and yourself. Your palace having now been
restored to its former condition, I know where to find
you at the morning, noon, and evening hour; the only
change you have made in the former arrangements
being
this: that whereas when I was your guest, your
private
apartments occupied the eastern wing of the palace,
they are now in the western, once mine, and which I
used then to maintain were the most agreeable and
noble
of all. The prospects which its windows afford of
the temple, and the distant palace of the queen, and of
the evening glories of the setting sun, are more than
enough to establish its claims to an undoubted
superiority
;
and if to these be added the circumstance, that
for so long a time the Roman Piso was their occupant,
the case is made out beyond all peradventure.
But I am describing your palace rather than my own.
You must remember my paternal seat on the southern
declivity of the hill, and overlooking the course of the
Tiber, as it winds away to the sea. Mine is not far
from it, but on the northern side of the hill, and thereby
possessing a situation more favorable to comfort, during
the heats of summer  I loving the city, as you well
know, better if anything during the summer than the
winter months. Standing upon almost the highest point
of the hill, it commands a wide and beautiful prospect,
especially toward the north and east, the eye shooting
over the whole expanse of city and suburbs, and then
resting upon the purple outline of the distant mountains.
Directly before me are the magnificent structures which
crown the Esquiline, conspicuous among which, and
indeed
eminent over all, are the Baths of Titus. Then,
as you will conjecture, the eye takes in the Palatine and
Capitol hills, catching, just beyond the last, the swelling
dome of the Pantheon, which seems rather to rise out
of, and crown, the Flavian Amphitheatre, than its own
massy walls. Then, far in the horizon, we just discern
the distant summits of the Appenines, broken by
Soracte
and the nearer hills.
The principal apartments are on the northern side of
the palace, opening upon a portico of Corinthian
columns
,
running its entire length, and which would not
disgrace Palmyra itself. At the eastern extremity, are
the rooms common to the family; in the centre, a
spacious
hall, in the adorning of which, by every form of
art, I have exhausted my knowledge and taste in such
things; and at the western extremity, my library, where
at this moment I sit, and where I have gathered around
me all in letters and art that I most esteem. This room
I have decorated for myself and Julia  not for others.
Whatever has most endeared itself to our imaginations,
our minds, or our hearts, has here its home. The books
that have most instructed or amused; the statuary that
most raises and delights us; the pictures on which we
most love to dwell; the antiquities that possess most
curiosity
or value, are here arranged; and in an order
that would satisfy, I believe, even your fastidious taste.
I will not weary you with any more minute account
of my new dwelling, leaving that duty to the readier
pen of Julia. Yet I cannot relieve you till I have
spoken of two of the statues which occupy the most
conspicuous niche in the library. You will expect me
to name Socrates and Plato, or Numa and Seneca
these are all there, but it is not of either of them that I
would speak. They are the venerable founders of the
Jewish and Christian religions,
Moses
and
Christ
.
These statues, of the purest marble, stand side by side,
at one extremity of the apartment; and immediately
before them, and within the wondrous sphere of their
influences, stands the table at which I write, and where
I pursue my inquiries in philosophy and religion. You
smile at my enthusiasm, Fausta, and wonder when I
shall return to the calm sobriety of my ancient faith.
In this wonder there are a thousand errors  but of these
hereafter. I was to tell you of these sculptures. Of
the statue of Moses, I possess no historical account, and
know not what its claim may be to truth. I can only
say, it is a figure truly grand, and almost terrific. It is
of a size larger than life, and expresses no sentiment so
perfectly as authority  the authority of a rigorous and
austere ruler  both in the attitude of the body and the
features of the countenance. The head is slightly raised
and drawn back, as if listening, awe-struck, to a
communication
from the God who commissioned him, while
his left hand supports a volume, and his right grasps a
stylus, with which, when the voice has ceased, to record
the communicated truth. Place in his hands the
thunderbolt
,
and at his feet the eagle, and the same form
would serve for Jupiter the Thunderer, except only that
to the countenance of the Jewish prophet there has been
imparted a rapt and inspired look, wholly beyond any
that even Phidias could have fixed upon the face of Jove.
He who wrought this head must have believed in the
sublimities of the religion whose chief minister he has
made so to speak them forth, in the countenance and
in the form; and yet who has ever heard of a Jew
sculptor?
The statue of Christ is of a very different character;
as different as the Christian faith is from that of the
Jewish, notwithstanding they are still by many
confounded
.
I cannot pretend to describe to you the holy
beauty that as it were constitutes this perfect work of
art. If you ask what authority tradition has invested it
with, I can only say that I do not know. All I can
affirm
with certainty, is this, that it once stood in the
palace
of Alexander Severus, in company with the images
of other deified men and gods, whom he chiefly
reverenced
.
When that excellent prince had fallen under
the blows of assassins, his successor and murderer,
Maximin
,
having little knowledge or taste for what was
found in the palace of Alexander, those treasures were
sold, and the statue of Christ came into the hands of a
distinguished and wealthy Christian of that day, who,
perishing in the persecution of Decius, his descendants
became impoverished, and were compelled to part with
even this sacred relic of their former greatness. From
them I purchased it; and often are they to be seen,
whenever for such an object they can steal away from
necessary cares, standing before it and renewing, as it
would seem, their vows of obedience, in the presence of
the founder of their faith. The room is free to their
approach, whenever they are thus impelled.
The expression of this statue, I have said, is wholly
different from that of the Hebrew. His is one of
authority
and of sternness; this of gentleness and love.
Christ is represented, like the Moses, in a sitting
posture
,
with a countenance, not like his raised to Heaven,
but bent with looks somewhat sad and yet full of
benevolence
,
as if upon persons standing before him.
Fraternity
,
I think, is the idea you associate with it most
readily. I should never suppose him to be a judge nor
censor, nor arbitrary master, but rather an elder brother;
elder in the sense of wiser, holier, purer; whose look is
not one of reproach that others are not as himself, but
of pity and desire; and whose hand would rather be
stretched forth to lift up the fallen than to smite the
offender. To complete this expression, and inspire the
beholder with perfect confidence, the left hand rests
upon
a little child, who stands with familiar reverence at
his knee, and looking up into his face seems to say, `No
evil can come to me here.'
Opposite this, and at the other extremity of the
apartment
,
hangs a picture of Christ, representing him in very
exact accordance with the traditional accounts of his
features
and form, a description of which exists, and is held
by most authentic, in a letter of Publius Lentulus, a
Roman
of the same period. Between this and the statue
there is a close resemblance, or as close as we usually
see between two heads of Csar, or of Cicero. Marble,
however, is the only material that suits the character
and office of Jesus of Nazareth. Color, and its minute
effects, seem in some sort to degrade the subject. I
retain
the picture because of its supposed truth.
Portia, as you will believe, is full of wonder and
sorrow
at these things. Soon after my library had received
its last additions, my mother came to see what she had
already heard of so much. As she entered the
apartment
,
I was sitting in my accustomed seat, with Julia
at my side, and both of us gazing in admiration at the
figures I have just described. We were both too much
engrossed to notice the entrance of Portia, our first
warning
of her presence being her hand laid upon my head.
We rose and placed her between us.
`My son,' said she, looking intently as she spoke
upon
the statues before us, `what strange looking figures
are these? That upon my left might serve for Jupiter,
but for the roll and the stylus. And why place you
beings
of character so opposite, as these appear to have
been, side by side? This other upon my right  ah,
how beautiful it is! What mildness in those eyes, and
what a divine repose over the form, which no event, not
the downfall of a kingdom nor its loss, would seem
capable
to disturb. Is it the peace-loving Numa?'
`Not so,' said Julia; `there stands Numa, leaning on
the sacred shield, from the centre of which beams the
countenance of the divine Egeria.'
`Yes, I see it,' replied Portia; and rising from her
seat, she stood gazing round the apartment, examining
its various appointments. When her eye had sought
out the several objects, and dwelt upon them a moment,
she said, in tones somewhat reproachful, as much so as
it is in her nature to assume.
`Where, Lucius, are the gods of Rome? Do those
who have, through so many ages, watched over our
country, and guarded our house, deserve no honor at
your hands? Does not gratitude require at least that
their images should be here, so that, whether you
yourself
worship them or not, their presence may inspire
others with reverence? But alas for the times! Piety
seems dead; or, with the faith that inspires it, it lives
but in a few, who will soon disappear, and religion with
them. Whose forms are these, Lucius? concerning
one I can now easily surmise  but the other, this stern
and terrific man, who is he?'
`That,' I replied, `is Moses, the founder of Judaism.'
`Immortal gods!' exclaimed Portia, `the statue of a
Jew in the halls of the Pisos! Well may it be that
Rome approaches her decline, when her elder sons turn
against her.'
`Nay, mother, I am not a Jew.'
`I would thou wert, rather than be what I suppose
thou art, a Christian. The Jew, Lucius, can boast of
antiquity, at least, in behalf of his religion. But the
faith which you would profess and extend, is but of
yesterday
.
Would the gods ever leave mankind without
religion? Is it only to-day that they reveal the truth?
Have they left us for these many ages to grope along in
error? Never, Lucius, can I believe it. It is enough
for me that the religion of Rome is old as Rome, to
endear it to my heart, and commend it to my
understanding
.
3
It is not for the first time, to-day, that the gods
have spoken.'
`But, my dear mother,' I rejoined, `if age makes
truth, there are older religions than this of Rome.
Judaism
itself is older, by many centuries. But it is not
because a religion is new or old, that I would receive or
reject it. The only question is, does it satisfy my heart
and mind, and is it true? The faith which you,
mother
,
engrafted upon my infant mind, fails to meet the
wants of my nature, and upon looking for its
foundations
,
I find them not.'
`Is thy nature different from mine, Lucius? Surely,
thou art my own child! It has satisfied me and my
nature. I ask for nothing else, or better.'
`There are some natures, mother, by the gods so
furnished
and filled with all good desires and affections,
that their religion is born with them and is in them.
It matters little under what outward form and
administration
of truth they dwell; no system could injure
them  none would greatly benefit. They are of the
family of God, by birth, and are never disinherited.'
`Yes, Portia,' said Julia, `natural and divine instincts
make you what others can become only through the
powerful operation of some principle out of, and superior
to, anything they find within themselves. For me, I
know not what I should have been, without the help which
Christianity has afforded. I might have been virtuous,
but I could not have been happy. You surely rejoice
when the weak find that in any religion or philosophy
which gives them strength. Look, Portia, at that serene
and benignant countenance, and can you believe that
any truth ever came from its lips, but such as must be
most comforting and exalting to those who receive it?'
`It would seem so indeed, my child,' replied Portia,
musingly, `and I would not deprive any of the comforts
or strength which any principle may impart. But I
cannot cease to think it dangerous to the state, when the
faith of the founders of Rome is abandoned by those
who fill its highest places. You who abound in
leisure
and learning, may satisfy yourselves with a new
philosophy; but what shall these nice refinements profit
the common herd? How shall they see them to be true,
or comprehend them? The Romans have ever been a
religious people; and although under the empire the
purity of ancient manners is lost, let it not be said that
the Pisos were among those who struck the last and
hardest blows at the still stout root of the tree that bore
them.'
`Nothing can be more plain or intelligible,' I replied,
`than the principles of the Christian religion; and
wherever
it has been preached with simplicity and power,
even the common people have readily and gratefully
adopted it. I certainly cannot but desire that it may
prevail. If anything is to do it, I believe this is the
power that is to restore, and in a still nobler form,
the ancient manners of which you speak. It is from
Christianity that in my heart I believe the youthful
blood is to come, that being poured into the veins of this
dying state, shall reproduce the very vigor and freshness
of its early age. Rome, mother, is now but a lifeless
trunk  a dead and loathsome corpse: a new and
warmer current must be infused, or it will soon crumble
into dust.'
`I grieve, Lucius, to see you lost to the good cause of
your country, and to the altars of her gods; for who can
love his country, and deny the gods who made and
preserve
it? But then who am I to condemn? When I
see the gods to hurl thunderbolts upon those who flout
them, it will be time enough for us mortals to assume
the robes of judgment. I will hope that farther thought
will reclaim you from your truant wanderings.'
Do not imagine, Fausta, that conversations like this
have the least effect to chill the warm affections of Portia
towards us both. Nature has placed within her bosom
a central heat, that not only preserves her own warmth,
but diffuses itself upon all who approach her, and
changes
their affections into a likeness of her own. We
speak of our differing faiths, but love none the less.
When she had paused a moment, after uttering the last
words, she again turned her eye upon the statue of Christ,
and, captivated by its wondrous power, she dwelt upon
it in a manner that showed her sensibilities to be greatly
moved. At length she suddenly started, saying:
`If truth and beauty were the same thing, one need but
to look upon this, and be a believer. But as in the
human
form and face, beauty is often but a lie, covering
over a worse deformity than any that ever disfigures the
body, so it may be here. I cannot but admire and love
the beauty; it will be wise, I suppose, not to look
farther
,
lest the dream be dissolved.'
`Be not afraid of that, dearest mother; I can warrant
you against disappointment. If in that marble you
have the form of the outward beauty, here, in this roll,
you will find the inward moral beauty of which it was
the shrine.'
`Nay, nay, Lucius, I look no farther or deeper. I
have seen too much already.'
With these words, she rose, and we accompanied her
to the portico, where we walked, and sat, and talked of
you, and Calpurnius, and Gracchus.
Thus you perceive I have told you first of what chiefly
interests myself: now let me turn to what at this
moment
more than everything else fills all heads in Rome
and that is Livia. She is the object of universal
attention
,
the centre of all honor. It is indescribable, the
sensation her beauty, and now added to that, her
magnificence
,
have made and still make in Rome. Her
imperial bearing would satisfy even you; and the
splendor
of her state exceeds all that has been known before.
This you may be surprised to hear, knowing what the
principles of Aurelian have been in such things; how
strict he has been himself in a more than republican
simplicity, and how severe upon the extravagances and
luxuries of others, in the laws he has enacted. You
must remember his prohibition of the use of cloth of gold
and of silk, among other things  foolish laws to be
suddenly
promulged among so vain and corrupt a
population
as this of Rome. They have been the ridicule and
scorn of rich and poor alike; of the rich, because they
are so easily violated in private, or evaded by the
substitution
of one article for another; of the poor, because,
being slaves in spirit, they take a slave's pride in the
trappings and state of their masters; they love not only
to feel but to see their superiority. But since the
eastern
expedition, the reduction of Palmyra, and the
introduction
from abroad of the vast flood of foreign luxuries
3*
which have inundated Rome and Italy itself, the
principles
and the habits of the emperor have undergone a
mighty revolution. Now, the richness and costliness of
his dress, the splendor of his equipage, the gorgeousness
of his furniture, cannot be made to come up to the height
of his extravagant desires. The silk which he once
denied to the former empress for a dress, now, variously
embroidered, and of every dye, either hangs in ample
folds upon the walls, or canopies the royal bed, or lends
its beauty to the cushioned seats which everywhere, in
every form of luxurious ease, invite to repose. Gold,
too, once prohibited, but now wrought into every kind
of cloth, or solid in shape of dish, or vase, or cup, or
spread in sheets over the very walls and ceilings of the
palace, has rendered the traditions of Nero's house of
gold no longer fabulous. The customs of the eastern
monarchs have also elevated or perverted the ambition
of Aurelian, and one after another are taking place of
former usages. He is every day more difficult of access,
and surrounds himself, his palaces, and apartments, by
guards and officers of state. In all this, as you will
readily believe, Livia is his willing companion, or rather,
I should perhaps say, his prompting and ruling genius.
As without the world at her feet, it would be impossible
for her insane pride to be fully satisfied, so in all that is
now done, the emperor still lags behind her will. But
beautifully, it can be denied by none, does she become
her greatness, and gives more lustre than she receives,
to all around her. Gold is doubly gold in her presence;
and even the diamond sparkles with a new brilliancy on
her brow or sandal.
Livia is, of all women I have ever seen or known,
made for a Roman empress. I used to think so when
in Palmyra, and I saw her, so often as I did, assuming
the port and air of imaginary sovereignty. And now
that I behold her filling the very place for which by
nature she is most perfectly fitted, I cannot but confess
that she surpasses all I had imagined, in the genius she
displays for her great sphere, both as wife of Aurelian,
and sovereign of Rome. Her intellect shows itself
stronger than I had believed it to be, and secures for her
the homage of a class who could not be subdued by the
magnificence of her state, extraordinary as it is. They
are captivated by the brilliancy of her wit, set off by her
unequalled beauty, and, for a woman, her rare
attainments
,
and hover around her as some superior being.
Then for the mass of our rich and noble, her
ostentatious
state and imperial bearing are all that they can
appreciate, all they ask for, and more than enough to
enslave them, not only to her reasonable will, but to all
her most tyrannical and whimsical caprices. She
understands
already perfectly the people she is among;
and through her quick sagacity, has already risen to a
power greater than woman ever before held in Rome.
We see her often  often as ever  and when we
see her, enjoy her as well. For with all her ambition
of petty rule and imposing state, she possesses and retains
a goodness of heart, that endears her to all, in spite of
her follies. Julia is still her beloved Julia, and I her
good friend Lucius; but it is to Zenobia that she
attaches
herself most closely; and from her she draws most
largely of the kind of inspiration which she covets.
And it is to her, I believe, that we may trace much of
the admirable wisdom  for such it must be allowed to
be  with which Livia adorns the throne of the world.
Her residence, when Aurelian is absent from the city,
is near us in the palace upon the Palatine; but when
he is here, it is more remote, in the enchanted gardens
of Sallust. This spot, first ennobled by the presence of
the great historian, to whose hand and eye of taste the
chief beauties of the scene are to be traced, then afterward
selected by Vespasian as an imperial villa, is now lately
become the chosen retreat of Aurelian. It has indeed
lost a part of its charms since it has been embraced by the
extension of the new walls within the limits of the city;
but enough remain to justify abundantly the preference
of a line of emperors. It is there that we see Livia
most as we have been used to do, and where are forcibly
brought to our minds the hours passed by us so
instructively
in the gardens of Zenobia. Often Aurelian is of
our company, and throws the light of his strong intellect
upon whatever subject it is we discuss. He cannot,
however, on such occasions, thoroughly tame to the tone
of gentle society, his imperious and almost rude nature.
The peasant of Pannonia will sometimes break through,
and usurp the place of emperor; but it is only for a
moment; for it is amusing to note how the presence of
Livia quickly restores him to himself; when, with more
grace than one would look for, he acknowledges his
fault, ascribing it sportively to the fogs of the German
marshes. It amuses us to observe the power which the
polished manners and courtly ways of Livia exercise
over Aurelian, whose ambition seems now as violently
bent upon subduing the world by the displays of taste,
grace, and magnificence, as it once was to do it  and
is still indeed  by force of arms. Having astonished
mankind in one way, he would astonish them again in
quite another; and to this later task his whole nature is
consecrated with as entire a devotion as ever it was to
the other. Livia is in all these things his model and
guide; and never did soldier learn to catch, from the
least motion or sign of the general, his will, than does
he, to the same end, study the countenance and the
voice of the empress. Yet is there, as you will believe,
knowing the character of Aurelian as well as you do,
nothing mean nor servile in this. He is ever himself,
and beneath this transparent surface, artificially
assumed
,
you behold, feature for feature, the lineaments
of the fierce soldier glaring forth in all their native
wildness
and ferocity. Yet we are happy that there exists
any charm potent enough to calm, but for hours or days,
a nature so stern and cruel as to cause perpetual fears
for the violences in which at any moment it may break
out. The late slaughter in the very streets of Rome,
when the Clian ran with the blood of fifteen thousand
Romans, butchered within sight of their own homes,
with the succeeding executions, naturally fill us with
apprehensions for the future. We call him generous,
and magnanimous, and so he is, compared with former
tyrants who have polluted the throne  Tiberius,
Commodus
,
or Maximin; but what title has he to that praise,
when tried by the standard which our own reason
supplies
of those great virtues? I confess it was not always
so. His severity was formerly ever on the side of
justice
;
it was indignation at crime or baseness which
sometimes brought upon him the charge of cruelty
never the wanton infliction of suffering and death. But
it certainly is not so now. A slight cause now rouses
his sleeping passions to a sudden fury, often fatal to the
first object that comes in his way. But enough of this.
Do not forget to tell me again of the Old Hermit of
the mountains, and that you have visited him  if
indeed
he be yet among the living.
Even with your lively imagination, Fausta, you can
hardly form an idea of the sensation which my open
assertion of Christian principles and assumption of the
Christian name has made in Rome. I intended when
I sat down to speak only of this, but see how I have
been led away! My letters will be for the most part
confined, I fear, to the subjects which engross both
myself
and Julia most  such as relate to the condition and
prospects of the new religion, and to the part which we
take in the revolution which is going on. Not that I
shall be speechless upon other and inferior topics, but
that upon this of Christianity I shall be garrulous and
overflowing. I believe that in doing this, I shall consult
your preferences as well as my own. I know you to be
desirous of principles better than any which as yet you
have been able to discover, and that you will gladly learn
whatever I may have it in my power to teach you from
this quarter. But all the teaching I shall attempt will
be to narrate events as they occur, and state facts as they
arise, and leave them to make what impression they
may.
When I just spoke of the sensation which my
adoption
of the Christian system had caused in Rome, I did
not mean to convey any idea like this, that it has been
rare for the intelligent and cultivated to attach
themselves
to this despised religion. On the contrary, it
would be true were I to say, that they who accept
Christianity, are distinguished for their intelligence;
that estimated as a class, and they rank far above the
lowest. It is not the dregs of a people who become
reformers
of philosophy or religion; who grow dissatisfied
with ancient opinions upon exalted subjects, and search
about for better, and adopt them. The processes
involved
in this change, in their very nature, require
intelligence
,
and imply a character of more than common
elevation. It is neither the lowest nor the highest who
commence, and at first carry on, a work like this; but
those who fill the intermediate spaces. The lowest are
dead as brute matter to such interests; the highest
the rich, the fashionable, the noble  from opposite
causes just as dead  or if they are alive at all, it is
with the rage of denunciation and opposition. They
are supporters of the decent usages sanctioned by
antiquity
,
and consecrated by the veneration of a long line
of the great and noble. Whether they themselves
believe
in the system which they uphold or not, they are
equally tenacious of it. They would preserve and
perpetuate
it, because it has satisfied, at any rate bound and
overawed, the multitude for ages: and the experiment
of alteration or substitution is too dangerous to be tried.
Most indeed reason not, nor philosophize at all, in the
matter. The instinct that makes them Romans in their
worship of the power and greatness at Rome, and
attachment
to her civil forms, makes them Romans in their
religion, and will summon them, if need be, to die for
the one and the other.
Religion and philosophy have accordingly nothing to
hope from this quarter. It is those whom we may term
the substantial middle classes, who, being least hindered
by prejudices and pride of order, on the one hand, and
incapacitated by ignorance on the other, have ever been
the earliest and best friends of progress in any
science
.
Here you find the retired scholar, the thoughtful
and independent farmer, the skillful mechanic, the
enlightened
merchant, the curious traveler, the
inquisitive
philosopher  all fitted, beyond those of either
extreme
,
for exercising a sound judgment upon such
questions
,
and all more interested in them. It is out of
these that Christianity has made its converts. They
are accordingly worthy of universal respect. I have
examined with diligence, and can say that there live
not in Rome a purer and more noble company than the
Christians. When I say however that it is out of
these whom I have just specified, that Christianity
has made its converts, I do not mean to say out
of them exclusively. Some have joined them in the
present age, as well as in every age past, from the most
elevated in rank and power. If in Nero's palace, and
among his chief ministers, there were Christians, if
Domitilla, Domitian's niece, was a Christian, if Philip
was a Christian, so now a few of the same rank may be
counted, who openly, and more who secretly, profess
this religion. But they are very few. So that you will
not wonder that when the head of the ancient and
honorable
house of the Pisos, the friend of Aurelian, and
allied to the royal family of Palmyra, declared himself
to be of this persuasion, no little commotion was
observable
in Rome  not so much among the Christians
themselves as among the patricians, among the nobility,
in the court and palace of Aurelian. The love of many
has grown cold, and the outward tokens of respect are
withheld. Brows darkened by the malignant passions
of the bigot are bent upon me as I pass along the streets,
and inquiries, full of scornful irony, are made after the
welfare of my new friends. The emperor changes not
his carriage toward me, nor I believe his feelings. I
think he is too tolerant of opinion, too much a man of
the world, to desire to curb and restrain the liberty of
his friends in the quarter of philosophy and religion. I
know indeed on the other hand, that he is religious in
his way, to the extreme of superstition, but I have
observed
no tokens as yet of any purpose or wish to
interfere
with the belief or worship of others. He seems
like one who, if he may indulge his own feelings in his
own way, is not unwilling to concede to others the same
freedom.
As I was writing these last sentences, I became
conscious
of a voice muttering in low tones, as if
discoursing
with itself, and upon no very agreeable theme. I
heeded it not at first, but wrote on. At length it ran
thus, and I was compelled to give ear:
`Patience, patience  greatest of virtues, yet hardest
of practice! To wait indeed for a kingdom were
something
,
though it were upon a bed of thorns; to suffer
for the honor of truth, were more; more in itself, and
more in its rewards. But patience, when a fly stings,
or a fool speaks, or worse, when time is wasted and lost,
is  the virtue mayhap is greater after all  but it is
harder, I say, of practice  that is what I say  yet, for
that very reason, greater! By Hercules! I believe it
is so. So that while I wait here, my virtue of patience
is greater than that of these accursed Jews. Patience
then, I say, patience!'
VOL. I. 4
`What in the name of all antiquity,' I exclaimed,
turning round as the voice ceased, `is this flood of
philosophy
for? Wherein have I offended?'
`Offended!' cried the other: `Nay, noble master,
not offended. According to my conclusion, I owe thee
thanks; for while I have stood waiting to catch thy eye
and ear, my virtue has shot up like a wild vine. The
soul has grown. I ought therefore rather to crave
forgiveness
of thee, for breaking up a study which was so
profound, and doubtless so agreeable too.'
`Agreeable you will certainly grant it, when I tell you
I was writing to your ancient friend and pupil, the
daughter
of Gracchus.'
`Ah, the blessings of all the gods upon her. My
dreams are still of her. I loved her, Piso, as I never
loved beside, either form, shadow, or substance. I used
to think that I loved her as a parent loves his child  a
brother his sister; but it was more than that. Aristotle
is not so dear to me as she. Bear witness these tears!
I would now, bent as I am, travel the Syrian deserts to
see her; especially if I might hear from her mouth a
chapter of the great philosopher. Never did Greek,
always
music, seem so like somewhat more divinely
harmonious
than anything of earth, as when it came through
her lips. Yet, by Hercules! she played me many a
mad prank! 'T would have been better for her and for
letters, had I chastised her more, and loved her less.
Condescend, noble Piso, to name me to her, and entreat
her not to fall away from her Greek. That will be a
consolation under all losses, and all sorrows.'
`I will not fail to do so. And now in what is my
opinion wanted?'
`It is simply in the matter of these volumes, where
thou wilt have them bestowed. The cases here, by their
superior adorning, seem designed for the great master of
all, and his disciples; and it is here I would fain order
them. Would it so please thee?'
`No, Solon, not there. That is designed for a very
different Master and his disciples.'
Solon looked at me as if unwilling to credit his ears,
hoping that something would be added more honorable
to the affronted philosopher and myself. But nothing
coming, he said:
`I penetrate  I apprehend. This, the very centre
and post of honor, thou reservest for the atheistical Jews.
The gods help us! I doubt I should straight resign my
office. Well, well; let us hope that the increase of
years will bring an increase of wisdom. We cannot
look for fruit on a sapling. Youth seeks novelty. But
the gods be thanked! Youth lasts not long, but is a
fault daily corrected; else the world were at a bad pass.
Rome is not fallen, nor the fame of the Stagyrite hurt
for this. But 't is grievous to behold!'
So murmuring, as he retreated to the farther part of
the library, with his bundle of rolls under his arm, he
again busied himself in the labors of his office.
I see, Fausta, the delight that sparkles in your eye,
and breaks over your countenance, as you learn that
Solon, the incomparable Solon, is one of my household.
No one whom I could think of, appeared so well suited
to my wants as librarian, as Solon, and I can by no
means convey to you an idea of the satisfaction with
which he hailed my offer; and abandoning the rod and
the brass tablets, betook himself to a labor which would
yield him so much more leisure for the perusal of his
favorite authors, and the pursuit of his favorite studies.
He is already deep in the question, `whether the walls
of Troy were accommodated with thirty-three or
thirty-nine
gates,' and also in this, `what was the method of
construction adopted in the case of the wooden horse,
and what was its capacity?' Of his progress in these
matters, I will duly inform you.
But I weary your patience. Farewell.
Piso
, alluding in this letter to the slaughter on the
Clian Hill, and which happened not long before it was
written, I will add here that whatever color it may have
pleased Aurelian to give to that affair  as if it were
occasioned by a dishonest debasement of the coin by the
directors of the mint  there is now no doubt, on the
part of any who are familiar with the history of that
period
,
that the difficulty originated in a much deeper and
more formidable cause, well known to Aurelian himself,
but not spoken of by him, in alluding to the event. It
is certain, then, that the civil war which then befel, for
such it was, was in truth the breaking out of a
conspiracy
on the part of the nobles to displace Aurelian  `a
German peasant,' as they scornfully designated him
and set one of their own order upon the throne. They
had already bought over the chief manager of the public
mint  a slave and favorite of Aurelian  and had
engaged
him in creating, to serve the purposes which they
had in view, an immense issue of spurious coin. This
they had used too liberally, in effecting some of the
preliminary
objects of their movement. It was suspected,
tried, proved to be false, and traced to its authors.
Before
they were fully prepared, the conspirators were
obliged to take to their arms, as the only way in which
to save themselves from the executioner. The contest
was one of the bloodiest ever known within the walls of
the city. It was Aurelian, with a few legions of his
army, and the people  always of his part  against
the wealth and the power of the nobility, and their paid
adherents. In one day, and in one battle, as it may be
termed, fifteen thousand soldiers and citizens were slain
in the streets of the capital. Truly does Piso say, the
streets of the Clian ran blood. I happily was within
the walls of the queen's palace at Tibur; but well do I
remember the horror of the time  especially the days
succeeding the battle, when the vengeance of the
enraged
conqueror fell upon the noblest families of Rome,
and the axe of the executioner was blunted and broken
with the savage work which it did.
No one has written of Aurelian and his reign, who
has not applauded him for the defence which he made
of his throne and crown, when traitorously assailed
within the very walls of the capital; but all unite also
in condemning that fierce spirit of revenge, which, after
the contest was over and his power secure, by
confiscation
,
banishment, torture and death, involved in ruin so
many whom a different treatment would have converted
into friends. But Aurelian was by nature a tyrant; it
was accident whenever he was otherwise. If affairs
moved on smoothly, he was the just or magnanimous
prince; if disturbed and perplexed, and his will crossed,
he was the imperious and vindictive tyrant.
4*
LETTER II.
FROM PISO TO FAUSTA.
You need not, dear Fausta, concern yourself on our
behalf. I cannot think that your apprehensions will be
realized. Rome never was more calm than now, nor
apparently has there ever a better temper possessed its
people. The number of those who are sufficiently
enlightened
to know that the mind ought not to be in
bondage
to man, but be held answerable to God alone for
its thoughts and opinions, is becoming too great for the
violences and cruelties of former ages to be again put in
practice against us. And Aurelian, although stern in
his nature, and superstitious beyond others, will not, I
am persuaded, lend himself either to priests or people to
annoy us. If no principle of humanity prevented him,
nor generosity of sentiment, he would be restrained, I
think, by his attachments to so many who bear the
hated name.
And this opinion I maintain, notwithstanding a recent
act on the part of the emperor, which some construe into
the expression of unfavorable sentiments toward us. I
allude to the appointment of Fronto, Nigridius Fronto,
to be chief priest of the temple of the Sun, which has
these several years been building, and is now just
completed
.
This man signalized himself, both under Decius
and Valerian, for his bitter hatred of the Christians, and
his untiring zeal in the work of their destruction. The
tales which are told of his ferocious barbarity, would be
incredible, did we not know so well what the hard
Roman
heart is capable of. It is reported of him, that he
informed against his own sisters, who had embraced the
Christian faith, was with those who hunted them with
blood-hounds from their place of concealment, and stood
by, a witness and an executioner, while they were torn
limb from limb, and devoured. I doubt not the truth of
the story. And from that day to this, has he made it
his sole office to see that all the laws that bear hard
upon the sect and deprive them of privileges and
immunities
,
are not permitted to become a dead letter. It is
this man, drunk with blood, whom Aurelian has put in
chief authority in his new temple, and made him, in
effect, the head of religion in the city. He is however
not only this. He possesses other traits, which with
reason might commend him to the regard of the
emperor
.
He is an accomplished man, of an ancient family,
and withal no mean scholar. He is a Roman, who for
Rome's honor or greatness, as he would on the one hand
sacrifice father, mother, daughter, so would he also
himself
.
And Rome, he believes, lives but in her religion;
it is the life-blood of the state. It is these traits, I doubt
not, that have recommended him to Aurelian, rather
than the others. He is a person eminently fitted for the
post to which he is exalted; and you well know that it
is the circumstance of fitness, Aurelian alone
considers
,
in appointing his own or the servants of the state.
Probus thinks differently. And although he sees no
cause to apprehend immediate violence, confesses his
fears for the future. He places less reliance than I do
upon the generosity or friendship of Aurelian. It is his
conviction that superstition is the reigning power of his
nature, and will sooner or later assert its supremacy. It
may be so. Probus is an acute observer, and occupies
a position more favorable to impartial estimates, and the
formation of a dispassionate judgment, than I.
This reminds me that you asked for news of
Probus
,
my `Christian pedagogue,' as you are wont to
name him. He is here, adorning, by a life of severe
simplicity and divine benevolence, the doctrine he has
espoused. He is a frequent inmate of our house, and
Julia, not less than myself, ever greets him with
affectionate
reverence, as both friend and instructer. He
holds the chief place in the hearts of the Roman
Christians
;
for even those of the sect who differ from him in
doctrine and in life, cannot but acknowledge that never
an apostle presented to the love and imitation of his
followers
an example of rarer virtue. Yet he is not,
in the outward rank which he holds, at the head of
the Christian body. Their chiefs are, as you know,
the bishops, and Felix is Bishop of Rome, a man
every
way inferior to Probus. But he has the good or
ill fortune to represent more popular opinions, in matters
both of doctrine and practice, than the other, and of
course easily rides into the posts of trust and honor.
He represents those among the Christians  for, alas!
there are such among them  who, in seeking the
elevation and extension of Christianity, do not hesitate
to accommodate both doctrine and manner to the
prejudices
and tastes of both Pagan and Jew. They seek
converts, not by raising them to the height of Christian
principle and virtue, but by lowering these to the level
of their grosser conceptions. Thus it is easy to see
that in the hands of such professors, the Christian
doctrine
is undergoing a rapid process of deterioration.
Probus, and those who are on his part, see this, are
alarmed, and oppose it; but numbers are against them,
and consequently power and authority. Already,
strange as it may seem, when you compare such things
with the institution of Christianity, as effected by
its founder, do the bishops, both in Rome and in the
provinces, begin to assume the state and bearing of
nobility
.
Such is the number and wealth of the
Christian
community, that the treasuries of the churches are
full; and from this source the pride and ambition of
their rulers are luxuriously fed. If, as you walk through
the street which crosses from the Quirinal to the Arch
of Titus, lined with private dwellings of unusual
magnificence
,
you ask whose is that with a portico, that for
beauty and costliness rather exceeds the rest, you are
told, `That is the dwelling of Felix, the Bishop of
Rome;' and if it chance to be a Christian who answers
the question, it is done with ill-suppressed pride or
shame, according to the party to which he belongs.
This Felix is the very man, through the easiness of his
dispositions, and his proneness to all the arts of
self-indulgence
,
and the imposing graciousness of his
carriage
,
to keep the favor of the people, and at the same
time sink them, without suspicion on their part, lower
and lower toward the sensual superstitions, from which,
through so much suffering and by so many labors, they
have but just escaped, and accomplish an adulterous and
fatal union between Christianity and Paganism; by
which indeed Paganism may be to some extent purified
and exalted, but Christianity annihilated. For
Christianity
,
in its essence, is that which beckons and urges
onward, not to excellence only, but to perfection. Of
course its mark is always in advance of the present.
By such union with Paganism then, or Judaism, its
essential
characteristic will disappear; Christianity will,
in effect, perish. You may suppose, accordingly, that
Probus, and others who with him rate Christianity so
differently, look on with anxiety upon this downward
progress, and with mingled sorrow and indignation upon
those who aid it  oftentimes actuated, as is notorious,
by most corrupt motives.
I am just returned from the shop of the learned
Publius
,
where I met Probus, and others of many ways of
thinking. You will gather from what occurred, better
than from anything else I could say, what occupies the
thoughts of our citizens, and how they stand affected.
I called to Milo to accompany me, and to take with
him a basket in which to bring back books, which it was
my intention to purchase.
`I trust, noble master,' said he, `that I am to bear
back no more Christian books.'
`Why so, knave?'
`Because the priests say that they have magical
powers
over all who read them, or so much as handle them;
that a curse sticks wherever they are or have been. I
have heard of those who have withered away to a mere
wisp; of others who have suddenly caught on fire, and
vanished in flame and smoke; and of others whose
blood has stood still, frozen, or run out from all parts of
the body, changed to the very color of your shoe, at
their bare touch. Who should doubt that it is so, when
the very boys in the streets have it, and it is taught in
the temples? I would rather Solon, noble master, went
in my stead. Mayhap his learning would protect him.'
I, laughing, bade him come on. `You are not
withered
away yet, Milo, nor has your blood run out; yet
you have borne many a package of these horrible books.
Surely the gods befriend you.'
`I were else long since with the Scipios.' After a
pause of some length, he added, as he reluctantly, and
with features of increased paleness, followed in my steps:
`I would, my master, that you might be wrought with
to leave these ways. I sleep not, for thinking of your
danger. Never, when it was my sad mischance to
depart
from the deserted palace of the great Gallienus, did
I look to know one to esteem like him. But it is the truth
when I affirm, that I place Piso before Gallienus, and
the lady Julia before the lady Salonina. Shall I tell
you a secret?'
`I will hear it, if it is not to be kept.'
`It is for you to do with it as shall please you. I am
the bosom friend, you may know, of Curio, the
favorite
slave of Fronto '
`Must I not publish it?'
`Nay, that is not the matter, though it is somewhat
to boast of. There is not Curio's fellow in all Rome.
But that may pass. Curio then, as I was with him at
the new temple, while he was busied in some of the last
offices before the dedication, among other things, said:
`Is not thy master Piso of these Christians?' `Yes,'
said I, `he is; and were they all such as he, there could
be no truth in what is said of them.' `Ah!' he replied,
`there are few among the accursed tribe like him. He
has but just joined them; that 's the reason he is better
than the rest. Wait awhile, and see what he will
become
.
They are all alike in the end, cursers, and
despisers
,
and disbelievers, of the blessed gods. But lions
have teeth, tigers have claws, knives cut, fire burns,
water
drowns.' There he stopped. `That's wise,' I said;
`who could have known it?' `Think you,' he rejoined,
`Piso knows it? If not, let him ask Fronto. Let me
advise thee,' he added, in a whisper, though in all the
temple there were none beside us, `let me advise thee,
as thy friend, to avoid dangerous company. Look to
thyself; the Christians are not safe.' `How say you,'
I replied, `not safe? What and whom are they to fear?
Gallienus vexed them not. Is Aurelian ' `Say
no more,' he replied, interrupting me, `and name not
what I have dropped, for your life. Fronto's ears are
more than the eyes of Argus, and his wrath more deadly
than the grave.'
`Just as he ended these words, a strong beam of red
light shot up from the altar, and threw a horrid glare
over the whole dark interior. I confess I cried out with
affright. Curio started at first, but quickly recovered,
saying that it was but the sudden flaming up of the fire
that had been burning on the altar, but which shortly
before he had quenched. `It is,' he said, `an omen of
the flames that are to be kindled throughout Rome.'
This was Curio's communication. Is is not a secret
worth knowing?'
`It tells nothing, Milo, but of the boiling over of the
wrath of the malignant Fronto, which is always boiling
over. Doubtless I should fare ill, were his power equal
to his will to harm us. But Aurelian is above him.'
`That is true; and Aurelian, it is plain, is little like
Fronto.'
`Very little.'
`But still I would that, like Gallienus, thou couldst
only believe in the gods. The Christians, so it is
reported
,
worship and believe in but a man,  a Jew,
who was crucified as a criminal, with thieves and
murderers
.'
He turned upon me a countenance full of
unaffected horror.
`Well, Milo, at another time I will tell you what
the truth about it is. Here we are now, at the shop of
Publius.'
The shop of Publius is remarkable for its extent and
magnificence, if such a word may be applied to a place
of traffic. Here resort all the idlers of learning and
of leisure, to turn over the books, hear the news, discuss
the times, and trifle with the learned bibliopole. As I
entered, he saluted me in his customary manner, and
bade me `welcome to his poor apartments, which for a
long time I had not honored with my presence.'
I replied that two things had kept me away: the civil
broils in which the city had just been involved, and the
care of ordering the appointments of a new dwelling.
I had come now to commence some considerable
purchases
for my vacant shelves, if it might so happen that
the books I wanted were to be found in his rooms.
`There is not,' he replied, `a literature, a science, a
philosophy, an art, or a religion, whose principal authors
are not to be found upon the walls of Publius. My
VOL. I. 5
agents are in every corner of the empire, of the east
and west, searching out the curious and the rare, the
useful and the necessary, to swell the catalogue of my
intellectual riches. I believe it is established, that in no
time before me, as nowhere now, has there been heard
of a private collection like this for value and for
number.'
`I do not doubt what you say, Publius. This is a
grand display. Your ranges of rooms show like those
of the Ulpian. Yet you do not quite equal, I suppose,
Trajan's for number?'
`Truly not. But time may bring it to pass. What
shall I show you? It pleases me to give my time to
you. I am not slow to guess what it is you now, noble
Piso, chiefly covet. And I think, if you will follow me
to the proper apartment, I can set before you the very
things you are in search of. Here upon these shelves
are the Christian writers. Just let me offer you this
copy of Hegesippus, one of your oldest historians, if I
err not. And here are some beautifully executed copies,
I have just ordered to be made, of the Apologies of Justin
and Tertullian. Here, again, are Marcion and
Valentinus
;
but perhaps they are not in esteem with you. If
I have heard aright, you will prefer these tracts of Paul,
or Artemon. But hold, here is a catalogue. Be pleased
to inspect it.'
As I looked over the catalogue, I expressed my
satisfaction
that a person of his repute was willing to keep
on sale works so generally condemned, and excluded
from the shops of most of his craft.
`I aim, my dear friend  most worthy Piso  to steer
a midway course among contending factions. I am
myself
a worshipper of the gods of my fathers. But I am
content that others should do as they please in the
matter
.
I am not, however, so much a worshipper  in
your ear  as a bookseller. That is my calling. The
Christians are become a most respectable people. They
are not to be overlooked. They are in my judgment,
the most intelligent part of our community. Wasting
none of their time at the baths and theatres, they have
more time for books. And then their numbers too!
They are not fewer than seventy thousand!  known
and counted. But the number, between ourselves, Piso,
of those who secretly favor or receive this doctrine, is
equal to the other! My books go to houses, ay, and to
palaces, people dream not of.'
`I think your statements a little broad,' said a smooth,
silvery voice, close at our ears. We started, and beheld
the Prefect Varus standing at our side. Publius was
for a moment a little disconcerted; but quickly
recovered
,
saying, in his easy way, `A fair morning to you! I
knew not that it behooved me to be upon my oath, being
in the presence of the Governor of Rome. I repeat,
noble Varus, but what I hear. I give what I say as the
current rumor. That is all  that is all. Things may
not be so, or they may; it is not for me to say. I wish
well to all; that is my creed.'
`In the public enumerations of the citizens,' replied
the Prefect, inclining with civility to Publius, `the
Christians
have reached at no time fifty thousand. As for
the conjecture touching the numbers who secretly
embrace
this injurious superstition, I hold it utterly baseless.
It may serve a dying cause to repeat such statements,
but they accord not with obvious fact.'
`Suspect me not, Varus,' hastily rejoined the agitated
Publius, `of setting forth such statements with the
purpose
to advance the cause of the Christians. I take no
part in this matter. Thou knowest that I am a Roman
of the old stamp. Not a Roman in my street is more
diligently attentive to the services of the temple than I.
I simply say again, what I hear as news of my
customers
.
The story which one rehearses, I retail to another.'
`I thank the gods it is so,' replied the man of power.
During these few words, I had stood partly concealed
by a slender marble pillar. I now turned, and the usual
greetings passed with the Prefect.
`Ah! Piso! I knew not with certainty my hearer.
Perhaps from you'  smiling as he spoke  `we may
learn the truth. Rome speaks loudly of your late
desertion
of the religion and worship of your fathers, and
union with the Galileans. I should say, I hoped the
report ill founded, had I not heard it from quarters too
authentic to permit a doubt.'
`You have heard rightly, Varus,' I rejoined. `After
searching through all antiquity after truth, I
congratulate
myself upon having at last discovered it, and where
I least expected, in a Jew. And the good which I have
found for myself. I am glad to know is enjoyed by so
many more of my fellow-citizens. I should not hesitate
to confirm the statement made by Publius, from
whatever
authority he may have derived it, rather than that
which has been made by yourself. I have bestowed
attention not only upon the arguments which support
Christianity, but upon the actual condition of the
Christian
community, here and throughout the empire. It is
prosperous at this hour, beyond all former example. If
Pliny could complain, even in his day, of the desertion
of the temples of the gods, what may we now suppose
to be the relative numbers of the two great parties?
Only, Varus, allow the rescript of Gallienus to continue
in force, which merely releases us from oppressions, and
we shall see in what a fair trial of strength between the
two religions will issue.
`That dull profligate and parricide,' replied Varus,
`not content with killing himself with his vices, and his
father by connivance, must needs destroy his country by
his fatuity. I confess, that till that order be repealed,
the superstition will spread.'
`But it only places us upon equal ground.'
`It is precisely there where we never should be placed.
Should the conspirator be put upon the ground of a
citizen
?
Were the late rebels of the mint to be relieved
from all oppression, that they might safely intrigue and
conspire for the throne?'
`Christianity has nothing to do with the empire, as
such. It is a question of moral, philosophical, religious
truth. Is truth to be exalted or suppressed by edicts?'
`The religion of the state,' replied Varus, `is a part of
the state; and he who assails it, strikes at the dearest
life of the state, and  forgive me  is to be dealt with
ought to be dealt with  as a traitor.'
`I trust,' I replied, `that that time will never again
come, but that reason and justice will continue to bear
sway. And it is both reasonable and just, that persons
who yield to none in love of country, and whose
principles
of conduct are such as must make good subjects
VOL. I. 5*
everywhere, because they first make good men, should
be protected in the enjoyment of rights and privileges
common to all others.'
`If the Christians,' he rejoined, `are virtuous men, it
is better for the state than if they were Christians and
corrupt men. But still that would make no change in
my judgment of their offence. They deny the gods
who preside over this nation, and have brought it up to
its present height of power and fame. Their crime
were less, I repeat, to deny the authority of Aurelian.
This religion of the Galileans is a sore, eating into the
vitals of an ancient and vigorous constitution, and must
be cut away. The knife of the surgeon is what the
evil cries out for and must have  else universal
anarchy
is come. I mourn that from the ranks of the very
fathers of the state, they have received an accession like
this of the house of Piso.'
`I shall think my time and talent well employed,' I
replied, `in doing what I may to set the question of
Christianity in its true light before the city. It is this
very institution, Varus, which it needs to preserve it.
Christianize Rome, and you impart the very principle of
endurance, of immortality. Under its present
corruptions
,
it cannot but sink. Is it possible a community of
men can long hold together as vicious as this of Rome?
whose people are either disbelievers of all divine
existences
,
or else ground to the earth by degrading
superstitions
?
A nation, either on the one hand governed by
superstition, or on the other, atheistical, contains within
itself the disease which sooner or later will destroy it.
You yourself, it is notorious, have never been within
the walls of a temple, nor are Lares nor Penates to be
found within your doors.'
`I deny it not. Most who rise to any intelligence
must renounce, if they ever harbored it, all faith in the
absurdities and nonsense of the Roman religion. But
what then? These very absurdities, as we deem them,
are holy truth to the multitude, and do more than all
bolts, bars, axes, and gibbets, to keep them in subjection.
The intelligent are good citizens by reflection; the
multitude
,
through instincts of birth, and the power of
superstition
.
My idea is, as you perceive, Piso, but one.
Religion is the state, and for reasons of state must be
preserved in the very form in which it has so long
upheld
the empire.'
`An idea more degrading than yours, to our species,
can hardly be conceived. I cannot but look upon man
as something more than a part of the state. He is, first
of all, a man, and is to be cared for as such. To
legislate
for the state, to the ruin of the man, is to pamper
the body, and kill the soul. It is to invert the true
process
.
The individual is more than the abstraction which
we term the state. If governments cannot exist, nor
empires hold their sway, but by the destruction of the
human being, why let them fall. The lesser must yield
to the greater. As a Christian, my concern is for man
as man. This is the essence of the religion of Christ.
It is philanthropy. It sees in every human soul a
being of more value than empires, and its purpose is, by
furnishing it with truths and motives, equal to its wants,
to exalt it, purify it, and perfect it. If, in achieving this
work, existing religions or governments are necessarily
overturned or annihilated, Christianity cares not, so long
as man is the gainer. And is it not certain, that no
government could really be injured, although it might
apparently, and for a season, by its subjects being raised
in all intelligence and all virtue? My work therefore,
Varus, will be to sow truth in the heart of the people,
which shall make that heart fertile and productive. I
do not believe that in doing this Rome will suffer injury,
but on the contrary receive benefit. Its religion, or
rather its degrading superstitions, may fall, but a
principle
of almighty energy and divine purity will insensibly
be substituted in their room. I labor for man  not for
the state.'
`And never, accordingly, most noble Piso, did man, in
so unequivocal words, denounce himself traitor.'
`Patriot! friend! benefactor! rather;' cried a voice
at my side, which I instantly recognized as that of
Probus
.
Several beside himself had drawn near, listening
with interest to what was going on.
`That only shows, my good friend,' said Varus, in his
smiling way, and which seems the very contradiction of
all that is harsh and cruel, `how differently we estimate
things. Your palate esteems that to be wholesome and
nutritious food, which mine rejects as ashes to the taste,
and poison to the blood. I behold Rome torn and
bleeding
,
prostrate and dying, by reason of innovations upon
faith and manners, which to you appear the very means
of growth, strength, and life. How shall we resolve the
doubt? Who shall prescribe for the patient? I am
happy in the belief, that the Roman people have long
since decided for themselves, and confirm their decision
every day as it passes, by new acts and declarations.'
`If you mean,' said Probus, `to say that numbers and
the general voice are still against the Christians, I grant
it so. But I am happy too in my belief, that the scale
is trembling on the beam. There are more and better
than you wot of, who hail with eager minds and glad
hearts, the truths which it is our glory, as servants of
Christ, to propound. Within many a palace upon the
seven hills, do prayers go up in his name; and what is
more, thousands upon thousands of the humbler ranks,
of those who but yesterday were without honor in their
own eyes, or others'  without faith  at war with
themselves and the world  fit tools for any foe of the
state to work with  are to-day reverers of themselves,
worshippers of God, lovers of mankind, patriots who
love their country better than ever before, because they
now behold in every citizen not only a citizen, but a
brother and an immortal. The doctrine of Christianity,
as a lover of man, so commends itself, Varus, to the
hearts of the people, that in a few more years of
prosperity
,
and the face of the Roman world will glow with
a new beauty; love and humanity will shine forth in all
its features.'
`That is very pretty,' said Varus, his lip slightly
curling
,
as he spoke, but retaining his courteous bearing,
`yet methinks, seeing this doctrine is so bewitching, and
is withal a heaven-inspired wisdom, the God working
behind it and urging it on, it moves onward with a pace
something of the slowest. Within a few of three
hundred
years has it appealed to the human race, and
appealed
in vain. The feeblest and the worst of mankind
have had power almost to annihilate it, and more than
once has it seemed scarce to retain its life. Would it
have been so, had it been in reality what you claim for it,
of divine birth? Would the gods suffer their schemes for
man's good to be so thwarted, and driven aside by man?
What was this boasted faith doing during the long and
peaceful reigns of Hadrian, and the first Antonine? The
sword of persecution was then sheathed, or if it fell at
all, it was but on a few. So too under Vespasian, Titus,
Nerva, Commodus, Severus, Heliogabalus, the Philips,
Gallienus, and Claudius?'
`That is well said,' a Roman voice added, of one
standing by the side of Varus, `and is a general
wonder.'
`I marvel it should be a wonder,' rejoined Probus.
`Can you pour into a full measure? Must it not be
first emptied? Who, Varus, let him try as he may,
could plant the doctrine of Christ in thy heart? Could
I do it, think you?  or Piso?'
`I trow not.'
`And why, I pray you?'
`It is not hard to guess.'
`Is it not because you are already full of contrary
notions
,
to which you cling tenaciously, and from which,
perhaps, no human force could drag you? But yours is
a type of every other Roman mind to which
Christianity
has been offered. If you receive it not at once,
should others? Suppose the soul to be full of sincere
convictions as to the popular faith, can the gospel easily
enter there? Suppose it skeptical, as to all spiritual
truth; can it enter there? Suppose it polluted by vice;
can it easily enter there? Suppose it like the soul of
Fronto,  '
`Hush! hush!' said several voices. Probus heeded
them not.
`Suppose it like the soul of Fronto, could it enter
there? See you not then, by knowing your own hearts,
what time it must demand for a new, and specially a
strict doctrine to make its way into the minds of men?
'T is not easier to bore a rock with one's finger, than to
penetrate a heart hardened by sin or swelled with
prejudice
and pride. And if we say, Varus, this was a work
for the God to do  that he who originated the faith
should propagate it  I answer, that would not be like
the other dealings of the divine power. He furnishes
you with earth and seed, but he ploughs not for you,
nor plants, nor reaps. He gives you reason, but he
pours not knowledge into your mind. So he offers
truth; but that is all. He compels no assent; he forces
no belief. All is voluntary and free. How then can
the march of truth be otherwise than slow? Truth,
being
the greatest thing below, resembles in its port the
motion of the stars, which are the greatest things
above. But like theirs, if slow, it is ever sure and
onward
.'
`The stars set in night.'
`But they rise again. Truth is eclipsed often, and it
sets for a night; but never is turned aside from its
eternal
path.'
`Never, Publius,' said the Prefect, adjusting his gown,
and with the act filling the air with perfume, `never did
I think to find myself within a Christian church. Your
shop possesses many virtues. It is a place to be
instructed
in.' Then turning to Probus, he soothingly
and in persuasive tones, added, `Be advised now, good
friend, and leave off thy office of teacher. Rome can
well spare thee. Take the judgment of others; we
need not thy doctrine. Let that alone which is well
established
and secure. Spare these institutions,
veneerable
through a thousand years. Leave changes to
the gods.'
Probus was about to reply, when we were strangely
interrupted. While we had been conversing, there
stood before me, in the midst of the floor of the
apartment
,
a man, whose figure, face, and demeanor were
such that I hardly could withdraw my eye from him.
He was tall and gaunt, beyond all I ever saw, and erect
as a Prtorian in the ranks. His face was strongly
Roman
,
thin and bony, with sunken cheeks, a brown and
wrinkled skin  not through age, but exposure  and
eyes more wild and fiery than ever glared in the head
of Hun or hyena. He seemed a living fire-brand of
death and ruin. As we talked, he stood there
motionless
,
sometimes casting glances at our group, but more
frequently fixing them upon a roll which he held in his
hands.
As Varus uttered the last words, this man suddenly
left his post, and reaching us with two or three strides,
shook his long finger at Varus, saying, at the same
time,
`Hold, blasphemer!'
The Prefect started as if struck, and gazing a moment
with unfeigned amazement at the figure, then
immediately
burst into a laugh, crying out,
`Ha! ha! Who in the name of Hecate have we
here? Ha! ha!  he seems just escaped from the
Vivaria
.'
`Thy laugh,' said the figure `is the music of a sick
and dying soul. It is a rebel's insult against the
majesty
of Heaven; ay, laugh on! That is what the
devils
do; it is the merriment of hell. What time they
burn not, they laugh. But enough. Hold now thy
scoffing, Prefect Varus, for high as thou art, I fear thee
not: no! not wert thou twice Aurelian, instead of
Varus
.
I have somewhat for thee. Wilt hear it?'
`With delight, Bubo. Say on.'
`It was thy word just now, `Rome needs not this
doctrine
,'
was it not?'
`If I said it not, it is a good saying, and I will father
it.'
Rome needs not this doctrine; she is well enough;
let her alone!' These were thy words. Need not,
Varus
,
the streets of Rome a cleansing river to purify
them? Dost thou think them well enough, till all the
fountains have been let loose to purge them? Is
Tarquin's
sewer a place to dwell in? Could all the waters
of Rome sweeten it? The people of Rome are fouler
than her highways. The sewers are sweeter than the
very worshippers of our temples. Thou knowest
somewhat
of this. Wast ever present at the rites of
Bacchus
?
or those of the Cyprian goddess? Nay, blush
not yet. Didst ever hear of the gladiator Pollex?  of
the woman Ccina?  of the boy Llius, and the fair
girl Fannia  proffered and sold by the parents, Pollex
and Ccina, to the loose pleasures of Gallienus? Now
I give thee leave to blush! Is it nought that the one
half of Rome is sunk in a sensuality, a beastly
drunkenness
and lust, fouler than that of old, which, in Judea,
called down the fiery vengeance of the insulted heavens?
VOL. I. 6
Thou knowest well, both from early experience and
because
of thy office, what the purlieus of the theatres are,
and places worse than those, and which to name were
an offence. But to you they need not be named. Is
all this, Varus, well enough? Is this that venerable
order
thou wouldst not have disturbed? Is that to be
charged as impiety and atheism, which aims to change
and reform it? Are they conspirators, and rebels, and
traitors, whose sole office and labor is to mend these
degenerate
morals, to heal these corrupting sores, to pour
a better life into the rotting carcass of this guilty city?
Is it for our pastime, or our profit, that we go about this
always dangerous work? Is it a pleasure to hear the
gibes, jests, and jeers of the streets and the places of
public resort? Will you not believe that it is for some
great end, that we do and bear as thou seest  even the
redemption, and purifying, and saving of Rome? I love
Rome, even as a mother, and for her am ready to die.
I have bled for her freely in battle, in Gaul, upon the
Danube, in Asia, and in Egypt. I am willing to bleed
for her at home, even unto death, if that blood might,
through the blessing of God, be a stream to cleanse her
putrifying members. But O, holy Jesus! why waste I
words upon one whose heart is harder than the nether
millstone! Thou preachedst not to Pilate, nor didst
thou work thy wonders for Herod. Varus, beware!'
And with these words, uttered with a wild and
threatening
air, he abruptly turned away, and was lost in the
crowds of the street.
While he raved, the Prefect maintained the same
unruffled
demeanor as before. His customary smile played
around his mouth, a smile like no other I ever saw. To
a casual observer, it would seem like every other smile,
but to one who watches him, it is evident that it denotes
no hilarity of heart, for the eyes accompany it not with
a corresponding expression, but on the contrary, look
forth from their beautiful cavities with glances that speak
of anything rather than of peace and good-will. So
soon as the strange being who had been declaiming had
disappeared, the Prefect, turning to me, as he drew up
his gown around him, said,
`I give you joy, Piso, of your coadjutor. A few more
of the same fashion, and Rome is safe.' And saluting
us with urbanity, he sallied from the shop.
I had been too much amazed, myself, during this
scene, to do anything else than stand still, and listen,
and observe. As for Probus, I saw him to be greatly
moved, and give signs of even deep distress. He
evidently
knew who the person was  as I saw him make
more than one ineffectual effort to arrest him in his
harangue
and as evidently held him in respect, seeing
he abstained from all interruption of a speech that he
felt to be provoking wantonly the passions of the Prefect,
and of many who stood around, from whom, so soon as
the man of authority had withdrawn, angry words broke
forth abundantly.
`Well did the noble Prefect say, that that wild animal
had come forth like a half-famished tiger from the
Vivaria
,'
said one.
`It is singular,' observed another, `that a man who
pretends to reform the state, should think to do it by first
putting it into a rage with him, and all he utters.'
`Especially singular,' added a third, `that the
advocate
of a religion that, as I hear, condemns violence, and
consists in the strictness with which the passions are
governed, should suppose that he was doing any other
work than entering a breach in his own citadel, by such
ferocity. But it is quite possible his wits are touched.'
`No, I presume not,' said the first; `this is a kind of
zeal which, if I have observed aright, the Christians hold
in esteem.'
As these separated to distant parts of the shop, I said
to Probus, who seemed heavily oppressed by what had
occurred, `What dmon dwells in that body that has just
departed?'
`Well do you say dmon. The better mind of that
man seems oft-times seized upon by some foul spirit, and
bound  and which then acts and speaks in its room.
But do you not know him?'
`No, truly; he is a stranger to me, as he appears to
be to all.'
`Nevertheless, you have been in his company. You
forget not the Mediterranean voyage?'
`By no means. I enjoyed it highly, and recall it ever
with delight.'
`Do you not remember, at the time I narrated to you
the brief story of my life, that, as I ended, a rough voice
from among the soldiers exclaimed, `Where now are the
gods of Rome?' This is that man, the soldier Macer;
then bound with fellow soldiers to the service in Africa,
now a Christian preacher.'
`I see it now. That man impressed me then with his
thin form and all-devouring eyes. But the African
climate
,
and the gash across his left cheek, and which
seems to have slightly disturbed the eye upon that side,
have made him a different being, and almost a terrific
one. Is he sound and sane?'
`Perfectly so,' replied Probus, `unless we may say
that souls earnestly devoted and zealous, are mad.
There is not a more righteous soul in Rome. His
conscience
is bare, and shrinking like a fresh wound. His
breast is warm and fond as a woman's. His penitence
for the wild errors of his pagan youth, a consuming fire,
which, while it redoubles his ardor in doing what he
may in the cause of truth, rages in secret, and, if the
sword or the cross claim him not, will bring him to the
grave. He is utterly incapable of fear. All the racks
and dungeons of Rome, with their tormentors, could not
terrify him.'
`You now interest me in him. I must see and know
him. It might be of service to him and to all, Probus,
methinks, if he could be brought to associate with those
whose juster notions might influence his, and modify
them to the rule of truth.'
`I fear not. What he sees, he sees clearly and
strongly
,
and by itself. He understands nothing of one truth
bearing upon another, and adding to it, or taking from
it. Truth is truth with him  and as his own mind
perceives
it  not another's. His conscience will allow
him in no accommodations to other men's opinions or
wishes. He is impatient under an argument as a
warhorse
under the rein after the trumpet sounds. It is
unavoidable therefore but he should possess great power
among the Christians of Rome. His are the bold and
decisive qualities that strike the common mind. There
is glory and applause in following and enduring under
VOL. I. 6*
such a leader. Many are fain to believe him divinely
illuminated and impelled, to unite the characters of
teacher
and prophet; and from knowing that he is so regarded
by others, Macer has come almost to believe it himself.
He is tending more and more to construe every impulse of
his own mind into a divine suggestion, and I believe
honestly
experiences difficulty in discriminating between
them. Still, I do not deny that it would be of
advantage
for him more and more to come in contact with
sober and enlightened minds. I shall take pleasure, at
some fitting moment, to accompany you to his humble
dwelling; the rather as I would show you also his wife
and children, all of whom are like himself Christians.'
`I shall not forget the promise.'
Whereupon we separated.
I then searched for Publius, and making my
purchases
,
returned home, Milo following with the books.
As Milo relieved himself of his burden, discharging it
upon the floor of the library, I overheard him to say,
`Lie there, accursed rolls! May the flames consume
you, ere you are again upon my shoulders! For none
but Piso would I have done what I have. Let me to
the temple and expiate.'
`What words are these?' cried Solon, emerging
suddenly
at the sound from a recess. `Who dares to heap
curses upon books, which are the soul embalmed and
made imperishable? What have we here? Aha! a
new treasure for these vacant shelves, and most trimly
ordered.'
`These, venerable Greek,' exclaimed Milo, waving
him away, `are books of magic! oriental magic! Have
a care! A touch may be fatal! Our noble master
affects
the Egyptians.'
`Magic!' exclaimed Solon, with supreme contempt;
`art thou so idiotic as to put credence in such fancies?
Away!  hinder me not!' And saying so, he eagerly
grasped a volume, and unrolling it, to the beginning of
the work, dropped it suddenly, as if bitten by a serpent.
`Ha!' cried Milo, `said I not so? Art thou so idiotic,
learned Solon, as to believe in such fancies? How is it
with thee? Is thy blood hot or cold?  thy teeth loose
or fast?  thy arm withered or swollen?'
Solon stood surveying the pile, with a look partly of
anger, partly of sorrow.
`Neither, fool!' he replied. `These possess not the
power nor worth fabled of magic. They are books of
dreams, visions, reveries, which are to the mind what
fogs would be for food, and air for drink, innutritive and
vain. Papias!  Irenus!  Hegesippus!  Polycarp!
Origen  whose names are these, and to whom familiar?
Some are Greek, some are Latin, but not a name famous
in the world meets my eye. But we will order them on
their shelves, and trust that time, which accomplishes
all things, will restore reason to Piso. Milo, essay thy
strength  my limbs are feeble  and lift these upon
yonder marble; so may age deal gently with thee.'
`Not for their weight in wisdom, Solon, would I again
touch them. I have borne them hither, and if the priests
speak truly, my life is worth not an obolus. I were mad
to tempt my fate farther.'
`Avaunt thee, then, for a fool and a slave, as thou art!'
`Nay now, master Solon, thy own wisdom forsakes
thee. Philosophers, they say, are ever possessors of
themselves, though for the rest they be beggars.'
`Beggar! sayest thou? Avaunt! I say, or Papias
shall teach thee'  and he would have launched the
roll at the head of Milo, but that, with quick instincts,
he shot from the apartment, and left the pedagogue to
do his own bidding.
So Fausta, you see that Solon is still the irritable old
man he was, and Milo the fool he was. Think not me
worse than either, for hoping so to entertain you. I
know that in your solitude and grief, even such pictures
may be welcome.
When I related to Julia the scene and the conversation
at the shop of Publius, she listened not without
agitation
,
and expresses her fears lest such extravagances,
repeated
and become common, should inflame the minds
both of the people and their rulers against the
Christians
.
Though I agree with her in lamenting the
excess
of zeal displayed by many of the Christians, and
their needless assaults upon the characters and faith of
their opposers, I cannot apprehend serious consequences
from them, because they are so few and rare, and are
palpable exceptions to the general character which I
believe
the whole city would unite in ascribing to the
Christians. Their mildness and pacific temper are
perhaps
the very traits by which they are most
distinguished
,
with which they are indeed continually
reproached
.
Yet individual acts are often the remote
causes of vast universal evil  of bloodshed, war, and
revolution. Macer alone is enough to set on fire a city,
a continent, a world.
I rejoice, I cannot tell you how sincerely, in all your
progress. I do not doubt in the ultimate return of the
city to its former populousness and wealth, at least.
Aurelian has done well for you at last. His
disbursements
for the Temple of the Sun alone are vast, and
must be more than equal to its perfect restoration. Yet
his overthrown column you will scarce be tempted to
rebuild. Forget not to assure Gracchus and Calpurnius
of my affection. Farewell.
LETTER III.
FROM PISO TO FAUSTA.
You are right, Fausta, in your unfavorable judgment
of the Roman populace. The Romans are not a people
one would select to whom to propose a religion like this
of Christianity. All causes seem to combine to injure and
corrupt them. They are too rich. The wealth of subject
kingdoms and provinces finds its way to Rome; and not
only in the form of tribute to the treasury of the empire,
but in that of the private fortunes amassed by such as have
held offices in them for a few years, and who then return
to the capital to dissipate in extravagances and luxuries,
unknown to other parts of the world, the riches wrung
by violence, injustice and avarice from the wretched
inhabitants
whom fortune had delivered into their power.
Yes, the wealth of Rome is accumulated in such masses,
not through the channels of industry nor commerce; it
arrives in bales and ship-loads, drained from foreign
lands by the hand of extortion. The palaces are not to
be numbered, built and adorned in a manner surpassing
those of the monarchs of other nations, which are the
private residences of those, or of the descendants of
those who for a few years have presided over some
distant
province, but in that brief time, Verres-like, have
used their opportunities so well as to return home
oppressed
with a wealth which life proves not long enough
to spend, notwithstanding the aid of dissolute and
spendthrift
sons. Here have we a single source of evil equal
to the ruin of any people. The morals of no community
could be protected against such odds. It is a mountain
torrent tearing its way through the fields of the
husbandman
,
whose trees and plants possess no strength of
branch or root to resist the inundation.
Then in addition to all this, there are the largesses of
the emperor, not only to his armies, but to all the
citizens
of Rome; which are now so much a matter of
expectation, that rebellions I believe would ensue were
they not bestowed. Aurelian, before his expedition to
Asia, promised to every citizen a couple of crowns  he
has redeemed the promise by the distribution, not of
money but of bread, two loaves to each, with the figure
of a crown stamped upon them. Besides this, there has
been an allowance of meat and pork  so much to all
the lower orders. He even contemplated the addition of
wine to the list, but was hindered by the judicious
suggestion
of his friend and general, Mucapor, that if he
provided wine and pork he would next be obliged to
furnish
them fowls also, or public tumults might break out.
This recalled him to his senses. Still however only in
part, for the other grants have not been withdrawn. In
this manner is this whole population supported in idleness.
Labor is confined to the slaves. The poor feed upon
the bounties of the emperor, and the wealth so abundantly
lavished by senators, nobles, and the retired proconsuls.
Their sole employment is, to wait upon the pleasure of
their many masters, serve them as they are ready
enough to do, in the toils and preparations of luxury,
and what time they are not thus occupied, pass the
remainder
of their hours at the theatres, at the circuses,
at games of a thousand kinds, or in noisy groups at the
corners of the streets and in the market-places.
It is become a state necessity to provide amusements
for the populace, in order to be safe against their
violence
.
The theatres, the baths, with their ample
provisions
for passing away time in some indolent amusement
or active game, are always open and always crowded.
Public or funeral games are also in progress without
intermission
in different parts of the capital. Those
instituted
in honor of the gods, and which make a part of
the very religion of the people, are seldom suspended
for even a day. At one temple or another, in this grove
or that, within or without the walls, are these lovers of
pleasure entertained by shows, processions, music, and
sacrifices. And as if these were not enough, or when
they perchance fail for a moment, and the sovereign
people
are listless and dull, the Flavian is thrown open by
the imperial command, the Vivaria vomit forth their
maddened and howling tenants either to destroy each
other, or dye the dust of the arena with the blood of
gladiators, criminals or captives. These are the great
days of the Roman people; these their favorite pleasures.
The cry through the streets in the morning of even
women and boys, Fifty captives to-day for the lions in
the Flavian, together with the more solemn
announcement
of the same by the public heralds, and by painted
bills at the corners of the streets, and on the public baths,
is sure to throw the city into a fever of excitement, and
rivet by a new bond the affections of this bloody people
to their indulgent emperor.
Hardly has the floor of the amphitheatre been renewed
since the cessation of the triumphal games of Aurelian,
before it is again to be soaked with blood in honor of
Apollo, whose magnificent temple is within a few days
to be dedicated.
Never before I believe was there a city whose
inhabitants
so many and so powerful causes conspired to
corrupt
and morally destroy. Were I to give you a picture
of the vices of Rome, it would be too dark and foul a
one for your eye to read, but not darker nor fouler than
you will suppose it must necessarily be to agree with
what I have already said. Where there is so little
industry
and so much pleasure, the vices will flourish and
shoot up to their most gigantic growth. Not in the
days of Nero were they more luxuriant than now.
Aurelian
,
in the first year of his reign, laid upon them a
severe but useful restraint, and they were checked for a
time. But since he has himself departed from the
simplicity
and rigor of that early day, and actually or
virtually
repealed the laws which then were promulged for
the reformation of the city in its manners, the people
have also relapsed, and the ancient excesses are
renewed
.
This certainly is not a people who, in its whole mass,
will be eager to receive the truths of a religion like
this of Christianity. It will be repulsive to them. You
are right in believing that among the greater part it
will find no favor. But all are not such as I have
described
.
There are others different in all respects, and
who stand waiting the appearance of some principles of
philosophy or religion which shall be powerful enough
to redeem their country from idolatry and moral death,
as well as raise themselves from darkness to light.
Some of this sort are to be found among the nobles and
VOL. I. 7
senators themselves,  a few among the very dregs of
the people, but most among those who, securing for
themselves competence and independence by their own
labor in some of the useful arts, and growing thoughtful
and intelligent with their labor, understand in some
degree
,
which others do not, what life is for and what they
are for, and hail with joy truths which commend
themselves
to both their reason and affections. It is out of
these, the very best blood of Rome, that our Christians
are made. They are, in intelligence and virtue, the
very bone and muscle of the capital, and of our two
millions
constitute no mean proportion,  large enough to
rule and control the whole, should they ever choose to
put forth their power. It is among these that the
Christian
preachers aim to spread their doctrines, and when
they shall all, or in their greater part, be converted, as,
judging of the future by the past and present, will
happen
in no long time, Rome will be safe and the empire
safe. For it needs, I am persuaded, for Rome to be as
pure as she is great to be eternal in her dominion, and
then the civilizer and saviour of the whole world. O,
glorious age!  not remote  when truth shall wield
the sceptre in Csar's seat, and subject nations of the
earth no longer come up to Rome to behold and copy
her vices, but to hear the law and be imbued with the
doctrine of Christ, so bearing back to the remotest
province
precious seed, there to be planted, and spring up
and bear fruit, filling the earth with beauty and
fragrance
.
These things, Fausta, in answer to the questions at
the close of your letter, which betray just such an
interest
in the subject which engrosses me, as it gives me
pleasure to witness.
I have before mentioned the completion of Aurelian's
Temple of the Sun and the proposed dedication. This
august ceremony is appointed for tomorrow, and this
evening we are bidden to the gardens of Sallust, where
is to be all the rank and beauty of Rome. O that thou,
Fausta, couldst be there!
I have been, I have seen, I have supped, I have
returned
;
and again seated at my table beneath the
protecting
arm of my chosen divinity, I take my pen, and,
by a few magic flourishes and marks, cause you a
thousand leagues away, to see and hear what I have
seen and heard  alas! that I cannot cause you to sup
as I did also. But this is beyond the power of the pen.
Accompanied by Portia and Julia, I was within the
palace of the emperor early enough to enjoy the
company
of Aurelian and Livia before the rest of the world
was there. We were carried to the more private
apartments
of the empress, where it is her custom to receive
those whose friendship she values most highly. They
are in that part of the palace which has undergone no
alterations since it was the residence of the great
historian
,
but shines in all the lustre of a taste and an art
that adorned a more accomplished age than our own.
Especially, it seems to me, in the graceful disposition of
the interiors of their palaces, and the combined richness
and appropriateness of the art lavished upon them, did
the genius of the days of Hadrian and Vespasian
surpass
our own. Not that I defend all that that genius
adopted and immortalized. It was not seldom licentious
and gross in its conceptions, however unrivalled in the
art and science by which they were made to glow upon
the walls, or actually speak and move in marble or
brass. In the favorite apartment of Livia, into which
we were now admitted, perfect in its forms and
proportions
,
the walls and ceilings are covered with the story
of Leda, wrought with an effect of drawing and color,
of which the present times afford no example. The
well-known Greek, Polymnestes, was the artist. And
this room in all its embellishments is chaste and cold
compared with others, whose subjects were furnished
to the painter by the profligate master himself.
The room of Leda, as it is termed, is  but how
beautiful
it is I cannot tell. Words paint poorly to the eye.
Believe it not less beautiful, nor less exquisitely adorned
with all that woman loves most, hangings, carpets and
couches, than any in the palace of Gracchus or Zenobia.
It was here we found Aurelian and Livia, and his niece
Aurelia. The emperor  habited in silken robes richly
wrought with gold, the inseparable sword at his side,
from which, at the expense of whatever incongruity, he
never parts  advanced to the door to receive us, saying,
`I am happy that the mildness of this autumn day
permits this pleasure, to see the mother of the Pisos
beneath
my roof. It is rare nowadays that Rome sees her
abroad.'
`Save to the palace of Aurelian,' replied my mother,
`I now, as is well known, never move beyond the
precincts
of my own dwelling. Since the captivity and
death of your former companion in arms, my great
husband
,
Cneius Piso, the widow's hearth has been my hall
of state, these widow's weeds my only robes. But it
must be more than private grief, and more than the
storms of autumn or of winter, that would keep me back
when it is Aurelian who bids to the feast.'
`We owe you many thanks,' replied the emperor.
`Would that the loyalty of the parents were inherited
by the children;' casting towards me, as he saluted me
at the same time, a look which seemed to say that he
was partly serious if partly in jest. After mutual
inquiries
and salutations, we were soon seated upon
couches beneath a blaze of light which, from the centre
of the apartment, darted its brightness, as it had been
the sun itself, to every part of the room.
`It is no light sorrow to a mother's heart,' said Portia,
`to know that her two sons, and her only sons, are, one
the open enemy of his country, the other  what shall
I term you, Lucius?  an innovator upon her ancient
institutions; and while he believes and calls himself
sincerely, I doubt not  the friend of his country, is in
truth, as every good Roman would say  not an enemy,
my son, I cannot use that word, but as it were  an
unconscious
injurer. Would that the conqueror of the
world had power to conquer this boy's will!'
`Aurelian, mother,' I replied, `did he possess the
power, would hesitate to use it in such a cause. But it
is easy to see that it would demand infinitely more
power to change one honest mind than to subdue even
the world by the sword.'
Aurelian for a brief moment looked as if he had
received
a personal affront.
`How say you,' said he, `demands it more power to
change one mind than conquer a world? Methinks it
VOL. I. 7*
might be done with something less. My soldiers often
maintain with violence a certain opinion; but I find it
not difficult to cause them to let it go, and take mine in
its place. The arguments I use never fail.'
`That may be,' I replied, `in matters of little moment.
Even in these however, is it not plain, Aurelian, that
you cause them not to let go their opinion, but merely
to suppress it, or affect to change it. Your power may
compel them either to silence, or to an assertion of the
very contrary of what they but just before had declared
as their belief, but it cannot alter their minds. That is
to be done by reason only, not by force.'
`By reason first,' answered the emperor; `but if that
fail, then by force. The ignorant, and the
presumptuous
,
and the mischievous, must be dealt with as we deal
with children. If we argue with them, it is a favor.
It is our right, as it is better, to command and compel.'
`Only establish it that such and such are ignorant,
and erroneous, and presumptuous, and I allow that it
would be right to silence them. But that is the very
difficulty in the case. How are we to know that they,
who think differently from ourselves, are ignorant or
erroneous
?
Surely the fact of the difference is not
satisfactory
proof.'
`They,' rejoined Aurelian, `who depart from a certain
standard in art are said to err. The thing in this case
is of no consequence to any, therefore no punishment
ensues. So there is a standard of religion in the state,
and they who depart from it may be said to err. But
as religion is essential to the state, they who err should
be brought back, by whatever application of force, and
compelled to conform to the standard.'
`In what sense,' said Portia, `can common and
ignorant
people be regarded as fit judges of what constitutes
or does not constitute a true religion? It is a subject
level scarce to philosophers. If indeed the gods should
vouchsafe to descend to earth and converse with men,
and in that manner teach some new truth, then any one,
possessed of eyes and ears, might receive it, and retain
it without presumption. Nay, he could not but do so;
but not otherwise.'
`Now have you stated,' said I, `that which constitutes
the precise case of Christianity. They who received
Christianity in the first instance, did it not by balancing
against each other such refined arguments as
philosophers
use. They were simply judges of matters of
fact  of what their eyes beheld and their ears heard.
God did vouchsafe to descend to earth, and by his
messenger
converse with men, and teach new truth. All
that men had then to do was this, to see whether the
evidence
was sufficient that it was a God speaking; and
that being made plain, to listen and record. And at
this day, all that is to be done is to inquire whether the
record be true. If the record be a well-authenticated
one of what the mouth of God spoke, it is then adopted
as the code of religious truth. As for what the word
contains  it requires no acute intellect to judge
concerning
it  a child may understand it all.'
`Truly,' replied Portia, `this agrees but ill with what
I have heard and believed concerning Christianity. It
has ever been set forth as a thing full of darkness and
mystery, which it requires the most vigorous powers to
penetrate and comprehend.'
`So has it been ever presented to me,' added the
emperor
.
`I have conceived it to be but some new form
of Plato's dreams, neither more clear in itself, nor
promising
to be of more use to mankind. So, if I err not,
the learned Porphyrus has stated it.'
`A good fact,' here interposed Julia, `is worth more
in this argument than the learning of the most learned.
Is it not sufficient proof, Aurelian, that Christianity is
somewhat sufficiently plain and easy, that women are
able to receive it so readily? Take me as an
unanswerable
argument on the side of Piso.'
`The women of Palmyra,' replied the emperor, `as I
have good reason to know, are more than the men of
other climes. She who reads Plato and the last essays
of Plotinus, of a morning, seated idly beneath the
shadow of some spreading beech, just as a Roman girl
would the last child's story of Spurius about father
Tiber
and the Milvian Bridge, is not to be received in this
question as but a woman, with a woman's powers of
judgment. When the women of Rome receive their
faith as easily as you do, then may it be held as an
argument
for its simplicity. But let us now break off the
thread of this discourse, too severe for the occasion, and
mingle with our other friends, who by this must be
arrived
.'
So with these words we left the apartment where we
had been sitting, the emperor having upon one side
Portia, and on the other Livia, and moved toward the
great central rooms of the palace, where guests are
entertained
and the imperial banquets held.
The company was not numerous; it was rather
remarkable
for its selectness. Among others not less
distinguished
,
there were the venerable Tacitus, the consul
Capitolinus, Marcellinus the senator, the prefect Varus,
the priest Fronto, the generals Probus and Mucapor,
and a few other of the military favorites of Aurelian.
Of the conversation at supper I remember little or
nothing, only that it was free and light, each seeming to
enjoy himself and the companion who reclined next to
him. Aurelian, with a condescending grace which no
one knows how better to assume than he, urged the
wine upon his friends, as they appeared occasionally to
forget it, offering frequently some new and unheard of
kind, brought from Asia, Greece or Africa, and which
he would exalt to the skies for its flavor. More than
once did he, as he is wont to do in his sporting mood,
deceive us; for, calling upon us to fill our goblets with
what he described as a liquor surpassing all of Italy, and
which might serve for Hebe to pour out for the gods,
and requiring us to drink it off in honor of Bacchus, Pan
or Ceres, we found upon lifting our cups to drain them
that they had been charged with some colored and
perfumed
medicament more sour or bitter than the worst
compound of the apothecary, or than massican
overheated
in the vats. These sallies, coming from the
master of the world, were sure to be well received; his
satellites, of whom not a few were near him, being ready
to die with excess of laughter,  the attendant slaves
catching the jest, and enjoying it with noisy
vociferation
.
I laughed with the rest, for it seems wise to
propitiate
,
by any act not absolutely base, one whose
ambitious
and cruel nature, unless soothed and appeased by
such offerings, is so prone to reveal itself in deeds of
darkness.
When the feast was nearly ended, and the attending
slaves were employed in loading it for the last time
with fruits, olives, and confections, a troop of eunuchs,
richly habited, entered the apartment to the sound of flutes
and horns, bearing upon a platter of gold an immense
bowl or vase of the same metal, filled to the brim with
wine, which they placed in the centre of the table, and
then, at the command of the emperor, with a ladle of
the same precious material and ornamented with gems,
served out the wine to the company. At first, as the
glittering pageant advanced, astonishment kept us mute,
and caused us involuntarily to rise from our couches to
watch the ceremony of introducing it and fixing it in its
appointed place. For never before in Rome had there
been seen, I am sure, a golden vessel of such size, or
wrought with art so marvellous. The language of
wonder
and pleasure was heard, on every side, from every
mouth. Even Livia and Julia, who in Palmyra had
been used to the goblets and wine cups of the eastern
Demetrius, showed amazement not less than the others
at a magnificence and a beauty that surpassed all
experience
and all conception. Just above where the bowl
was placed hung the principal light, by which the table
and the apartment were illuminated, which, falling in
floods upon the wrought or polished gold and the thickly
strewed diamonds, caused it to blaze with a splendor
which the eyes could hardly bear, and, till
accustomed
to it by gazing, prevented us from minutely
examining
the sculptures, which, with lavish profusion
and consummate art, glowed and burned upon the
pedestal
,
the swelling sides, the rim and handles of the
vase, and covered the broad and golden plain upon
which it stood. I happily was near it, being seated
opposite
Aurelian, and on the inner side of the table,
which, as the custom now is, was of the form of a bent
bow, so that I could study at my leisure the histories
and fables that were wrought over its whole surface.
Julia and Livia, being also near it on the other side of
the table, were in the same manner wholly absorbed in
the same agreeable task.
Livia, being quite carried out of herself by this sudden
and unexpected splendor  having evidently no
knowledge
of its approach  like a girl as she still is in her
natural, unpremeditated movements, rose from her couch
and eagerly bent forward toward the vase, the better to
scan its beauties, saying, as she did so,
`The emperor must himself stand answerable for all
breaches of order under circumstances like these. Good
friends, let all who will freely approach, and, leaving for
a moment that of Bacchus, drink at the fountain of
Beauty.' Whereupon, all who were so disposed
gathered
round the centre of the table.
`This,' said Varus, `both for size and the perfect art
lavished upon it, surpasses the glories fabled of the
buckler of Minerva, whose fame has reached us.'
`You say right; it does so,' said the emperor. `That
dish of Vitellius was inferior in workmanship, as it was
less in weight and size than this, which, before you all,
I here name
The Cup
of
Livia
. Let us fill again
from it, and drink to the empress of all the world.'
All sprang in eager haste to comply with a command
that carried with it its own enforcement.
`Whatever,' continued the emperor, when our cups
had been drained, `may have been the condition of art
in other branches of it, in the time of that emperor, there
was no one then whose power over the metals, or whose
knowledge of forms, was comparable with that of our
own Demetrius; for this, be it known, is the sole work
of the Roman  and yet, to speak more truly, it must be
said the Greek  Demetrius, aided by his brother from
the east, who is now with him. Let the music cease;
we need that disturbance no more; and call in the
brothers Demetrius. These are men who honor any
age and any presence.'
The brothers soon entered; and never were princes
or ambassadors greeted with higher honor. All seemed
to contend which should say the most flattering and
agreeable thing. `Slaves,' cried the emperor, `a couch
and cups for the Demetrii.'
The brothers received all this courtesy with the native
ease and dignity which ever accompany true genius.
There was no offensive boldness nor presuming vanity,
but neither was there any shrinking cowardice nor
timidity
.
They felt that they were men not less
distinguished
by the gods than many or most of those in
whose presence they were, and they were sufficient to
themselves. The Roman Demetrius resembles much
his brother of Palmyra, but in both form and
countenance
possesses beauty of a higher order. His look is
contemplative and inward; his countenance pale and yet
dark; his features even and exactly shaped, like a statue;
his hair short and black; his dress, as was that of him
of Palmyra, of the richest stuffs, and showing that wealth
had become their reward as well as fame.
`Let us,' cried the emperor, `in full cups drawn from
the Livian fount, do honor to ourselves, and the arts, by
drinking to the health of Demetrius of Palmyra and
Demetrius
of Rome.' Every cup was filled and drained.
`We owe you thanks,' then added Aurelian, `that you
have completed this great work at the time promised,
though I fear it has been to your own cost, for the
paleness
of your cheeks speaks not of health.'
`The work,' replied the Roman Demetrius, `could not
have been completed but for the timely and effectual aid
of my eastern brother, to whose learned hand, quicker
in its execution than my own, you are indebted for the
greater part of the sculptures upon both the bowl and
dish.'
`It is true, noble emperor,' said the impetuous brother,
`my hand is the quicker of the two, and in some parts of
this work, especially in whatever pertains to the east, and
to the forms of building or of vegetation, or costume seen
chiefly or only there, my knowledge was perhaps more
exact and minute than his; but let it be received, that the
head that could design these forms, and conceive and
arrange these histories, and these graceful ornaments
to my mind more fruitful of genius than all else
observe
you them? have you scanned them all?  belongs
to no other than Demetrius of Rome. In my whole
hand there resides not the skill that is lodged in one of
his fingers  nor in my whole head the power that lies
behind one of his eyes.'
The enthusiasm of the eastern brother called up a
smile upon the faces of all, and a blush upon the white
cheek of the Roman.
`My brother is younger than I,' he said, `and his
blood runs quicker. All that he says, though it be a
picture of the truest heart ever lodged in man, is yet to
VOL. I. 8
be taken with abatement. But for him, this work would
have been far below its present merit. Let me ask you
especially to mark the broad border where is set forth
the late triumph, and ambassadors, captives, and animals
of all parts of the earth, especially of the east, are seen
in their appropriate forms and habits. That is all from
the chisel of my brother. Behold here'  and rising he
approached the vase, and vast as it was, by a touch
so was it constructed  turned it round  `behold here,
where is figured the queen of ' in the enthusiasm of
art he had forgotten for a moment to whom he was
speaking, for at that instant his eye fell upon the
countenance
of Julia, who stood near him, and which he saw
cast down by an uncontrollable grief. He paused,
confused
and grieved  saying, as he turned back the vase,
`Ah me! cruel and indiscreet! Pardon me, noble
ladies
!
and yet I deserve it not.
`Go on, go on, Demetrius,' said Julia, assuming a
cheerful air. `You offend me not. The course of
empire
must have its way; individuals are but emmets in
the path. I am now used to this, believe me. It is for
you rather, and the rest, to forgive in me a sudden
weakness.'
Demetrius, thus commanded, resumed, and then with
minuteness, with much learning and eloquence,
discoursed
successively upon the histories or emblematic
devices of this the chief work of his hands. All were
sorry when he ceased.
`To what you have overlooked,' said Aurelian, as he
paused, `must I call you back, seeing it is that part of
the work which I most esteem, and in which at this
moment I and all, I trust, are most interested  the
sculptures upon the platter; and which represent the
new temple and ceremonies of the dedication, which
tomorrow
we celebrate.'
`Of this,' replied Demetrius, `I said less, because
perhaps
the work is inferior, having been committed, our
time being short, to the hands of a pupil  a pupil,
however
,
I beg to say, who, if the Divine Providence spare
him, will one day, and that not a remote one, cast a
shadow upon his teachers.'
`That will he,' said the brother; `Flaccus is full of
the truest inspiration.'
`But to the dedication  the dedication,' interrupted
the hoarse voice of Fronto.
Demetrius started and shrunk backward a step at
that sound, but instantly recovered himself, and read
into an intelligible language many of the otherwise
obscure
and learned details of the sculpture. As he ended,
the emperor said,
`We thank you, Demetrius, for your learned lecture,
which has given a new value to your work. And now,
while it is in my mind, let me bespeak, as soon as
leisure
and inclination shall serve, a silver statue gilded of
Apollo, for the great altar, which to-morrow will scarce
be graced with such a one as will agree with the temple
and its other ornaments.'
Demetrius, as this was uttered, again started, and his
countenance became of a deadly paleness. He hesitated
a moment, as if studying how to order his words so as to
express least offensively an offensive truth. On the
instant
I suspected what the truth was; but I was wholly
unprepared for it. I had received no intimation of such
a thing.
`Great emperor,' he began, `I am sorry to say  and
yet not sorry  that I cannot now as once labor for the
decoration of the temples and their worship. I am ,
`Ye gods of Rome, ' cried Fronto.
`Peace,' said the emperor, `let him be heard. How
say you?'
`I am now a Christian, and I hold it not lawful to
bestow
my power and skill in the workmanship of gods,
in whom I believe not, and thus become the instrument
of an erroneous faith in others.'
This was uttered firmly but with modesty. The
countenance of the emperor was overclouded for a
moment
.
But it partially cleared up again as he said,
`I lay not, Demetrius, the least constraint upon you.
The four years that I have held this power in Rome,
have been years of freedom to my people in this respect.
Whether I have done well in that for our city and the
empire, many would doubt. I almost doubt myself.'
`That would they, by Hercules,' said the soft voice of
Varus just at my ear, and intended chiefly for me.
`My brother,' said Demetrius, `will be happy to
execute
for the emperor the work which he has been
pleased to ask of me. He remains steadfast in the faith
in which he was reared; the popular faith of Athens.'
`Apollo,' said Demetrius of Palmyra, `is my especial
favorite among all the gods, and of him I have wrought
more statues in silver, gold, or ivory, or of these
variously
and curiously combined, than of all the others. If
I should be honored in this labor, I should request to
adopt the marble image now standing in the baths of
Caracalla, and once, it is said, the chief wonder of Otho's
palace of wonders, as a model after which, with some
deviations, to mould it. I think I could make that that
should satisfy Aurelian and Rome.'
`Do it, do it,' said the emperor, `and let it be seen
that the worshipper of his country's gods is not behind
him who denies them, in his power to do them honor.'
`I shall not sleep,' said the enthusiastic artist, `till I
have made a model in wax at least of what at this
moment
presents itself to my imagination.' Saying which,
with little ceremony  as if the empire depended upon
his reaching on the instant his chalk and wax  and to
the infinite amusement of the company, he rose and
darted from the apartment, the slaves making way as
for a missile that it might be dangerous to obstruct.
`But in what way,' said Aurelian, turning to the elder
Demetrius, `have you been wrought upon to abandon
the time-honored religion of Rome? Methinks the
whole world is becoming of this persuasion.'
`If I may speak freely '
`With utmost freedom,' said Aurelian.
`I may then say that ever since the power to reflect
upon matters so deep and high had been mine, I had
doubted first the truth of the popular religion, and then
soon rejected it, as what brought to me neither comfort
nor hope, and was burdened with things essentially
incredible
and monstrous. For many years, many weary
years  for the mind demands something positive in
this quarter, it cannot remain in suspense, and vacant
I was without belief. Why it was so long before I
turned to the Christians I know not, unless because of
the reports which were so common to their
disadvantage
,
and the danger which has so often attended a
profession
of their faith At length, in a fortunate hour,
VOL. I. 8*
there fell into my hands the sacred books of the
Christians
,
and I needed little besides to show me that theirs
is a true and almighty faith, and that all that is current
in the city to its dishonor is false and calumnious. I
am now happy, not only as an artist and a Roman, but
as a man and an immortal.'
`You speak earnestly,' said Aurelian.
`I feel so,' replied Demetrius, a generous glow
lighting
up his pale countenance.
`Would,' rejoined the emperor, `that some of the zeal
of these Christians might be infused into the sluggish
spirits of our own people. The ancient faith suffers
through neglect, and the prevailing impiety of those who
are its disciples.'
`May it not rather be,' said Fronto, `that the ancient
religion of the state, having so long been neglected by
those who are its appointed guardians, to the extent that
even Judaism and now Christianity  which are but
disguised forms of Atheism  have been allowed to
insinuate
and intrench themselves in the empire  the
gods now in anger turn away from us, who have been
so unfaithful to ourselves, and thus this plausible impiety
is permitted to commit its havocs. I believe the gods
are ever faithful to the faithful.'
`What good citizen, too,' added Varus, `but must
lament
to witness the undermining and supplanting of
those venerable forms under which this universal
empire
has grown to its present height of power? He is
scarcely a Roman who denies the gods of Rome, however
observant he may be of her laws and other institutions.
Religion is her greatest law.'
`These are hard questions,' said the emperor. `For
know you not that some of our noblest, and fairest, and
most beloved, have written themselves followers of this
Gallilean God? How can we deal sharply with a
people
at whose head stands the head of the noble house of
the Pisos, and a princess of the blood of Palmyra?'
Although Aurelian uttered these words in a manner
almost sportive to the careless ear, yet I confess myself
to have discovered at the moment an inward expression
of the countenance and a tone in the voice, which for
the time gave me uneasiness. I was about to speak,
when the venerable Tacitus addressed the emperor and
said,
`I can never think it wise to interfere with violence
in the matter of men's worship. It is impossible, I
believe
,
to compel mankind to receive any one institution
of religion, because different tribes of men, different by
nature and by education, will and do demand, not
the same, but different forms of belief and worship.
Why should they be alike in this, while they separate
so widely in other matters? and can it be a more
hopeful
enterprise to oblige them to submit to the same rules
in their religion, than it would be to compel them to
feed on the same food, and use the same forms of
language
or dress? I know that former emperors have
thought and acted differently. They have deemed it a
possible thing to restore the ancient unity of worship, by
punishing with severity, by destroying the lives even of
such as should dare to think for themselves. But their
conduct is not to be defended, either as right in itself or
best for the state. It has not been true, as policy. For
is it not evident, how oppression of those who believe
themselves to be possessed of truth important to
mankind
,
serves but to bind them the more closely to their
opinions? Are they, for a little suffering, to show
themselves
such cowards as to desert their own convictions,
and prove false to the interests of multitudes? Rather,
say they, let us rejoice in such a cause to bear reproach.
This is the language of our nature. Nay, such persons
come to prize suffering, to make it a matter of pride and
boasting. Their rank among themselves is by and by
determined by the readiness with which they offer
themselves
as sacrifices for truth and God. Are such
persons
to be deterred by threats, or the actual infliction of
punishment?'
`The error has been,' here said the evil-boding
Fronto
,
`that the infliction of punishment went not to the
extent
that is indispensable to the success of such a work.
The noble Piso will excuse me; we are but dealing
with abstractions. Oppress those who are in error only
to a certain degree, not extreme, and it is most true
they cling the closer to their error. We see this in the
punishment of children. Their obstinacy and pride
are increased by a suffering which is slight, and
which seems to say, `I am too timid, weak, or loving,
to inflict more.' So too with our slaves. Whose
slaves ever rose a second time against the master's
authority whose first offence, however slight, was
met, not by words or lashes, but by racks and the
cross?'
`Nay, good Fronto, hold; your zeal for the gods
bears you away beyond the bounds of courtesy.'
`Forgive me then, great sovereign, and you who are
here  if you may; but neither time nor place shall
deter
me, a minister of the great god of light, from
asserting
the principles upon which his worship rests, and, as
I deem, the empire itself. Under Decius, had true
Romans
sat on the tribunals, had no hearts too soft for
such offices turned traitors to the head, had no accursed
spirit of avarice received the bribes which procured
security
to individuals, families, and communities; had
there been no commutations of punishment, then '
`Peace, I say, Fronto; thou marrest the spirit of
the hour. How came we thus again to this point?
Such questions are for the council-room or the senate.
Yet, truth to say, so stirred seems the mind of this
whole people in the matter, that in battle one may as
well escape from the din of clashing arms or the groans
of the dying, as in Rome avoid this argument. Nay,
by my sword, not a voice can I hear, either applauding,
disputing or condemning, since I have set on foot this
new war in the east. Once, the city would have rung
with acclamations that an army was gathering for such an
enterprise. Now, it seems quite forgotten that Valerian
once fell, or that, late though it be, he ought to be
revenged
.
This Jewish and Christian argument fills all
heads, and clamors on every tongue. Come, let us
shake off this dmon in a new cup, and drink deep to
the revenge of Valerian.'
`And of the gods,' ejaculated Fronto, as he lifted the
goblet to his lips.'
`There again?' quickly and sharply demanded
Aurelian
,
bending his dark brows upon the offender.
`Doubtless,' said Portia, `he means well, though over
zealous and rash in speech. His heart I am sure
seconds
not the cruel language of his tongue. So at least
I will believe; and in the meantime hope that the zeal
he has displayed for the ancient religion of our country
may not be without its use upon some present'
glancing
her eye towards me and Julia  `who, with what
I trust will prove a brief truancy, have wandered from
their household gods and the temples of their fathers.'
`May the gods grant it,' added Livia, `and restore
the harmony which should reign in our families and in
the capital. Life is over brief to be passed in quarrel.
Now let us abandon our cups. Sir Christian Piso!
lead me to the gardens, and let the others follow as they
may our good example.'
The gardens we found, as we passed from the palace,
to be most brilliantly illuminated with lamps of every
form and hue. We seemed suddenly to have passed to
another world, so dream-like was the effect of the
multitudinous
lights as they fell with white, red, lurid, or
golden glare upon bush or tree, grotto, statue, or marble
fountain.
`Forget here, Lucius Piso,' said the kind-hearted
Livia, `what you have just heard from the lips of that
harsh bigot, the savage Fronto. Who could have
looked for such madness! Not again, if I possess the
power men say I do, shall he sit at the table of Aurelian.
Poor Julia too! But see! she walks with Tacitus.
Wisdom and mercy are married in him, and both will
shed comfort on her.'
`I cannot but lament,' I replied, `that a creature like
Fronto should have won his way so far into the
confidence
of Aurelian. But I fear him not, and do not
believe
that he will have power to urge the emperor to the
adoption of measures, to which his own wisdom and
native feelings must stand opposed. The rage of such
men as Fronto, and the silent pity and scorn of men
immeasurably
his superiors, we have both now learned to
bear without complaint, though not without some inward
suffering. To be shut out from the hearts of so many
who once ran to meet us on our approach, nor only that,
but to be held by them as impious and atheistical,
monsters
whom the earth is sick of, and whom the gods are
besought to destroy  this is a part of our burden which
we feel to be heaviest. Heaven preserve to us the smiles
and the love of Livia.'
`Doubt not that they will ever be yours. But I trust
that sentiments like those of Tacitus will bear sway in
the councils of Aurelian, and that the present calm will
not be disturbed.'
Thus conversing we wandered on, beguiled by such
talk and the attractive splendors of the garden, till we
found ourselves separated, apparently by some distance,
from our other friends; none passed us and none met
us. We had reached a remote and solitary spot, where
fewer lamps had been hung, and the light was faint and
unequal. Not sorry to be thus alone, we seated
ourselves
on the low pedestal of a group of statuary  once
the favorite resort of the fair and false Terentia  whose
forms could scarcely be defined, and which was
enveloped
at a few paces distant with shrubs and flowers,
forming a thin wall of partition between us and another
walk, corresponding to the one we were in, but winding
away in a different direction. We had sat not long,
either silent or conversing, ere our attention was caught
by the sound of approaching voices apparently in earnest
discourse. A moment and we knew them to be those
of Fronto and Aurelian.
`By the gods his life shall answer it,' said Aurelian
with vehemence, but with suppressed tones; `who but
he was to observe the omens? Was I to know that
to-day
is the Ides and to-morrow the day after? The rites
must be postponed.'
`It were better not, in my judgment,' said Fronto;
`all the other signs are favorable. Never, Papirius
assured
me, did the sacred chickens seize so eagerly the
crumbs. Many times, as he closely watched, did he
observe them  which is rare  drop them from their
mouths overfilled. The times he has exactly recorded.
A rite like this put off, when all Rome is in expectation,
would in the opinion of all the world be of a more
unfavorable
interpretation, than if more than the day were
against us.'
`You counsel well. Let it go on.'
`But to ensure a fortunate event, and propitiate the
gods, I would early, and before the august ceremonies,
offer the most costly and acceptable sacrifice.'
`That were well also. In the prisons there are
captives
of Germany, of Gaul, of Egypt and Palmyra.
Take what and as many as you will. If we ever make
sure of the favor of the gods, it is when we offer freely
that which we hold at the highest price.'
`I would rather they were Christians,' urged Fronto.
`That cannot be,' said Aurelian. `I question if there
be a Christian within the prison walls; and, were there
hundreds, it is not a criminal I would bring to the altar.
I would as soon offer a diseased or ill-shaped bull.'
`But it were an easy matter to seize such as we might
want. Not, O Aurelian, till this accursed race is
exterminated
,
will the heavens smile as formerly upon our
country. Why are the altars thus forsaken? Why are
the temples no longer thronged as once? Why do the
great, and the rich, and the learned, silently withhold
their aid or openly scoff and jeer? Why are our
sanctuaries
crowded only by the scum and refuse of the
city?'
`I know not. Question me not thus.'
`Is not the reason palpable and gross to the dullest
mind? Is it not because of the daily growth of this
blaspheming and atheistical crew, who, by horrid arts,
seduce the young, the timid, and above all the women,
who ever draw the world with them, to join them in
their unhallowed orgies, thus stripping the temples of
their worshippers and dragging the gods themselves
from their seats? Think you the gods look on with
pleasure while their altars and temples are profaned or
abandoned, and a religion that denies them rears itself
upon their ruins?'
`I know not. Say no more.'
`Is it possible religion or the state should prosper,
while he, who is not only Vicegerent of the gods,
Universal
Monarch, but what is more, their sworn Pontifex
Maximus, connives at their existence and
dissemination
'
`Thou liest.'
`Harboring even beneath the imperial roof, and
feasting
at the imperial table, the very heads and chief
ministers
of this black mischief '
`Hold, I say. I swear, by all the gods known and
unknown, that another word, and thy head shall answer
VOL. I. 9
it. Is my soul that of a lamb, that I need this stirring
up to deeds of blood? Am I so lame and backward,
when the gods are to be defended, that I am to be thus
charged? Let the lion sleep when he will; chafed too
much, and he may spring and slay at random. I love
not the Christians, nor any who flout the gods and their
worship  that thou knowest well. But I love Piso,
Aurelia, and the divine Julia  that thou knowest as
well. Now no more.'
`For my life,' said Fronto, `I hold it cheap, if I may
but be faithful to my office and the gods.'
`I believe it, Fronto. The gods will reward thee.
Let us on.'
In the earnestness of their talk they had paused and
stood just before us, being separated but by a thin screen
of shrubs. We continued rooted to our seats while this
conversation went on, held there both by the
impossibility
of withdrawing without observation, and by a
desire to hear  I confess it  what was thus in a
manner
forced upon me, and concerned so nearly, not only
myself, but thousands of my fellow-Christians.
When they were hidden from us by the winding of
the path, we rose and turned toward the palace.
`That savage!' said Livia. `How strange that
Aurelian
,
who knows so well how to subdue the world,
should have so little power to shake off this reptile.'
`There is power enough,' I replied; `but alas! I fear
the will is wanting. Superstition is as deep a principle
in the breast of Aurelian as ambition, and of that Fronto
is the most fitting high-priest. Aurelian places him at
the head of religion in the state for those very qualities,
whose fierce expression has now made us tremble. Let
us hope that the emperor will remain where he now is,
in a position from which it seems Fronto is unable to
dislodge him, and all will go well.'
We soon reached the palace, where, joining Julia and
Portia, our chariot soon bore us to the Clian Hill,
Farewell.
LETTER IV.
FROM PISO TO FAUSTA.
I promised
you, Fausta, before the news should reach
you in any other way, to relate the occurrences and
describe
the ceremonies of the day appointed for the
dedication
of the new Temple of the Sun. The day has
now passed, not without incidents of even painful
interest
to ourselves and therefore to you, and I sit down to
fulfill my engagements.
Vast preparations had been making for the dedication
for many days or even months preceding, and the day
arose upon a city full of expectation of the shows,
ceremonies
and games that were to reward their long and
patient waiting. For the season of the year the day
was hot, unnaturally so; and the sky filled with those
massive clouds, piled like mountains of snow one upon
another, which, while they both please the eye by their
forms and veil the fierce splendors of the sun as they
now and then sail across his face, at the same time
portend
wind and storm. All Rome was early astir. It was
ushered in by the criers traversing the streets and
proclaiming
the rites and spectacles of the day, what they
were and where to be witnessed, followed by troops of
boys imitating in their grotesque way the pompous
declarations of the men of authority, not unfrequently
drawing down upon their heads the curses and the
batons
of the insulted dignitaries. A troop of this sort
passed the windows of the room in which Julia and
I were sitting at our morning meal. As the crier ended
his proclamation and the shouts of the applauding
urchins
died away, Milo, who is our attendant in
preference
to any other and all others, observed,
`That the fellow of a crier deserved to have his
head beat about with his own rod, for coming round
with his news not till after the greatest show of the day
was over.'
`What mean you?' I asked. `Explain.'
`What should I mean,' he replied, `but the morning
sacrifice at the temple.'
`And what so wonderful,' said Julia, `in a morning
sacrifice? The temples are open every morning, are
they not?'
`Yes, truly are they,' rejoined Milo; `but not for
so great a purpose. Curio wished me to have been
there, and says nothing could have been more
propitious
.
They died as the gods love to have them.'
`Was there no bellowing nor struggling, then?' said
Julia.
`Neither, Curio assures me; but they met the knife
of the priest as they would the sword of an enemy on
the field of battle.'
`How say you?' said Julia, quickly, turning pale;
`do I hear aright, Milo, or are you mocking? God
forbid
that you should speak of a human sacrifice.'
`It is even so, mistress. And why should it not be
so? If the favor of the gods, upon whom we all
depend
,
as the priests tell us, is to be purchased so well in
no other way, what is the life of one man or of many in
such a cause? The great Gallienus, when his life had
VOL. I. 9*
been less ordered than usual, after the rules of
temperance
and religion, used to make amends by a few
captives
slain to Jupiter; to which, doubtless, may be
ascribed
his prosperous reign. But, as I was saying,
there was, as Curio informed me, at the market, not
long afterwards, a sacrifice, on the private altar of the
temple, of ten captives. Their blood flowed just as the
great god of the temple showed himself in the horizon.
It would have done you good, Curio said, to see with
what a hearty and dexterous zeal Fronto struck the
knife into their hearts  for to no inferior minister would
he delegate the sacred office.'
`Lucius,' cried Julia, `I thought that such offerings
were now no more. Is it so, that superstition yet
delights
itself in the blood of murdered men?'
`It is just so,' I was obliged to reply. `With a
people
naturally more gentle and humane than we of Rome
this custom would long ago have fallen into disuse.
They would have easily found a way, as all people do,
to conform their religious doctrine and offerings to their
feelings and instincts. But the Romans, by nature and
long training, lovers of blood, their country built upon
the ruins of others and cemented with blood  the taste
for it is not easily eradicated. There are temples where
human sacrifices have never ceased. Laws have
restrained
their frequency  have forbidden them under
heaviest penalties unless permitted by the state  but
these laws ever have been, and are now evaded; and it
is the settled purpose of Fronto and others of his stamp to
restore to them their lost honors, and make them again,
as they used to be, the chief rite in the worship of the
gods. I am not sorry, Julia, that your doubts, though so
painfully, have yet been so effectually removed.'
Julia had for some time blamed as over-ardent the
zeal of the Christians. She had thought that the evil of
the existing superstitions was over-estimated and that it
were wiser to pursue a course of more moderation; that
a system that nourished such virtues as she found in
Portia, in Tacitus, and others like them, could not be so
corrupting in its power as the Christians were in the
habit of representing it; that if we could succeed in
substituting
Christianity quietly, without alienating the
affections or shocking too violently the prejudices of the
believers in the prevailing superstitions, our gain would
be double. To this mode of arguing I knew she was
impelled by her love and almost reverence of Portia; and
how could I blame it, springing from such a cause? I
had, almost criminally, allowed her to blind herself in a
way she never would have done had her strong mind
acted, as on other subjects, untramelled and free. I was
not sorry that Milo had brought before her mind a fact
which, however revolting in its horror to such a nature
as hers, could not but heal while it wounded.
`Milo,' said Julia, as I ended, `say now that you have
been jesting; that this is a piece of wit with which you
would begin in a suitable way an extraordinary day;
this is one of your Gallienus fictions.'
`Before the gods, if never before,' replied Milo, `I
have told you the naked truth. But not the whole
for Curio left me not till he had shown how each had
died. Of the ten, but three, he averred, resisted, or died
unwillingly. The three were Germans from beyond
the Danube  brothers, he said, who had long lain in
prison till their bones were ready to start through the
skin. Yet were they not ready to die. It seemed as if
there were something they longed  more even than
for life or freedom  to say; but they might as well
have been dumb and tongueless, for none understood
their barbarous jargon. When they found that their
words were in vain, they wrung their hands in their wo,
and cried out aloud in their agony. Then, however, at
the stern voice of Fronto warning them of the hour,
they ceased  embraced each other, and received the
fatal
blow; the others signified their pleasure at dying
so rather than to be thrown to wild beasts or left to die
by slow degrees within their dungeon's walls. Two
rejoiced that it was their fate to pour out their blood
upon the altar of a god, and knelt devoutly before the
uplifted knife of Fronto. Never, said Curio, was there
a more fortunate offering. Aurelian heard the report of
it with lively joy, and said that `now all would go well.'
Curio is a good friend of mine; will it please you to
hear these things from his own lips?'
`No,' said Julia; `I would hear no more. I have
heard more than enough. How needful, Lucius, if
these things are so, that our Christian zeal abate not!
I see that this stern and bloody superstition requires that
they who would deal with it must carry their lives in
their hand, ready to part with nothing so easily, if by so
doing they can hew away one of the branches or tear
up one of the roots of this ancient and pernicious error.
I blame not Probus longer  no, nor the wild rage of
Macer.'
`Two, lady, of the captives were of Palmyra; the
queen's name and yours were last upon their lips.'
`Great God! how retribution like a dark pursuing
shadow hangs upon the steps of guilt. Even here it
seeks us. Alas, my mother! Heaven grant that these
things fall not upon your ears!'
Julia was greatly moved, and sat a long time silent,
her face buried in her hands, and weeping. I motioned
to Milo to withdraw and say no more. Upon Julia,
although
so innocent of all wrong  guiltless as an infant
of the blame, whatever it may be, which the world fixes
upon Zenobia  yet upon her as heavily as upon her
great mother fall the sorrows which sooner or later
overtake
those who for any purpose, in whatever degree
selfish, have involved their fellow-creatures in useless
suffering. Being part of the royal house, Julia feels
that she must bear her portion of its burdens. Time
alone can cure this grief.
But you are waiting with a woman's impatient
curiosity
to hear of the dedication.
At the appointed hour we were at the palace of
Aurelian
on the Palatine, where a procession, pompous as
art and rank and numbers could make it, was formed, to
move thence by a winding and distant route to the
temple
near the foot of the Quirinal. Julia repaired with
Portia to a place of observation near the temple  I to
the palace to join the company of the emperor. Of the
gorgeous magnificence of the procession I shall tell you
nothing. It was in extent and variety of pomp and
costliness
of decoration, a copy of that of the late triumph,
and went even beyond the captivating splendor of the
example. Roman music  which is not that of
Palmyra
lent such charms as it could to our passage
through the streets to the temple, from a thousand
performers
.
As we drew near to the lofty fabric, I thought that
no scene of such various beauty and magnificence had
ever met my eye. The temple itself is a work of
unrivaled
art. In size it surpasses any other building of
the same kind in Rome, and for the excellence of
workmanship
and purity of design, although it may fall below
the standard of Hadrian's age, yet for a certain air of
grandeur and luxuriance of invention in its details, and
lavish profusion of embellishment in gold and silver, no
temple nor other edifice of any preceding age ever
perhaps
resembled it. Its order is the Corinthian, of the
Roman form, and the entire building is surrounded by
its slender columns, each composed of a single piece of
marble. Upon the front is wrought Apollo surrounded
by the Hours. The western extremity is approached by
a flight of steps of the same breadth as the temple itself.
At the eastern there extends beyond the walls to a
distance
equal to the length of the building a marble
platform
,
upon which stands the altar of sacrifice, and which
is ascended by various flights of steps, some little more
than a gently rising plain, up which the beasts are led
that are destined to the altar.
When this vast extent of wall and column of the most
dazzling brightness came into view, everywhere covered,
together with the surrounding temples, palaces and
theatres
,
with a dense mass of human beings, of all climes
and regions, dressed out in their richest attire  music
from innumerable instruments filling the heavens with
harmony  shouts of the proud and excited populace
every few moments and from different points, as
Aurelian
advanced, shaking the air with its thrilling din
the neighing of horses, the frequent blasts of the
trumpet
the whole made more solemnly imposing by the
vast masses of cloud which swept over the sky, now
suddenly unveiling and again eclipsing the sun, the great
god of this idolatry, and from which few could withdraw
their gaze;  when at once this all broke upon my eye
and ear, I was like a child who before had never seen
aught but his own village and his own rural temple, in
the effect wrought upon me, and the passiveness with
which I abandoned myself to the sway of the senses.
Not one there was more ravished by the outward
circumstance
and show. I thought of Rome's thousand
years, of her power, her greatness and universal empire,
and for a moment my step was not less proud than that
of Aurelian. But after that moment  when the senses
had had their fill, when the eye had seen the glory, and
the ear had fed upon the harmony and the praise, then I
thought and felt very differently; sorrow and
compassion
for these gay multitudes were at my heart;
prophetic
forebodings of disaster, danger, and ruin to those
to whose sacred cause I had linked myself, made my
tongue to falter in its speech and my limbs to tremble.
I thought that the superstition that was upheld by the
wealth and the power, whose manifestations were before
me, had its roots in the very centre of the earth  far
too deep down for a few like myself ever to reach them.
I was like one whose last hope of life and escape is
suddenly
struck away.
I was roused from these meditations by our arrival at
the eastern front of the temple. Between the two
central
columns, on a throne of gold and ivory, sat the
emperor
of the world, surrounded by the senate, the colleges
of augurs and haruspices, and by the priests of the various
temples of the capital, all in their peculiar costume.
Then Fronto, the priest of the temple, when the crier
had proclaimed that the hour of worship and sacrifice
had come, and had commanded silence to be observed
standing at the altar, glittering in his white and golden
robes like a messenger of light  bared his head, and
lifting his face up toward the sun, offered in clear and
sounding tones the prayer of dedication. As he came
toward the close of his prayer, he, as is so usual, with
loud and almost frantic cries and importunate repetition,
called upon the god to hear him, and then with
appropriate
names and praises invoked the Father of gods
and men to be present and hear. Just as he had thus
solemnly invoked Jupiter by name, and was about to
call upon the other gods in the same manner, the clouds,
which had been deepening and darkening, suddenly
obscured
the sun; a distant peal of thunder rolled along
the heavens, and at the same moment from the dark
recesses
of the temple a voice of preternatural power came
forth, proclaiming so that the whole multitude heard the
words  `God is but one; the king eternal, immortal,
invisible.' It is impossible to describe the horror that
seized those multitudes. Many cried out with fear, and
each seemed to shrink behind the other. Paleness sat
upon every face. The priest paused as if struck by a
power from above. Even the brazen Fronto was
appalled
.
Aurelian leaped from his seat, and by his
countenance
,
white and awe-struck, showed that to him it
came as a voice from the gods. He spoke not, but stood
gazing at the dark entrance into the temple from which
the sound had come. Fronto hastily approached him,
and whispering but one word as it were into his ear,
the emperor started; the spell that bound him was
dissolved
;
and recovering himself  making indeed as
though a very different feeling had possessed him
cried out in fierce tones to his guards,
`Search the temple; some miscreant hid away among
the columns profanes thus the worship and the place.
Seize him and drag him forth to instant death.'
The guards of the emperor and the servants of the
temple rushed in at that bidding, and searched in every
part the interior of the building. They soon emerged,
saying that the search was fruitless. The temple in all
its aisles and apartments was empty.
The ceremonies, quiet being again restored, then went
on. Twelve bulls, of purest white and of perfect forms,
their horns bound about with fillets, were now led by
the servants of the temple up the marble steps to the
front of the altar, where stood the cultrarii and
haruspices
,
ready to slay them and examine their entrails.
The omens as gathered by the eyes of all from the fierce
strugglings and bellowings of the animals as they were
led toward the place of sacrifice  some even escaping
from the hands of those who had the management of
them  and from the violent and convulsive throes of
others as the blow fell upon their heads, or the knife
severed their throats, were of the darkest character, and
brought a deep gloom upon the brow of the emperor.
The report of the haruspices upon examination of the
entrails was little calculated to remove that gloom. It
VOL. I. 10
was for the most part unfavorable. Especially appalling
was the sight of a heart so lean and withered that it
scarce seemed possible it should ever have formed a part
of a living animal. But more harrowing than all was
the voice of Fronto, who prying with the haruspices
into the smoking carcass of one of the slaughtered bulls,
suddenly cried out with horror that `no heart was to be
found.'
The emperor, hardly to be restrained by those near
him from some expression of anger, ordered a more
diligent
search to be made.
`It is not in nature that such a thing should be,' he
said. `Men are, in truth, sometimes without hearts;
but brutes, as I think, never.'
The report was however confidently confirmed.
Fronto
himself approached, and said that his eye had from
the first been upon the beast, and the exact truth had
been stated.
The carcasses, such parts as were for the flames,
were then laid upon the vast altar, and the flames of the
sacrifice ascended.
The heavens were again obscured by thick clouds,
which accumulating into dark masses began now nearer
and nearer to shoot forth lightning and roll their
thunders
.
The priest commenced the last office, prayer to
the god to whom the new temple had been thus
solemnly
consecrated. He again bowed his head, and
again lifted up his voice. But no sooner had he
invoked
the god of the temple and besought his ear, than
again from its dark interior the same awful sounds
issued
forth, this time saying `Thy gods, O Rome, are
false and lying gods. God is but one.'
Aurelian, pale as it seemed to me with superstitious
fear, strove to shake it off, giving it artfully and with
violence the appearance of offended dignity. His voice
was a shriek rather than a human utterance, as he cried
out,
`This is but a Christian device; search the temple till
the accursed Nazarene be found, and hew him
piecemeal
' more he would have said, but at the instant a
bolt of lightning shot from the heavens, and lighting
upon a large sycamore which shaded a part of the
temple
court, clove it in twain. The swollen cloud at the
same moment burst, and a deluge of rain poured upon
the city, the temple, the gazing multitudes, and the just
kindled altars. The sacred fires went out in hissing
and darkness; a tempest of wind whirled the limbs of
the slaughtered victims into the air, and abroad over the
neighboring streets. All was confusion, uproar, terror
and dismay. The crowds sought safety in the houses
of the nearest inhabitants, and the porches and of the
palaces. Aurelian and the senators, and those nearest
him, fled to the interior of the temple. The heavens
blazed with the quick flashing of the lightning, and
the temple itself seemed to rock beneath the voice
of the thunder. I never knew in Rome so terrific a
tempest. The stoutest trembled, for life hung by a
thread. Great numbers, it has now been found, in
every part of the capitol, fell a prey to the fiery bolts.
The capitol itself was struck, and the brass statue of
Vespasian in the forum thrown down and partly melted.
The Tiber in a few hours overran its banks, and laid
much of the city on its borders under water.
But ere long the storm was over. The retreating
clouds, but still sullenly muttering in the distance as
they rolled away, were gaily lighted up by the sun,
which again shone forth in his splendor. The scattered
limbs of the victims were collected and again laid upon
the altar. Dry wood being brought, the flames quickly
shot upward and consumed to the last joint and bone
the sacred offerings. Fronto once more stood before the
altar, and now uninterrupted performed the last office of
the ceremony. Then around the tables spread within
the temple to the honor of the gods, feasting upon the
luxuries contributed by every quarter of the earth, and
filling high with wine, the adverse omens of the day
were by most forgotten. But not by Aurelian. No
smile was seen to light up his dark countenance. The
jests of Varus and the wisdom of Porphyrius alike failed
to reach him. Wrapped up in his own thoughts, he
brooded gloomily over what had happened, and strove
to read the interpretation of portents so unusual and
alarming.
I went not in to the feast, but returned home
reflecting
as I went upon the events I had witnessed. I knew
not what to think. That in times past, long after the
departure from the earth of Jesus and his immediate
followers
,
the Deity had interposed in seasons of peculiar
perplexity to the church, and in a way to be observed
had manifested his power, I did not doubt. But for a
long time such revelations had wholly ceased. And I
could not see any such features in the present juncture,
as would, to speak as a man, justify and vindicate a
departure
from the ordinary methods of the Divine
Providence
.
But then on the other hand I could not
otherwise
account for the voice, nor discover any way in
which, had one been so disposed, he could so successfully
and securely have accomplished his work. Revolving
these things, and perplexed by doubts, I reached the
Clian  when, as I entered my dwelling, I found to my
great satisfaction, Probus seated with Julia, who at an
early period foreseeing the tempest had with Portia
withdrawn
to the security of her own roof.
`I am glad you are come at length,' said Julia as I
entered, `our friend has scarce spoken. I should think,
did I not know the contrary, that he had suddenly
abandoned
the service of truth and become a disciple of
Novatus. He hath done little but groan and sigh.'
`Surely,' I replied, `the occasion warrants both sighs
and groans. But when came you from the temple?'
`On the appearance of the storm, just as Fronto
approached
the altar the first time. The signs were not
to be mistaken by any who were not so much engrossed
by the scene as to be insensible to all else, that a tempest
was in the sky, and would soon break upon the crowds
in a deluge of rain and hail  as has happened. So
that warning Portia of the danger, we early retreated
she with reluctance  but for myself. I was glad to be
driven away from a scene that brought so vividly before
me the events of the early morning.'
`I am glad it was so,' I replied; `you would have been
more severely tried, had you remained.' And I then
gave an account of the occurrences of the day.
`I know not what to make of it,' she said as I ended.
`Probus, teach us what to think. I am bewildered and
amazed.'
`Lady,' said Probus, `the Christian service is a hard
one.'
`I have not found it so, thus far, but on the other hand
a light and easy one.'
VOL. I. 10*
`But the way is not ever so smooth, and the path
once entered upon, there is no retreat.'
`No roughness nor peril, Probus, be they what they
may, can ever shake me. It is for eternity I have
embraced
this faith, not for time  for my soul, not for my
body.'
`God be thanked that it is so. But the evils and
sorrows
that time has in store, and which afflict the body,
are not slight. And sometimes they burst forth from
the overburdened clouds in terrific violence, and poor
human strength sinks and trembles, as to-day before the
conflict of the elements.'
`They would find me strong in spirit and purpose, I
am sure, Probus, however my woman's frame of flesh
might yield. No fear can change my mind, nor tear me
from the hopes which through Christ I cherish more, a
thousand fold, than this life of an hour.'
`Why, why is it so ordained in the Providence of
God,' said Probus, `that truth must needs be watered
with tears and blood, ere it will grow and bear fruit?
When as now the sky is dark and threatening, and the
mind is thronged with fearful anticipations of the sorrows
that await those who hold this faith, how can I with a
human heart within me labor to convert the
unbelieving
?
The words falter upon my tongue. I turn from
the young inquirer, and with some poor reason put him
off to another season. When I preach, it is with a
coldness
that must repel, and it is that which I almost desire
to be the effect. My prayers never reach heaven nor
the consciences of those who hear. Probus, they say, is
growing worldly. His heart burns no longer within
him. His zeal is cold. We must look to Macer. I
fear, lady, that the reproaches are well deserved. Not
that I am growing worldly or cold, but that my human
affections lead me away from duty, and make me a
traitor
to truth and my master.'
`O no, Probus,' said Julia; `these are charges
foolish
and false. There is not a Christian in Rome but
would say so. We all rest upon you.'
`Then upon what a broken reed! I am glad it was
not I who made you a Christian.'
`Do you grieve to have been a benefactor? a
redeemer
?
a savior?'
`Almost, when I see the evils which are to overwhelm
the believer. I look round upon my little flock of
hearers
,
and I seem to see them led as lambs to the
slaughter
poor, defenceless creatures, set upon by worse than
lions and wolves. And you, lady of Piso, how can I
sincerely rejoice that you have added your great name
to our humble roll, when I think of what may await
you. Is that form to be dragged with violence amid
the hootings of the populace to the tribunal of the beast
Varus? Are those limbs for the rack or the fire?'
`I trust in God they are not, Probus. But if they
are needed, they are little to give for that which has
made me so rich and given wings to the soul. I can
spare the body, now that the soul can live without it.'
`There spoke the universal Christian! What but
truth could so change our poor human nature into
somewhat
quite divine and godlike! Think not I shrink
myself
at the prospect of obstruction and assault. I am a
man loose upon the world, weaned by suffering and
misfortune from earth, and ready at any hour to depart
from it. You know my early story. But I in vain
seek to steel myself to the pains of others. I can bear,
but I cannot behold. But from what I have said, I fear
lest you should think me over-apprehensive. I wish
it were so. But all seems at this moment to be
against us.'
`More then,' said Julia, `must have come to your
ears than to ours. When last we sat with the emperor
at his table, he seemed well inclined. And when urged
by Fronto, rebuked him even with violence.'
`Yes, it was so.'
`Is it then from the scenes of to-day at the temple
that you draw fresh omens of misfortune? I have
asked you what we should think of them.'
`I almost tremble to say. I stood, Piso, not far from
you, upon the lower flight of steps, where I think you
observed me.'
`I did. And at the sound of that voice from the
temple
,
methought your face was paler than Aurelian's.
Why was that?'
`Because, Piso, I knew the voice.'
`Knew it! What mean you?'
`Repeat it not  let it sink into your ear and there
abide. It was Macer's.'
`Macer's? Surely you jest.'
`Alas! I wish it were a jest. But his tones were no
more to be mistaken than were the thunder's.'
`This, should it be known, would, it is plain to see,
greatly exasperate Aurelian. It would be more than
enough for Fronto to work his worst ends with. His
suspicions at once fell upon the Christians.'
`That,' said Probus, `was, I am confident, an artifice.
The countenance struck with superstitious horror, is
not to be read amiss. Seen though but for a moment,
and the signature is upon it, one and unequivocal. But
with quick instinct the wily priest saw his advantage,
seized it, and, whether believing or not himself, succeeded
in poisoning the mind of Aurelian and that of the
multitude
.
So great was the commotion among the
populace
,
that, but for the tempest, I believe scarce would
the legions of the emperor have saved us from slaughter
upon the spot. Honest, misguided Macer  little dost
thou know how deep a wound thou hast struck into the
very dearest life of the truth for which thou wouldst yet
at any moment thyself freely suffer and die!'
`What,' said Julia, `could have moved him to such
madness?'
`With him,' replied Probus, `it was a deed of piety
and genuine zeal for God; he saw it in the light of an
act god-like and god-directed. Could you read his
heart you would find it calm and serene in the
consciousness
of a great duty greatly performed. It is
very possible he may have felt himself to be but an
instrument
in the hand of a higher power, to whom he
gives all the glory and the praise. There are many
like him, lady, both among Christians and Pagans.
The sybils impose not so much upon others as upon
themselves. They who give forth the responses of the
oracle, oft-times believe that they are in very truth full
of the god, and speak not their own thoughts, but the
inspirations
of him whose priests they are. To
themselves
more than to others are they impostors. The
conceit
of the peculiar favor of God or of the gods in return
for extraordinary devotion, is a weakness that besets our
nature wherever it is found. An apostle perhaps never
believed in his inspiration more firmly than at times does
Macer, and others among us like him. But this
inward
solitary persuasion we know is nothing, however
it may carry away captive the undiscriminating
multitude
.'
`Hence, Probus, then I suppose the need of some
outward
act of an extraordinary nature to show the
inspiration
real.'
`Yes,' he replied. `No assertion of divine impulses
or revelations can avail to persuade us of their reality,
except supported and confirmed by miracle. That, and
that only, proves the present God. Christ would have
died without followers had he exhibited to the world
only his character and his truth, even though he had
claimed, and claimed truly, a descent from and
communion
with the Deity. Men would have said, `This
is an old and common story. We see every day and
everywhere those who affect divine aid. No act is so
easy as to deceive one's self. If you propose a spiritual
moral system and claim for it a divine authority, show
your authority by a divine work, a work impossible to
man, and we will then admit your claims. But your
own inward convictions alone, sincere as they may be
and possibly founded in truth, pass with us for nothing.
Raise one that was dead to life, and we will believe you
when you reveal to us the spiritual world and the life
to come.'
`I think,' said Julia, `such would be the process in
my own mind. There seems the same natural and
necessary connection here between spiritual truths and
outward acts, as between the forms of letters or the sound
of words, and ideas. We receive the most subtle of
Plato's reasonings through words  those miracles of
material help  which address themselves to the eye or
ear. So we receive the truths of Jesus through the
eye witnessing his works or the ear hearing the voice
from Heaven.  But we wander from Macer, in whom,
from what you have told us and Piso has known, we
both feel deeply interested. Can he not be drawn away
from these fancies which possess him? 'T is a pity we
should lose so strong an advocate, to some minds so
resistless
,
nor only that, but suffer injury from his
extravagance
.'
`It is our purpose,' I replied, `to visit him to try what
effect earnest remonstrance and appeal may have. Soon
as I shall return from my promised and now necessary
visit to Marcus and Lucilia, I shall not fail, Probus, to
request you to accompany me to his dwelling.'
`Does he dwell far from us?' asked Julia.
`His house, if house it may be called,' replied Probus,
`is in a narrow street, which runs just behind the shop
of Demetrius, midway between the Capitol and the
Quirinal. It is easily found by first passing the shop
and then descending quick to the left  the street
Janus
,
our friend Isaac's street, turning off at the same
point to the right. At Macer's, should your feet ever
be drawn that way, you would see how and in what
crowded space the poor live in Rome.'
`Has he then a family, as your words seem to
imply?'
`He has; and one more lovely dwells not within the
walls of Rome. In his wife and elder children, as I
have informed Piso, we shall find warm and eloquent
advocates on our side. They tremble for their husband
and father, whom they reverence and love, knowing his
impetuosity, his fearlessness and his zeal. Many an
assault
has he already brought upon himself, and is
destined I fear to draw down many more and heavier.'
`Heaven shield them all from harm,' said Julia. `Are
they known to Demetrius? His is a benevolent heart,
and he would rejoice to do them a service. No one is
better known too or respected than the Roman
Demetrius
:
his name merely would be a protection.'
`It was from Macer,' replied Probus, `that Demetrius
first heard the truth which now holds him captive.
Their near neighborhood brought them often together.
Demetrius was impressed by the ardor and evident
sincerity
so visible in the conversation and manners of
Macer; and Macer was drawn toward Demetrius by
the cast of melancholy  that sober, thoughtful air
that separates him so from his mercurial brother, and
indeed from all. He wished he were a Christian.
And by happy accidents being thrown together  or
rather drawn by some secret bond of attraction  he in
no long time had the happiness to see him one. From
the hand of Felix he received the waters of baptism.'
`What you have said, Probus, gives me great
pleasure
.
I am not only now sure that Macer and his little
tribe have a friend at hand, but the knowledge that such
a mind as that of Demetrius has been wrought upon
by Macer, has served to raise him in my esteem and
respect. He can be no common man, and surely no
madman.'
`The world ever loves to charge those as mad,' said
Probus, `who in devotion to a great cause exceed its
cold standard of moderation. Singular, that excess in
virtue should incur this reproach, while excess in vice
is held but as a weakness of our nature!'
We were here interrupted by Milo, who came to
conduct
us to the supper room; and there our friendly talk
was prolonged far into the evening.
When I next write I shall have somewhat to say of
Marcus Lucilia and the little Gallus. How noble and
generous in the queen, her magnificent gift! When
summer comes round again I shall not fail together with
Julia to see you there. How many recollections will
come thronging upon me when I shall again find myself
in the court of the Elephant sitting where I once sat so
often and listened to the voice of Longinus. May you
see there many happy years. Farewell.
Nothing could exceed the sensation caused in Rome
by the voice heard at the dedication, and among the
adherents
of the popular faith, by the unlucky omens of
the day and of the sacrifice. My office at that time
called me often to the capital, and to the palace of
Aurerelian
,
and threw me frequently into his company and
that of Livia. My presence was little heeded by the
emperor, who, of a bold and manly temper, spoke out
with little reserve and with no disguise or fear, whatever
sentiments possessed him. From such opportunities and
from communications of Menestheus the secretary of
Aurelian, little took place at the palace which came not
to my knowledge. The morning succeeding the
dedication
I had come to the city bringing a packet from the
queen to the empress Livia. While I waited in the
common reception room of the palace, Itook from a
VOL. I. 11
case standing there, a roll and read. As I read, I
presently
was roused by the sound of Aurelian's voice. It
was as if engaged in earnest conversation. He soon
entered the apartment accompanied by the priest of the
new temple.
`There is something,' he said as he drew near, `in
this combination of unlucky signs that might appal a
stouter spirit than mine. This too, after a munificence
toward not one only but all the temples, never I am sure
surpassed. Every god has been propitiated by gifts and
appropriate rites. How can all this be interpreted other
than most darkly  other than as a general hostility
and a discouragement from an enterprise upon which I
would found my glory. This has come most unlooked
for. I confess myself perplexed. I have openly
proclaimed
my purpose  the word has gone abroad and
travelled by this to the court of Persia itself, that with
all Rome at my back I am once more to tempt the
deserts
of the East.'
He here suddenly paused, being reminded by Fronto
of my presence.
`Ah, it matters not;' he said; `this is but
Nichomachus
,
the good servant of the queen of Palmyra. I
hope,' he said turning to me, `that the queen is well and
the young Faustula?'
`They are well,' I replied.
`How agree with her these coo'er airs of the west?
These are not the breezes of Arabia, that come to-day
from the mountains.'
`She heeds them little,' I replied, `her thoughts are
engrossed by heavier cares.'
`They must be fewer now than ever.'
`They are fewer, but they are heavier and weigh upon
her life more than the whole East once did. The
remembrance
of a single great disaster weights as a heavier
burden than the successful management of an empire.'
`True, Nichomachus, that is over true.' Then
without
further regarding me he went on with his
conversation
with Fronto.
`I cannot,' he said, `now go back; and to go forward
may be presumptuous.'
`I cannot but believe, great emperor,' said Fronto,
`that I have it in my power to resolve your doubts, and
set your mind at ease.'
`Rest not then,' said Aurelian with impatience  `but
say on.'
`You sought the gods and read the omens with but
one prayer and thought. And you have construed them
as all bearing upon one point and having one
significancy
because you have looked in no other direction. I
believe they bear upon a different point, and that when
you look behind and before, you will be of the same
judgment.'
`Whither tends all this?'
`To this  that the omens of the day bear not upon
your eastern expedition, but upon the new religion!
You are warned as the great high priest, by these signs
in heaven and on earth  not against this projected
expedition
,
which is an act of piety, if a warlike expedition
ever may be termed so  but against this accursed
superstition
which is working its way into the empire and
threatening the extermination and overthrow of the very
altars on which you laid your costly offerings. What
concern can the divinities feel in the array of an army
compared with that which must agitate their sacred
breasts as they behold their altars cast down or forsaken,
their names profaned, their very being denied, their
worshippers drawn from them to the secret midnight
orgies of a tribe of Atheists, whose aim is anarchy in the
state and in religion; owning neither king on earth nor
king in heaven  every man to be his own priest
every
man his own master! Is not this the likeliest
reading
of the omens?'
`I confess, Fronto,' the emperor replied, the cloud
upon his brow clearing away as he spoke, `that what
you say possesses likelihood. I believe I have
interpreted
according to my fears. It is as you say  the
East only has been in my thoughts. It cannot in reason
be thought to be this enterprize, which as you have said
is an act of piety, all Rome would judge it so  against
which the heavens have thus arrayed themselves.
Fronto! Fronto! I am another man! Slave,' cried he
aloud to one of the menials as he passed, `let Mucapor
be instantly summoned. Let there be no delay. Now
can my affairs be set on with something more of speed.
When the gods smile mountains sink to mole-hills. A
divine energy runs in the current of the blood and lends
more than mortal force to the arm and the will.'
As he spoke, never did so malignant a joy light up
the human countenance as was to be seen in the face of
Fronto.
`And what then,' he hastily put in as the
emperor
paused, `what shall be done with these profane
wretches?'
`The Christians! They must be seen to. I will
consider
.
Now, Fronto, shall I fill to the brim the cup of
human glory. Now shall Rome by me vindicate her
lost honor and wipe off the foulest stain that since the
time of Romulus has darkened her annals.'
`You will do yourself and the empire immortal honor.
If danger ever threatened the very existence of the state
it is now from the secret machinations of this
god-denying
tribe.'
`I spake of the East and of Valerian, Fronto. Syria
is now Rome's. Palmyra, that mushroom of a day, is
level with the ground. Her life is out. She will be
hereafter known but by the fame of her past greatness,
of her matchless queen, and the glory of the victories
that crowned the arms of Aurelian. What now remains
but Persia?'
`The Christians,' said the priest, shortly and bitterly.
`You are right, Fronto; the omens are not to be read
otherwise. It is against them they point. It shall be
maturely weighed what shall be done. When Persia
is swept from the field and Ctesiphon lies as low as
Palmyra, then will I restore the honor of the gods, and
let who will dare to worship other than as I shall
ordain
!
Whoever worships them not, or other than them,
shall die.'
`In that spoke the chief minister of religion  the
representative
of the gods. The piety of Aurelian is in
the mouths of men not less than his glory. The city
resounds with the praise of him who has enriched
the temples, erected new ones, made new provision for
the priesthood, and fed the poor. This is the best
greatness
.
Posterity will rather honor and remember him
who saved them their faith, than him who gained a
Persian
victory. The victory for Religion too is to be had
VOL. I. 11*
without cost, without a step taken from the palace gate,
or from the side of her who is alike Aurelian's and the
empire's boast.'
`Nay, nay, Fronto, you are over-zealous. This
eastern
purpose admits not of delay. Hormisdas is new in
his power. The people are restless and divided. The
present is the moment of success. It cannot bear delay.
To-morrow, could it be so, would I start for Thrace.
The heavens are propitious. They frown no longer.'
`The likliest way methinks,' replied the priest, `to
insure
success and the continued favor of the gods in that
which they do not forbid, were first to fulfill their
commands
in what they have enjoined.'
`That, Fronto, cannot be denied. It is of weight.
But where of two commands both seem alike urgent,
and both cannot be done at once, whether we will or
not, we must choose, and in choosing we may err.'
`To an impartial, pious mind, O emperor, the god of
thy worship never shone more clear in the heavens
than shines his will in the terrific signs of yesterday.
Forgive thy servant, but drawn as thou art by the
image
of fresh laurels of victory to be bound about thy
brow, of the rich spoils of Persia, of its mighty
monarch
at thy chariot wheels, and the long line of a new
triumph sweeping through the gates and the great
heart of the capital,  and thou art blind to the will of
the gods, though writ in the dread convulsions of the
elements and the unerring language of the slaughtered
victims.'
`Both may be done  both, Fronto. I blame not
your zeal. Your freedom pleases me. Religion is thus,
I know, in good hands. But both I say may be done.
The care of the empire in this its other part may be
left to thee and Varus, with full powers to see that the
state in the matter of its faith receives no harm. Your
knowledge in this, if not your zeal, is more than mine.
While I meet the enemies of Rome abroad, you shall
be my other self and gain other victories at home.'
`Little, I fear, Aurelian, could be done even by me
and Varus leagued, with full delegated powers, opposed
as we should be by Tacitus and the senate and the best
half of Rome. None but an arm omnipotent as thine
can crush this mischief. I see thou knowest not how
deep it has struck nor how wide it has spread. The
very foundations of the throne and the empire are
undermined
.
The poison of Christian atheism has
infected
the whole mind of the people, not only
throughout
Rome, but Italy, Gaul, Africa, and Asia. And for
this we have to thank whom? Whom but ourselves?
Ever since Hadrian  otherwise a patriot king  built
his imageless temples, in imitation of this barren and
lifeless worship; ever since the weak Alexander and
his superstitious mother filled the imperial palace with
their statues of Christ, with preachers and teachers of
his religion; ever since the Philips openly and without
shame professed his faith; ever, I say, since these
great examples have been before the world, has the
ancient
religion declined its head, and the new stalked
proudly by. Let not Aurelian's name be added to this
fatal list. Let him first secure the honor of the gods
then, and not till then, seek his own.'
`You urge with warmth, Fronto, and with reason too.
Your words are not wasted; they have fallen where
they shall be deeply pondered. In the meantime I will
wait for the judgment of the augurs and haruspices;
and as the colleges report, will hold myself bound so
to act.'
So they conversed, and then passed on. I was at
that time but little conversant with the religious
condition
of the empire. I knew but little of the character of
the prevailing faith and the Pagan priesthood; and I
knew less of the new religion as it was termed. But
the instincts of my heart were from the gods, and they
were all for humanity. I loved man, whoever he was
and of whatever name or faith; and I sickened at
cruelties
perpetrated against him both in war and by the
bloody spirit of superstition. I burned with
indignation
therefore as I listened to the cold-blooded arguings
of the bigoted priest, and wept to see how artfully he
could warp aside the better nature of Aurelian, and
pour his own venom into veins that had else run with
human blood, at least not the poisoned current of tigers,
wolves, and serpents of every name and nature most
vile. My hope was that, away from his prompter, and
the first purpose of Aurelian would return and have its
way.
LETTER V.
FROM PISO TO FAUSTA.
I am now returned from my long intended visit to the
villa of Marcus, and have much to say concerning it.
But first of all rejoice with me in a fresh
demonstration
of good will on the part of Aurelian towards
Zenobia
.
And what think you it is? Nothing less than
this, that Vabalathus has been made by Aurelian and
the senate king of Armenia! The kingdom is not large,
but large enough for him at his present age  if he shall
show himself competent, additions doubtless will be
made. Our only regret is, that the queen loses thus his
presence with her at Tibur. He had become to his
mother all that a son should be. Not that in respect to
native force he could ever make good the loss of Julia,
or even of Livia, but that in all the many offices which
an affectionate child would render to a parent in the
changed circumstances of Zenobia, he has proved to be
a solace and a support.
The second day from the dedication, passing through
the Porta Asinaria with Milo at my side, I took the road
that winds along the hither bank of the Tiber, and leads
most pleasantly, if not most directly, to the seat of my
friends  and you are well aware how willingly I
sacrifice
a little time on the way, if by doing so I can more
than make up the loss by obtaining brighter glimpses of
earth and sky. Had I not found Christianity, Fausta,
this would have been my religion. I should have
forsaken
the philosophers and gone forth into the fields
among the eternal hills, upon the banks of the river, or
the margin of the ever-flowing ocean, and in the lessons
there silently read to me, I should I think have arrived
at some very firm and comfortable faith in God and
immortality
.
And I am especially happy in this, that
nature
in no way loses its interest or value, because I now
draw truth from a more certain source. I take the same
pleasure as before in observing and contemplating her
various forms, and the clearer light of Christianity brings
to view a thousand beauties, to which before I was
insensible
.
Just as in reading a difficult author, although
you may have reached his sense in some good degree,
unaided, yet a judicious commentator points out
excellences
,
and unfolds truths, which you had either wholly
overlooked or but imperfectly comprehended.
All without the city walls, as within, bore witness to
the graciousness of the emperor in the prolonged
holiday
he had granted the people. It was as if the
Saturnalia
had arrived. Industry, such as there ever is, was
suspended; all were sitting idle, or thronging some
game, or gathering in noisy groups about some
mountebank
.
As we advanced farther and came just beyond
the great road leading to Tibur, we passed the school of
the celebrated gladiator Sosia, at the door of which there
had just arrived from the amphitheatre a cart bearing
home the bodies of such as had been slain the preceding
day, presenting a disgusting spectacle of wounds, bruises,
and flowing blood.
`There was brave fighting yesterday,' said Milo;
`these are but a few out of all that fell. The first day's
sport was an hundred of the trained gladiators, most of
them from the school of Sosia, set against a hundred
picked captives of all nations. Not less than a half of
each number got it. These fellows look as if they had
done their best. You 've fought your last battle, old
boys  unless you have a bout with Charon, who will
be loath, I warrant you beforehand, to ferry over such a
slashed and swollen company. Now ought you in
charity,' he continued, addressing a half-naked savage
who was helping to drag the bodies from the cart, `to
have these trunks well washed ere you bury them, or
pitch them into the Tiber, else they will never get over
the Styx  not forgetting too the ferriage ' what more
folly he would have uttered I know not, for the wretch
to whom he spoke suddenly seized the lash of the driver
of the cart and laid it over Milo's shoulders, saying, as
he did it,
`Off, fool, or my fist shall do for you what it did for
one of these.'
The bystanders at this set up a hoarse shouting, one
of them exclaiming so that I could hear him
`There goes the Christian Piso, we or the lions will
have a turn at him yet. These are the fellows that
spoil our trade.'
`Never mind,' replied another, `if report goes true
they won't spoil it long.'
No rank and no power is secure against the affronts
of this lawless tribe; they are a sort of licensed
brawlers
,
their brutal and inhuman trade rendering them
insensible
to all fear from any quarter. Death is to them
but as a scratch on the finger  they care not for it
when nor how it comes. The slightest cause  a
passing
word  a look  a motion  is enough to inflame
their ferocious passions, and bring on quarrel and
murder
.
Riot and death are daily occurrences in the
neighborhood
of these schools of trained assassins. Milo
knew their character well enough, but he deemed
himself
to be uttering somewhat that should amuse rather
than enrage, and was mortified rather than terrified, I
believe, at the sudden application of the lash. The
unfeigned
surprise he manifested, together with the quick
leap which his horse made, who partook of the blow,
was irresistibly ludicrous. He was nearly thrown off
backwards in the speed of his horse's flight along the
road. It was some time before I overtook him.
`Intermeddling,' I said to Milo as I came up with
him, `is a dangerous vice. How feel your shoulders?'
`I shall remember that one-eyed butcher, and if there
be virtue in hisses or in thumbs, he shall rue the hour
he laid a lash on Gallienus. Poor fellow! Whose
horsemanship is equal to such an onset? I 'll haunt the
theatre till my chance come.'
`Well, well, let us forget this. How went the games
yesterday?'
`Never, as I hear,' he said, `and as I remember, were
they more liberal, or more magnificent. Larger, or
more beautiful, or finer beasts, neither Asia nor Africa
ever sent over. They fought as if they had been
trained
to it, like these scholars of Sosia, and in most cases
they bore away the palm from them. How many of
Sosia's men exactly fell, it is not known, but not fewer
than threescore men were either torn in pieces, or
rescued
too much lacerated to fight more.'
`What captives were sacrificed?'
`I did not learn of what nation they were, nor how
many. All I know is what I witnessed toward the end
of the sport. Never before did I behold such a form,
nor such feats of strength! He was another Hercules.
It was rumored he was from the forests of Germany. If
you will believe it, which I scarce can though I saw it,
he fought successively with six of Sosia's best men, and
one after another laid them all sprawling. A seventh
was then set upon him, he having no time to breathe or
even drink. Many however cried out against this. But
Romans, you know, like not to have their fun spoiled,
so the seventh was not taken off. As every one
foresaw
,
this was too much by just one for the hero; but he
fought desperately, and it is believed Sosia's man got
pushes he will never recover from. He was soon
however
on his knees, and then on his back, the sword of
his antagonist at his throat, he lying like a gasping fish
at his mercy  who waited the pleasure of the
spectators
a moment, before he struck. Then was there a
great shouting all over the theatre in his behalf, besides
making the sign to spare him. But just at the moment,
as for him ill fortune would have it, some poltroon cried
out with a voice that went all over the theatre, `The dog
is a Christian!' Whereupon like lightning every thumb
went up, and down plunged the sword into his neck.
So, master, thou seest what I tell thee every day, there
is small virtue in being a Christian. It is every way
dangerous. If a thief runs through the streets the cry
is, a Christian! a Christian! If a man is murdered,
they who did it accuse some neighboring Christian, and
he dies for it. If a Christian fall into the Tiber, men
look on as on a drowning dog. If he slip or fall in a
VOL. I. 12
crowd, they will help trample him to death. If he is
sick or poor, none but his own tribe will help him.
Even the Jew despises him, and spits upon his gown as
he passes. What but the love of contempt and death
can make one a Christian 'tis hard to see. Had that
captive been other than a Christian he would not have
fallen as he did.'
`Very likely. But the Christians you know frequent
not the amphitheatre. Had they been there in their just
proportion to the rest, the voice would at least have been
a divided one.'
`Nay, as for that,' he rejoined, `there were some stout
voices raised in his behalf to the last, and some thumbs
down, but too few to be regarded. But even in the
streets, where all sorts are found, there is none to take
the Christian's part  unless it be that old gashed
soldier
of the fifth legion, who stalks through the streets as
though all Rome were his. By the gods, I believe he
would beard Aurelian himself! He will stand at a
corner
,
in some public place, and preach to the crowds, and
give never an inch for all their curses and noise. They
fear him too much I believe to attack him with aught
but words. And I wonder not at it. A few days since
a large dog was in wicked wantonness, as I must allow,
set upon a poor Christian boy. Macer, so he is called
about the city, at the moment came up. Never tiger
seized his prey as he seized that dog, and first dashing
out his brains upon the pavement, pursued then the
pursuers
of the boy and beat them to jelly with the carcase
of the beast, and then walked away unmolested, leading
the child to his home.'
`Men reverence courage, Milo, everywhere and in all.'
`That do they. It was so with me once when
Gallienus
'
`Gallop, Milo, to that mile-stone, and report to me
how far we have come.'
I still as ever extract much, Fausta, from my faithful
if foolish slave.
In due time and without hindrance or accident I
reached the outer gate of my friend's villa.
The gate was opened by Clia, whose husband is
promoted to the place of porter. Her face shone as she
saw me, and she hastened to assure me that all were
well at the house, holding up at the same moment a
curly-headed boy for me to admire, whom with a blush
and a faltering tongue she called Lucius. I told her I
was pleased with the name, for it was a good one, and
he should not suffer for bearing it, if I could help it.
Milo thought it unlucky enough that it should be named
after a Christian, and I am certain has taken occasion to
remonstrate with its mother on the subject; but, as you
may suppose, did not succeed in infusing his own terrors.
I was first met by Lucilia, who received me with her
usual heartiness. Marcus was out on some remote part
of the estate overseeing his slaves. In a few moments,
by the assiduous Lucilia and her slaves, I was brushed
and washed and set down to a table  though it was so
few hours since I had left Rome  covered with bread,
honey, butter and olives, a cold capon with salads, and
wine such as the cellars of Marcus alone can furnish.
As the only way in which to keep the good opinion of
Lucilia is to eat, I ate of all that was on the table, she
assuring
me that everything was from their own grounds
the butter made by her own hands  and that I might
search Rome in vain for better. This I readily
admitted
.
Indeed no butter is like hers  so yellow and so
hard  nor bread so light and so white. Even her
honey is more delicious than what I find elsewhere, the
bees knowing by instinct who they are working for;
and the poultry is fatter and tenderer, the hens being
careful never to over-fatigue themselves, and the peacocks
and the geese not to exhaust themselves in screaming
and cackling. All nature, alive and dead, takes upon
itself a trimmer and more perfect seeming within her
influences.
I had sat thus gossipping with Lucilia, enjoying the
balmy breezes of a warm autumn day as they drew
through the great hall of the house, when, preceded by
the bounding Gallus, the master of the house entered
in field dress of broad sun-hat, open neck, close coat
depending
to the knees, and boots that brought home with
them the spoils of many a well-ploughed field.
`Well, sir Christian,' he cried, `I joy to see thee,
although
thus recreant. But how is it that thou lookest
as ever before? Are not these vanities of silk, and gold,
and fine clothes renounced by those of the new religion?
Your appearance says nay, and, by Jupiter! wine has
been drunk already! Nay, nay, Lucilia, it was hardly a
pagan act to tempt our strict friend with that Falernian.'
`Faleruian is it?'
`Yes, of the vintage of the fourth of Gallienus.
Delicious
,
was it not? But by and by thou shalt taste
something better than that  as much better as that is
than anything of the same name thou didst ever raise to
thy lips at the table of Aurelian. Piso! never was a
face more welcome! Not a soul has looked in upon us
for days and days. Not, Lucilia, since the Kalends,
when young Flaccus with a boat-load of roysterers dropt
down the river. But why comes not Julia too? She
could not leave the games and theatres, hah?'
`Marcus,' said Lucilia, `you forget it was the princess
who first seduced Lucius. But for that eastern voyage
for the Persian Calpurnius, Piso would have been still,
I dare say, what his parents made him. Let us not yet
however stir this topic; but first of all, Lucius, give us
the city news. How went the dedication? we have
heard strange tales.'
`How went it by report?' I asked.
`O, it would be long telling,' said Lucilia. `Only for
one thing, we heard that there was a massacre of the
Christians, in which some said hundreds, and some,
thousands fell. For a moment, I assure you, we
trembled
for you. The confirmation afforded by your actual
presence, of your welfare, is not unwelcome. You must
lay a part of the heartiness of our reception, especially
the old Falernian to the account of our relieved fears.
But let us hear.'
I then went over the last days in Rome, adding what
I had been able to gather from Milo, when it was such
that I could trust to it. When I had satisfied their
curiosity
,
and had moreover described to Lucilia the
dresses
of Livia on so great an occasion, and the fashions
which were raging, Marcus proposed that I should
accompany
him over his farm, and observe his additions
and improvements, and the condition of his slaves. I
accepted the proposal with pleasure, and we soon set
forth on our ramble, accompanied by Gallus, now riding
his stick and now gambolling about the lawns and fields
with his dog.
I like this retreat of Curtius better almost than any
VOL. I. 12*
other of the suburban villas of our citizens. There is
an air of calm senatorial dignity about it which modern
edifices want. It looks as if it had seen more than one
generation of patrician inhabitants. There is little unity
or order  as those words are commonly understood
observable in the structure of the house, but it presents
to the eye an irregular assemblage of forms, the work of
different ages, and built according to the taste and skill
of distant times. Some portions are new, some old and
covered with lichens, mosses, and creeping plants. Here
is a portico of the time of Trajan, and there a tower that
seems as if it were of the times of the republic. Yet is
there a certain harmony and congruity running through
the whole, for the material used is everywhere the same
a certain fawn-colored stone drawn from quarries still
existing in the neighborhood  and each successive
owner and architect has evidently paid some regard to
preceding erections in the design and proportions of the
part he has added. In this unity of character as well as
in the separate beauty or greatness of distinct parts is it
made evident that persons of accomplishment and rank
have alone possessed it. Of its earlier history all that
Curtius has with certainty ascertained is, that it was
once the seat of the great Hortensius  before he had in
the growth of his fame and his riches displayed his
luxurious
tastes in the wonders of Tusculum, Bauli, or
Laurentum. It was the first indication given by him of
that love of elegant and lavish wastefulness, that gave
him at last as wide a celebrity as his genius. The part
which he built is well known, and although of moderate
dimensions, yet displays the rudiments of that taste that
afterward was satisfied only with more than imperial
magnificence. Marcus has satisfied himself as to the
very room which he occupied as his study and library,
and where he prepared himself for the morning courts;
and in the same apartment  hoping as he says to catch
something from the genius of the place  does he apply
himself to the same professional labors. His name and
repute are now second to none in Rome. Yet, young
as he is, he begins to weary of the bar and woo the
more quiet pursuits of letters and philosophy. Nay, at
the present moment agriculture claims all his leisure,
and steals time that can ill be spared from his clients.
Varro and Cato have more of his devotion than statutes
and precedents.
In the disposition of the grounds, Marcus has shown
that he inherits something of the tastefulness of his
remote predecessor; and in the harvest that covers his
extensive acres, gives equal evidence that he has studied
not without profit the labors of those who have written
upon husbandry and its connected arts. Varro
especially
is at his tongue's end.
We soon came to the quarter of the slaves  a
village
almost of the humble tenements occupied by this
miserable class. None but the women, children, sick
and aged, were now at home  the young and
able-bodied
being abroad at work. No new disturbances
have broken out, he tells me; the former severity,
followed
by a well-timed lenity, having subdued or
conciliated
all. Curtius, although fond of power and of all its
ensigns, yet conceals not his hatred of this institution,
which has so long obtained in the Roman state, as in
all states. He can devise no way of escape from it;
but he sees in it the most active and general cause of
the corruption of morals which is spread everywhere
where it prevails. He cannot suppress his contempt of
the delusion or hypocrisy of our ancestors in terming
themselves republicans.
`What a monstrous solecism was it,' he broke out
with energy, `in the times preceding the empire, to call
that a free country which was built upon the
degradation
and slavery of half of its population. Rome never
was a republic. It was simply a faction of land and
slave holders, who blinded and befooled the ignorant
populace by parading before them some of the forms of
liberty, but kept the power in their own hands. They
were a community of petty kings, which was better in
their mind than only one king as in the time of the
Tarquins
.
It was a republic of kingdoms and of kings, if
you will. Now and then indeed the people bustled
about and shook their chains as in the times of the
institution
of the tribune's office and those of the
Gracchi
.
But they gained nothing. The patricians were
still the kings who ruled them. And among no people
can there be liberty where slavery exists  liberty I
mean properly so called. He who holds slaves cannot
in the nature of things be a republican; but in the
nature
of things he is on the other hand a despot. I am
one. And a nation of such individuals is an association
of despots for despotic purposes, and nothing else nor
better
.
Liberty in their mouths is a profanation of the
sacred
name. It signifies nothing but their liberty to
reign. I confess it is to those who happen to be the
kings a very agreeable state of things. I enjoy my
power and state mightily. But I am not blind to the
fact  my own experience teaches it  that it is a state
of things corrupt and rotten to the heart  destructive
everywhere of the highest form of the human character.
It nurses and brings out the animal, represses and
embrutes
the god that is within us. It makes of man a
being of violence, force, passion, and the narrowest
selfishness
;
while reason and humanity, which should
distinguish him, are degraded or annihilated. Such
men are not the stuff that republics are made of. A
republic
may endure for a time in spite of them, owing to
fortunate circumstances of another kind; but wherever
they obtain a preponderance in the state, liberty will
expire
,
or exist only in the insulting forms in which she
waved her bloody sceptre during most of our early
history
.
Slavery and despotism are natural allies.'
`I rejoice,' I said, `to find a change in you, at least in
the theory which you adopt.'
`I certainly am changed,' he replied; `and such as
the change may be, is it owing, sir Christian, to thy
calm and yet fiery epistles from Palmyra. Small
thanks do I owe thee for making me uncomfortable in
a position from which I cannot escape. Once proud of
my slaves and my power, I am already ashamed of
both; but while my principles have altered, my habits
and character, which slavery has created and nursed,
remain beyond any power of man, so far as I can see,
to change them. What they are you well know. So
that here in my middle age I suffer a retribution that
should have been reserved till I had been dismissed
from the dread tribunal of Rhadamanthus.'
`I see not, Curtius, why you should not escape from
the position you are in, if you sincerely desire it, which
I suppose you do not.'
`That, to be honest  which at least I am  is I
believe
the case.'
`I do not doubt it, as it is with all who are situated
like yourself. Most, however, defend the principle as
well as cling to the form of slavery.'
`Nay, that I cannot do. That I never did, since my
beard was grown. I fancy myself to have from the
gods a good heart. He is essentially of a corrupt heart
who will stand for slavery in its principle. He is
without
anything generous in his nature. Cold selfishness
marks and makes him. But supposing I as sincerely
desired to escape  as I sincerely do not  what, O
most wise mentor, should be the manner?'
`First and at once, to treat them no longer as slaves,
but as men.'
`That I am just beginning to do. What else?'
`If you are sincere as I say, and moreover if you
possess
the exalted and generous traits which we patricians
ever claim for ourselves, show it them by giving their
freedom one by one to those who are now slaves, even
though it result in the loss of one half of your fortune.
That will be a patrician act. What was begun in crime
by others, cannot be perpetuated without equal crime in
us. The enfranchised will soon mingle with the
people
,
and, as we see every day, become one with it.
This process is going on at this moment in all my
estates
.
Before my will is executed, I shall hope to have
disposed in this manner of every slave in my
possession
.'
`One can hardly look to emulate such virtues as this
new-found Christian philosophy seems to have
engendered
within thy noble bosom, Piso; but the subject
must be weighed. There is nothing so agreeable in
prospect as to do right; but, like some distant stretches
of land and hill, water and wood, the beauty is all gone
as it draws near. It is then absolutely a source of pain
and disgust. I will write a treatise upon the great
theme.'
`If you write, Curtius, I shall despair of any action.
all your philanthropy will evaporate in a cloud of
words.'
`But that will be the way, I think, to restore my
equanimity. I believe I shall feel quite easy after a
little declamation. Here, Lucius, regale thyself upon
these grapes. These are from the isles of the Grecian
Archipelago, and for sweetness are not equalled by any
of our own. Gallus, Gallus, go not so near to the edge
of the pond; it is deep, as I have warned you. I have
lampreys there, Piso, bigger than any that Hortensius
ever wept for. Gallus, you dog! away, I say.'
But Gallus heeded not the command of his father.
He already was beginning to have a little will of his
own. He continued playing upon the margin of the
water, throwing in sticks for his dog to bring to him
again. Perceiving his danger to be great, I went to
him and forcibly drew him away, he and his dog setting
up a frightful music of screams and yelpings. Marcus
was both entertained and amazed at the feat.
`Piso,' he jocosely cried out, `there is a good deal of
the old republican in you. You even treat free men as
slaves. That boy  a man in will  never had before
such restraint laid upon his liberty.'
`Liberty with restraint,' I answered, `operating upon
all, and equally upon all, is the true account of a state
of freedom. Gallus unrestrained is a slave  a slave of
passion and the sport of chance. He is not truly free
until he is bound.'
With such talk we amused ourselves as we wandered
over the estate, through its more wild and more
cultivated
parts. Dinner was presently announced by a
slave sounding at a distance a sort of sea-shell, and we
hastened to the house.
Lucilia awaited us in a small six-sided cabinet, fitted
up purposely for a dining-room for six or eight persons.
It was wholly cased with a rich marble of a pale yellow
hue, beautifully panelled, having three windows
opening
upon a long portico with a southern aspect, set out
with exotics in fancifully arranged groups. The
marble
panels of the room were so contrived that at a
touch they slipped aside and disclosed in rich array,
here the choicest wines, there sauces and spices of a
thousand sorts, and there again the rarest confections
brought from China and the East. Apicius himself
could have fancied nothing more perfect  for the least
dissatisfaction with the flavor of a dish, or the kind of
wine, could be removed by merely reaching out the
hand and drawing from an inexhaustible treasure-house
both wines and condiments, such as scarce Rome itself
could equal. This was an apartment contrived and built
by Hortensius himself.
The dinner was worthy the room and its builder, the
marbles, the prospect, the guest, the host, and the
hostess
.
The aforementioned Apicius would have never
once thought of the panelled cupboards. No dish would
have admitted of addition or alteration.
When the feasting was over, and with it the lighter
conversation and more disjointed and various which
usually accompanies it, Marcus rose, and withdrawing
one of the sliding panels, with much gravity and state
drew forth a glass pitcher of exquisite form filled with
wine, saying as he did so,
`All, Piso, that you have as yet tasted is but as water
of the Tiber to this. This is more than nectar. The
gods have never been so happy as to have seen the like.
I am their envy. It is Falernian, that once saw the
wine vaults of Heliogabalus! Not a drop of Chian has
ever touched it. It is pure, unadulterate. Taste and
be translated.'
I acknowledged, as I well might, its unequalled flavor.
`This nectarean draught,' he continued, `I even
consider
to possess purifying and exalting qualities. He
who drinks it is for the time of a higher nature. It is
better for the temper than a chapter of Seneca or
Epictetus
.
It brings upon the soul a certain divine calm,
favorable beyond any other state to the growth of the
virtues. Could it become of universal use, mankind
were soon a race of gods. Even Christianity were then
made unnecessary  admitting it to be that unrivalled
moral engine which you Christians affirm it to be. It
is favorable also to dispassionate discussion, Piso, a little
of which I would now invite. Know you not, I have
scarce seen you since your assumption of your new
name and faith? What bad demon possessed you, in
evil hour, to throw Rome and your friends into such a
ferment?'
`Had you become, Lucius,' said Lucilia, `a
declaiming
advocate of Epicurus, or a street-lecturer upon
Plato
,
or turned priest of Apollo's new temple, it would
VOL. I. 13
have all been quite tolerable, though amazing  but
Christian!'
`Yes, Lucius, it is too bad,' added Marcus. `If you
were in want of moral strength, you would have done
better to have begged some of my Falernian. You
should not have been denied.'
`Or,' said Lucilia, `some of my Smyrna cordial.'
`At least,' continued Marcus, `you might have come
to me for some of my wisdom which I keep ready at a
moment's warning in quantities to suit all applicants.'
`Or to me,' said Lucilia, `for some of my every day
good-sense which you know I possess in such
abundance
,
though I have not sat at the feet of philosophers.'
`But seriously, Lucius,' began Marcus in altered
mood, `this is a most extraordinary movement of yours.
I should like to be able to interpret it. If you must
needs have what you call religion, of which I for my
part can see no earthly occasion, here were plenty of
forms in which to receive it, more ancient and more
respectable
than this of the Christians.'
`I am almost unwilling to converse on this topic with
you, Marcus,' I rejoined, `for there is nothing in your
nature, or rather in your educated nature, to which
to appeal with the least hope of any profitable result
either
to me or you. The gods have, as you say, given
you a good heart  I may add too, a most noble head;
but yourself and education together have made you so
thoroughly a man of the world, that the interests of any
other part of your nature, save those of the intellect and
the senses, are to you precisely as if they did not exist.'
`Right, Lucius; therein do I claim honor and
distinction
.
The intangible, the invisible, the vague, the
shadowy
I leave to women and priests  concerning myself
only with the substantial realities of life. Great
Jupiter
!
what would become of mankind were we all women
and priests? How could the courts go on  senates sit
and deliberate  armies conquer? I think the world
would stand still. However, I object not to a popular
faith, such as that which now obtains throughout the
Roman world. If mankind, as history seems to prove,
must and will have something of the kind, this perhaps
is as good as anything else; and seeing it has once
become
established and fixed in the way it has, I think it
ought no more to be disturbed than men's faith in their
political institutions. Our concern should be merely to
regulate it, that it grow not too large and so overlay and
crush the state. Fanatics and bigots must be hewn
away. There must be an occasional infusion of doubt
and indifference into the mass to keep it from fermenting.
You cannot be offended, Lucius, at the way in which I
speak of your new-adopted faith. I think no better of
any other. Epicureans, Stoics, Platonists, Jews,
Christians
,
they are all alike to me. I hold them all at arms
length. I have listened to them all; and more idle
indigested
fancies never did I hear  no, not from the
newest-fledged advocate playing the rhetorician at his
first appearance.'
`I do not wonder, Curtius, that you have turned away
dissatisfied with the philosophers. I do not wonder that
you reject the popular superstitions. But I do wonder
that you will prejudge any question, or infer the
intrinsic
incredibility of whatever may take the form of
religion
,
from the intrinsic incredibility of what the world
has heretofore possessed. It surely is not a
philosophical
method.'
`Not in other things, I grant,' replied Marcus; `but
concerning this question of popular superstition, or
religion
,
the only philosophy is to discard the whole subject
as one deserving severe investigation. The follies which
the populace have in all nations and in all time adopted,
let them be retained, and even defended and supported
by the state. They perform a not unimportant office in
regulating the conduct and manners of men  in
preserving
a certain order in the world. But beyond this,
it seems to me the subject is unworthy the regard of a
reflecting person. One world and one life is enough to
manage at a time. If there be another, or if there be a
God who governs it and this also, it will be time enough
to know these things when they are made plain to the
senses, as these trees and hills now are and your
well-shaped
form. This peering into futurity in the
expectation
to arrive at certainty, seems to me much as if one
should hope to make out the forms of cities, palaces and
groves by gazing into the empty air or on the clouds.
Besides, of what use?'
`Of what use indeed?' added Lucilia. `I want no
director nor monitor concerning any duty or act which
it falls to me to perform other than I find within me. I
have no need of a divine messenger to stand ever at my
side to tell me what I must do and what I must forbear.
I have within me instincts and impulses which I find
amply sufficient. The care and duty of every day is
very much alike, and a little experience and observation
added to the inward instinct makes me quite superior to
most difficulties and evils as they arise. The gods, or
whatever power gave us our nature, have not left us
dependent
either on what is called religion or philosophy.'
`What you say,' I rejoined, `is partly true. The
gods have not left us dependent upon either religion or
philosophy. There is a natural religion of the heart and
the conscience which is born with us, grows up with us,
and never forsakes us. But then after all how
defective
and incomplete a principle it is. It has chiefly to
to do only with our daily conduct; it cannot answer
our doubts or satisfy our wants. It differs too with the
constitution of the individual. In some it is a principle
of much greater value and efficacy than in others.
Your instincts are clear and powerful and direct you
aright. But in another they are obscure and weak,
and leave the mind in the greatest perplexity. It is by
no means all that they want. Then are not the
prevalent
superstitions most injurious in their influences upon
the common mind? Can you doubt whether more of
good or evil is derived to the soul from the ideas it
entertains
of the character and providence of the gods?
Can you be insensible to the horrible enormities and
nameless vices which make a part even of what is called
religion? And is there no need  if men will have
religion
in some form  that they should receive it in a
better one? Can you not conceive of such views of
God and his worship, of duty, virtue, and immortality
being presented, that they shall strike the mind as
reasonable
in themselves and of beneficial instead of hurtful
power upon being adopted? Can you not imagine
your own mind and the minds of people generally to be
so devoted to a high and sublime conception of the
Divinity
and of futurity, as to be absolutely incapable of
an act that should displease him or forfeit the hope of
immortality?'
VOL. I. 13*
`Hardly,' said Marcus and Lucilia.
`Well, suppose it were so. Or rather, if you cannot
imagine such a state of things, multitudes can. You are
not a fair specimen of our kind, but only of a
comparatively
small class. Generally  so I have found it  the
mind is seeking about for something better than what any
human system has as yet proposed, and is confident of
nothing more than of this, that men may be put in
possession
of truths that shall carry them on as far beyond
what their natural instincts now can do, as these
instincts
carry them on beyond any point to which the
brutes ever arrive. This certainly was my own
conviction
before I met with Christianity. Now Marcus
and Lucilia, what is this Christianity but a revelation
from Heaven whose aim is to give to you and to all such
conceptions of God and futurity, as I have just spoken
of?'  I then, finding that I had obtained a hearing,
went into a full account of the religion of Christ as I
had received it from the books themselves, and which to
you I need not repeat. They listened with
considerable
patience  though I was careful not to use many
words  but without any expression of countenance or
manner that indicated any very favorable change in
their opinions or feelings. As I ended, Marcus said,
`I shall always think better of this religion, Lucius,
that you have adopted it, though I cannot say that your
adopting it will raise my judgment of you. I do not at
present see upon what grounds it stands so firm or
divine
that a citizen is defensible in abandoning for it an
ostensible reception of and faith in the existing forms of
the state. However, I incline to allow freedom in these
matters to scholars and speculative minds. Let them
work out and enjoy their own fancies  they are a
restless
,
discontented, ambitious herd, and should, for the
sake of their genius, be humored in the particular
pursuits
where they have placed their happiness. But
when they turn propagators and reformers, and aim at
the subversion of things now firmly established and
prosperous, then  although I myself should never
meddle
in such matters  it is scarcely a question whether
the power of the state should interpose and lay upon
them the necessary restraints. Upon the whole, Lucius
Piso, I think that I and Lucilia had better turn preachers,
and exhort you to return to the faith or no-faith which
you have abandoned. Leave such things to take care
of themselves. What have you gained but making
yourself an object of popular aversion or distrust? You
have abandoned the community of the polite, the refined,
the sober, where by nature you belong, and have
associated
yourself with a vulgar crew of  forgive my
freedom
,
I speak the common judgment that you may know
what it is  ignorant fanatics or crafty knaves, who care
for you no further than as by your great name they
may stand a little higher in the world. I protest before
Jupiter that to save others like you from such loss I feel
tempted to hunt over the statute books for some law
now obsolete and forgotten, but not legally dead, that
may be brought to bear upon this mischief and give it
another Decian blight, which, if it do not kill, may yet
check and obstruct its growth.'
I replied, `that from him I could apprehend, he well
knew, no such deed of folly or guilt  however likely it
was that others might do it and glory in their shame
that his nature would save him from such a deed though
his principles might not.' I told him, moreover, `that I
did not despair of his looking upon Christianity with a
favorable judgment in good time. He had been willing
to hear, and there was that secret charm in the truths
and doctrines of Christ's religion, and especially in his
character, that however rudely set forth, the mind could
scarcely resist it  against its will, it would oftentimes
find itself subdued and changed. The seeds I have
now dropt upon your hearts I trust will some day spring
up and bear such fruit as you yourselves will rejoice in.'
`So,' said Marcus, `may the wheat spilled into the
Tiber, or sown among rocks, or eaten by the birds.'
`And that may be, though not to-day nor to-morrow,'
I replied. `The seed of things essential to man's life, as
of wheat, is not easily killed. It may be buried for years
and years, yet turned up at length to the sun and its life
sprouts upward in leaf and stem and fruit. Borne down
by the waters of the Tiber and apparently lost, it may be
cast up upon the shores of Egypt or Britain and fulfill its
destiny. The seed of truth is longer-lived still  by
reason that what it bears is more essential than wheat
or other grain to man's best life.'
`Well, well,' said Marcus, `let us charge our goblets
with the bottom of this Falernian, and forgetting
whether
there be such an entity as truth or not, drink to the
health of the princess Julia.'
`That comes nearer our hearts,' said Lucilia, `than
anything that has been spoken for the last hour. When
you return, Lucius, Laco must follow you with a
muleload
of some of my homely products'  She was
about to add more, when we were all alike startled and
alarmed by cries, seemingly of deep distress, and
rapidly
approaching. We sprung from our seats, when the
door of the room was violently flung open and a slave
rushed in, crying out,
`Oh, sir! Gallus  Gallus'
`What is it? What is it?'  cried Marcus and
Lucilia
.
`Speak quick  has he fallen?'
`Oh no; the pond  the fish-pond  run  fly'
Distractedly we hurried to the spot already
surrounded
by a crowd of slaves. Who had been with him?
Where had he fallen? were questions hastily asked, but
which no one could answer. It was a miserable scene
of agony, confusion and despair  Marcus ordering his
slaves to dive into the pond, then uttering curses upon
them, and commanding those to whom Gallus was
usually
entrusted to the rack. No one could swim, no one
could dive. It was long since I had made use of an art
which I once possessed, but instantly I cast off my
upper
garments, and needing no other direction to the true
spot than the barking of the little dog and his jumping
in and out of the water  first learning that the water
was deep and of an even bottom  I threw myself in,
and in a moment guided by the white dress of the little
fellow I grasped him and drew him to the surface.
Life was apparently and probably to my mind extinct,
but expressing a hope that means might yet be resorted
to that should restore him, I bore him in my arms to the
house. But it was all in vain. Gallus was dead.
I shall not inflict a new sadness upon you, Fausta, by
describing the grief of my friends, or any of the
incidents
of the days I now passed with them. They were
heavy, melancholy days; for the sorrows of both Lucilia
and Marcus were excessive and inconsolable. I could
do nothing for them, nor say anything to them; yet
while they were thus incapacitated for all action I could
serve them essentially by placing myself at the head of
their affairs, and relieving them of common cares and
duties, that must otherwise have been neglected or have
proved irksome and oppressive.
The ashes of Gallus, committed to a small marble
urn, have been deposited in a tomb in the centre of
Lucilia's
flower garden, which will soon be embowered by
flowers and shrubs which her hand will delight to train
around it.
On the eve of the day when I was to leave them and
return to Rome, we sat together in a portico which
overlooks
the Tiber. Marcus and Lucilia were sad, but at
length in some sort calm. The first violence of
sorrow
had spent itself, and reflection was beginning to
succeed.
`I suppose,' said Marcus, `your rigid faith greatly
condemns all this show of suffering which you have
witnessed, Piso, in us, as if not criminal, at least weak
and childish?'
`Not so, by any means,' I rejoined. `The religion of
the Christians is what one may term a natural religion;
it does violence to not one of the good affections and
propensities. Coming, as we maintain, from the
creator
of our bodies and our minds, it does them no injury,
it wars not with any of their natural elements, but most
strictly harmonizes with them. It aims to direct, to
modify, to heal, to moderate  but never to alter or
annihilate
.
Love of our offspring is not more according
to our nature than grief for the loss of them. Grief
therefore is innocent  even as praiseworthy as love.
What trace of human wisdom  much less of divine
would there be in the arrangement that should first bind
us by chains of affection strong as adamant to a child,
or a parent, or a friend, and then treat the sorrow as
criminal that wept with whatever violence as it saw the
links broken and scattered, never again to be joined
together
?'
`That certainly is a proof that some just ideas are to
be found in your religion,' replied my friend. `By
nothing was I ever more irreconcilably offended in the
stoical philosophy than by its harsh violence towards
nature under suffering. To be treated by your
philosophy
with rudeness and contempt because you yield to
emotions which are as natural and therefore in my
judgment
as innocent as any, is as if one were struck by a
friend or a parent to whom you fled for protection or
comfort. The doctrines of all the others failed in the
same way. Even the Epicureans hold it a weakness
and even a wrong to grieve, seeing the injury that is
thereby done to happiness. Grief must be suppressed
and banished because it is accompanied by pain. That
too seemed to me a false sentiment, because although
grief is indeed in some sort painful yet is it not wholly
so, but is attended by a kind of pleasure. How plain
it is that I should suffer greatly more were I forcibly
restrained by a foreign power or my own from shedding
these tears and uttering these sighs for Gallus, than I
do now while I am free to indulge my natural feelings.
In truth it is the only pleasure that grief brings with
it  the freedom of indulging it.'
`He,' I said, as Marcus paused, giving way afresh to
his sorrow, `who embraces the Christian doctrine, is
never blamed, condemned, nor ridiculed by it for the
indulgence
of the emotions to which the loss of those
whom we love gives birth. But then at the same time
he will probably grieve and suffer much less under
such circumstances than you  not because he is
however
forcibly restrained, but because of the influence
upon his mind and his heart of truths and opinions
which as a Christian he entertains, and which, without
any will or act of his own, work within him and
strengthen and console him. The Christian believing
so firmly as he does, for example, in a God, not only on
grounds of reason but of express revelation, and that
this God is a parent, exercising a providence over his
creatures, regardless of none, loving as a parent all,
who has created mankind not for his own amusement
or glory, but that life and happiness might be diffused:
they who believe thus must feel very differently under
adversity from those who like yourself believe nothing
of it at all, and from those who, like the disciples of the
Porch and the Academy, believe but an inconsiderable
part of it. Suppose, Marcus and Lucilia, your whole
population of slaves were, instead of strangers and
slaves, your children, toward whom you experienced
the same sentiments of deep affection that you did
toward
Gallus; how would you not consult for their
happiness
;
and how plain it is that whatever laws you
might set over them they would be laws of love, the
end of which, however they might not always recognize
it, would be their happiness  happiness through their
virtue. This may represent with sufficient exactness
the light in which Christians regard the Divinity, and
the laws of life under which they find themselves.
Admitting
therefore their faith to be well founded, and how
manifest is it that they will necessarily suffer less under
adversity than you  nd not because any violence is
done to their nature, but because of the benignant
influences
of such truths.'
`What you say,' observed Lucilia, `affects the mind
very agreeably; and gives a pleasing idea, both of the
wisdom and mercy of the Christian faith. It seems at
any rate to be suited to such creatures as we are. What
a pity that it is so difficult to discern truth.'
`It is difficult,' I replied; `the ebst things are always
so: but it is not impossible; what is necessary to our
happiness is never so. A mind of common powers, well
disposed, seeking with a real desire to find, will rarely
retire from the search wholly unsuccessful. The great
essentials to our daily well-being and the right conduct
of life the Creator has supplied through our instincts.
Your natural religion, of which you have spoken, you
find sufficient for most of the occurrences which arise
both of doing and bearing. But there are other
emergencies
for which it is as evidently insufficient. Now
as the Creator has supplied so perfectly in all breasts the
natural religion which is so essential, it is fair to say
and believe that He would not make additional truths
almost
equally essential to our happiness, either of
impossible
attainment, or encompassed by difficulties which
could not with a little diligence and perseverance be
overcome.'
`It would seem so, certainly,' said Marcus; `but it is
so long since I have bestowed any thought upon
philosophical
inquiries, that to me the labor would be very
great and the difficulties extreme  for at present there
VOL. I. 14
is scarcely so much as a mere shred or particle of faith
to which as a nucleus other truths may attach
themselves
.
In truth, I never look even to possess any clear
faith in a God  it seems a subject wholly beyond the
scope and grasp of my mind. I cannot entertain the
idea of self-existence. I can conceive of him neither as
one nor as divided into parts. Is he infinite and
everywhere
,
himself constituting his universe  then he is
scarcely a God; or is he a being dwelling apart from
his works, and watching their obedience to their
imposed
laws? In neither of these conceptions can I rest.'
`It is not strange,' I replied; `nor that refusing to
believe
in the fact of a God until you should be able to
comprehend him perfectly, you should to this hour be
without faith. If I had waited before believing until I
understood, I should at this moment be as faithless as
you, or as I was before I received Christianity. Do I
comprehend the Deity? Can I describe the mode of his
being? Can I tell you in what manner he sprang into
existence? And whether he is necessarily everywhere
in his works, and as it were constituting them? Or
whether he has power to contract himself and dwell
apart from them, their omniscient observer and
omnipotent
Lord? I know nothing of all this; the religion which
I receive teaches nothing of all this. Christianity does
not demonstrate the being of a God, it simply proclaims it;
hardly so much as that indeed. It supposes it, as what
was already well known and generally believed. I
cannot
doubt that it is left thus standing by itself, untaught
and unexplained only because the subject is intrinsically
incomprehensible by us. It is a great fact or truth
which all can receive, but which none can explain or
prove. If it is not believed either instinctively or through
the recognition of it and declaration of it in some
revelation
,
it cannot be believed at all. The mind of man is
no more competent to reach and grasp it through
reason
,
than his hands are to mould a sun. All the
reasonings
,
imaginations, guesses, of self-styled philosophers,
are here like the prattlings of children. They make
you smile, but they do not instruct.'
`I fear,' said Marcus, `I shall then never believe, for
I can believe nothing of which I cannot form a
conception
.'
`Surely,' I answered, `our faith is not bounded by
our conceptions or our knowledge in other things. We
build the loftiest palaces and temples upon foundations
of stone, though we can form no conception whatever of
the nature of a stone. So I think we may found a true
and sufficient religion on our belief in the fact of a God,
although we can form no conception whatever of his
nature
and the mode of his existence.'
But I should fatigue you, Fausta, were I to give you
more of our conversation. It ran on equally pleasant I
believe to all of us, to a quite late hour; in which time
almost all that is peculiar to the faith of the Christians
came under our review. It was more than midnight
when we rose from our seats to retire to our chambers.
But before we did that, a common feeling directed our
steps to the tomb of Gallus, which was but a few paces
from where we had been sitting. There these childless
parents again gave way to their grief; and was I stone
that I should not weep with them?
When this act and duty of piety had been performed
we sought our pillows. As for me, I could not sleep for
thinking of my friends and their now desolate house.
For even to me, who was to that child almost a
stranger
and had been so little used to his presence, this
place is no longer the same: all its brightness, life and
spirit of gladness are gone. Everything seems changed.
From every place and scene something seems to have
been subtracted to which they were indebted for
whatever
it was that made them attractive. If this is so to
to me, what must it be to Marcus and Lucilia? It is
not difficult to see that a sorrow has settled upon their
hearts which no length of time can heal. I suppose if
all their estates had been swept away from them in a
night, and all their friends, they would not have been so
overwhelmed as by this calamity  in such a wonderful
manner were they each woven into the child, and all
into each other, as one being. They seem no longer to
me like the same persons. Not that they are not often
calm, and in a manner possessed of themselves; but that
even then when they are most themselves, there has a
dullness, a dreamy absence of mind, a fixed sadness,
come over them that wholly changes them. Though
they sit and converse with you, their true thoughts seem
far away. They are kind and courteous as ever to the
common eye, but I can see that all the relish of life and
of intercourse is now to them gone. All is flat and
insipid
.
The friend is coldly saluted; the meal left
untasted
,
or partaken of in silence and soon abandoned;
the affairs of the household left to others, to any who
will take charge of them. They tell me that this will
always be so; that however they may seem to others
they must ever experience a sense of loss; not any less
than they would if a limb had been shorn away. A
part of themselves, and of the life of every day and hour,
is taken from them.
How strange is all this, even in the light of Christian
faith! How inexplicable, we are ready to say, by any
reason of ours, the providence of God in taking away
the human being in the first blossoming; before the
fruit has even shown itself, much less ripened! Yet is
not immortality, the hope, the assurance of
immortality
,
a sufficient solution? To me it is. This will not
indeed cure our sorrows  they spring from somewhat
wholly independent of futurity  but it vindicates the
ways of the Omnipotent, and justifies them to our
reason
and our affections. Will Marcus and Lucilia ever
rejoice in the consolations which flow from this hope?
Alas! I fear not. They seem in a manner to be
incapable
of belief.
In the morning I shall start for Rome. As soon as
there you shall hear from me again. Farewell.
While Piso was absent from Rome on this visit to his
friend, it was my fortune to be several times in the city
upon necessary affairs of the illustrious queen, when I
was both at the palace of Aurelian and that of Piso. It
was at one of these later visits that it became apparent
to me that the emperor seriously meditated the imposing
of restrictions of some kind upon the Christians; yet no
such purpose was generally apprehended by that sect
itself
,
nor by the people at large. The dark and
disastrous
occurrences on the day of the dedication were
variously
interpreted by the people; some believing them
VOL. I. 14*
to point at the Christians, some at the meditated
expedition
of the emperor, some at Aurelian himself. The
popular mind was however greatly inflamed against the
Christians, and every art was resorted to by the priests
of the temples, and those who were as bigoted and
savage
as themselves among the people, to fan to a
devouring
flame the little fire that began to be kindled. The
voice from the temple, however some might with Fronto
himself doubt whether it were not from Heaven, was for
the most part ascribed to the Christians, although they
could give no explanation of the manner in which it
had been produced. But as in the case of Aurelian
himself, this was forgotten in the horror occasioned by
the more dreadful language of the omens, which in
such black and threatening array no one remembered
ever to have been witnessed before. None thought or
talked of anything else. It was the universal theme.
This may be seen in a conversation which I had with
a rustic, whom I overtook as I rode toward Rome,
seated
on his mule burdened on either side and behind with
the multifarious produce of his farm. The fellow as I
drew near to him seeming of a less churlish disposition
than most of those whom one meets upon the road, who
will scarcely return a friendly salute, I feared not to
accost him. After giving him the customary good
wishes, I remarked upon the excellence of the
vegetables
which he had in his panniers.
`Yes,' he said, `these lettuces are good, but not what
they would have been but for the winds we have had
from the mountains. It has sadly nipped them. I hear
the queen pines away just as my plants do. I live at
Norentum. I know you, sir, though you cannot know
me. You pass by my door on your way to the city.
My children often call me from my work to look up, for
there goes the secretary of the good queen on his great
horse. There's no such horse as that on the road.
Ha, ha, my baskets reach but to your knee! Well,
there are differences in animals and in men too. So
the gods will it. One rides upon a horse with golden
bits, another upon a mule with none at all. Still I say,
let the gods be praised.'
`The gods themselves could hardly help that,' I said,
`if they made one man stronger or of more wit than
another
.
In that case one would get more than another.
And surely you would not have men all run in one
mould  all five feet high, all weighing so much, all
with one face, and one form, and one brain! The
world were then dull enough.'
`You say true,' he replied; `that is very good. If
we were all alike there would be no such thing as being
rich or poor  no such thing as getting or losing. I
fear it would be dull enough, as you say. But I did
not mean to complain, sir. I believe I am contented
with my lot. So long as I can have my little farm
with my garden and barns  my cattle and my poultry,
a kind neighbor or so, and my priest and temple, I care
for nothing more.'
`You have a temple then at Norentum.'
`Yes, to Jupiter Pluvius. And a better priest has
not Rome itself. It is his brother, some officer of the
emperor's, I take these vegetables to. I hope to hear
more this morning of what I heard something when I
was last at market. And I think I shall, for, as I hear,
the city is a good deal stirred since the dedication the
other day.'
`I believe it is,' I answered. `But of what do you
look to hear, if I may ask. Is there news from the
East?'
`O no, I think not of the East nor South. It was of
something to be done about these Christians. Our
temple
you must know is half forsaken and more of late. I
believe half the people of Norentum, if the truth were
known, have turned Christians or Jews. Unless we
wake up a little, our worship cannot be supported and
our religion will be gone. And glad am I to hear
through our priest that even the emperor is alarmed,
and believes something must be done. You know than
he there is not a more devout man in Rome. So it is
said. And one thing that makes me think so is this.
The brother of our priest  where I am going with
these vegetables; here is poultry too, look! you never
saw fatter I warrant you  told him that he knew it for
certain that the emperor meant to make short work with
even his own neice  you know who I mean  Aurelia,
who has long been suspected to be a Christian. And
that 's right. If he punishes any he ought not to spare
his own.'
`That I suppose would be right. But why should
he punish any? You need not be alarmed nor
offended
;
I am no Christian.'
`The gods be praised therefor! I do not pretend to
know the whole reason why. But that seems to be the
only way of saving the old religion; and I do n't know
what way you can possibly have of showing that a
religion
of yesterday is true, if a religion of a thousand
years old is to be made out false. If religion is good for
anything  and I for one think it is  I think men
ought to be compelled to have it and support it, just as
they should be to eat wholesome food rather than
poisonous
or hurtful. The laws won't permit us to carry
certain things to market nor others in a certain state.
If we do we are fined or imprisoned. Treat a Christian
in the same way, say I. Let them just go thoroughly
to work, and our temples will soon be filled again.'
`But these Christians seem to be a harmless people.'
`But they have no religion that anybody can call
such. They have no gods nor altars nor sacrifices;
such can never be harmless. To be sure, as to
sacrifices
,
I think there is such a thing as doing too much
there. I am not for human sacrifices. Nor do I see
the need either of burning up a dozen fat oxen or
heifers
,
as was done the other day at the Temple of the
Sun. We in Norentum burn nothing but the hoofs
and some of the entrails, and the rest goes to the priest
for his support. As I take it, a sacrifice is just a sign
of readiness to do everything and lose everything for
the gods. We are not expected to throw either
ourselves
or our whole substance upon the altar; making
the sign is sufficient. But as I said, these Christians
have no altar and no sacrifice, nor image of god or
goddess
.
They have at Norentum an old ruinous
building
once a market  where they meet for worship;
but those who have been present say that nothing is to
be seen; and nothing heard but prayers  to what god
no one knows  and exhortations of the priests. Some
say that elsewhere they have what they call an altar
and adorn their walls with pictures and statues.
However
all this may be, there seems to be some charm
about them or their worship, for all the world is running
after them. I long for the news I shall get from
Varenus
Hirtius. If these omens have not set the emperor
at work for us, nothing will. Here we are at the gates,
and I turn toward the Claudian market. May the day
go happily with you.'
So we parted, and I bent my way toward the gardens
of Sallust.
As I moved slowly along through the streets, my
heart was filled with pity for this people  the
Christians
threatened as it seemed to me with a renewal
of the calamities that had so many times swept over
them before. They had ever impressed me as a
simple
minded, virtuous community, of notions too subtle
and spiritual for the world ever to receive, but which
upon themselves appeared to exert a power altogether
beneficial. Many of this faith I had known well, and
they were persons to excite my highest admiration for
the characters which they bore. Need I name more
than the princess Julia and her husband, the excellent
Piso? Others like them  what wonder if inferior
had also, both in Palmyra, and at Tibur and Rome,
for they were to be found everywhere, drawn largely
both on my respect and my affections. I beheld with
sorrow the signs which now seemed to portend suffering
and disaster. And my sympathies were the more moved
seeing that never before had there been upon the throne
a man who, if he were once entered into a war of
opposition
against them, had power to do them greater harm,
or could have proved a more stern and cruel enemy. Not
even Nero nor Domitian were in their time to be so much
dreaded. For if Aurelian should once league him with
the state against them, it would not with him be matter
of mere cruel sport, but of conscience. It would be for
the honor of the gods, the protection of religion, the
greatness and glory of the empire, that he would assail
and punish them; and the same fierce and bloody spirit
that made him of all modern conquerors the bloodiest
and fiercest, it was plain would rule him in any
encounter
with this humble and defenceless tribe. I could only
hope that I was deceived as well as others in my
apprehensions
,
or, if that were not so, pray that the gods
would be pleased to take their great subject to
themselves
.
Full of such reflections and emotions I arrived at
the palace and was ushered into the presence of Livia.
There was with her the melancholy Aurelia  for such
she always seems  and who appeared to have been
engaged in earnest talk with the empress, if one might
judge by tears fast falling from her eyes. The only
words which I caught as I entered were these from
Aurelia
,
`but, dear lady, if Mucapor require it not, why
should others think of it so much? Were he fixed, then
should I indeed have to ask strength of God for the
trial ' then seeing me and only receiving my
salutations
she withdrew.
Livia, after first inquiring concerning Zenobia and
Faustula, returning to what had just engaged her, said,
`I wish, good Nichomachus, that I had your powers
of speech of which as you can remember I have been
witness in former days  those happy days in Syria
when you used so successfully to withstand and subdue
my giddy or headstrong mind. Here have I been for
weary hours  not weary neither for their aim has I am
sure been a worthy one  but here have I been
persuading
with all the reason and eloquence I could bring to
bear, this self-willed girl to renounce these fantastic
notions
she has imbibed from the Christians and their
books, were it only for the sake of domestic peace.
Aurelian
is growing daily more and more exasperated
against this obscure tribe, and drops oftener than I love
to hear them dark hints of what awaits them, not
excepting
he says any of whatever rank or name. Not that I
suppose he or the senate would proceed further than
imprisonments
,
banishment, suppression of free speech,
the destruction of books and churches; so much indeed
I understand from him. But even thus far, and we might
lose Aurelia  a thing not to be thought of for a
moment
.
He has talked with her himself, reasoned with
her, threatened her; but in vain. Now he has imposed
the same task upon me  it is equally in vain. I know
not what to do.'
`Because,' I replied, `nothing can be done. Where
it is possible to see, you have eyes within you that can
penetrate the thickest darkness as well as any. But
here you fail; but only where none could succeed. A
sincere honest mind, princess, is not to be changed either
by persuasion or force. Its belief is not subject to the
will. Aurelia, if I have heard aright, is a Christian
from conviction. Evidence made her a Christian
stronger evidence on the side of her former faith can
alone unmake her.'
`I cannot reason with her to that extent, Nichomachus,'
replied the empress. `I know not the grounds of the
common faith, any more than those of Christianity. I
only know that I wish Aurelia was not a Christian.
Will you, Nichomachus, reason with her? I remember
your logic of old.'
`Alas, princess, I can engage in no such task!
Where I have no faith myself I should in vain attempt
to plant it in others. How either can I desire that any
mind should remain an hour longer oppressed by the
childish and abominable superstitions which prevail in
Rome? I cannot but congratulate the excellent Aurelia,
so far as the question of truth is concerned, that in the
place of the infinite stupidities of the common religion,
she has received the, at least, pure and reasonable
doctrines
of the Christians. You cannot surely, princess,
desire her re-conversion?'
`Only for her own sake, for the sake of her safety,
comfort, happiness.'
`But in her judgment these are best and only secured
where she now is. How thinks Mucapor?'
`As I believe,' answered Livia, `he cares not in the
matter, save for her happiness. He will not wish that
she should have any faith except such as she herself
wishes. I have urged him to use his power to constrain
her, but he loves liberty himself too dearly, he says, to
put force upon another.'
`He is a noble fellow,' I said; `it is what I should
have looked for from Mucapor.'
`In good sooth, Nichomachus, I believe you still take
me but for what I was in Palmyra. Who am I?'
`From a princess you have become an empress, that
I fully understand, and I trust never to be wanting in
the demeanor that best becomes a subject; but you are
still Livia, the daughter of Zenobia, and to her I feel I
can never fear to speak with sincerity.'
`How omnipotent, Nicomachus, are simplicity and
truth! They subdue me when I most would not. They
VOL. I. 15
have conquered me in Aurelia and now in you. Well,
well, Aurelia then must take the full weight of her
uncle's
wrath, which is not light.'
At this moment Aurelian himself entered,
accompanied
by Fronto. Livia at the same time rose and
withdrew
,
not caring, I thought, to meet the eyes of that
basilisk
,
who with the cunning of a priest she saw to be
usurping a power over Aurelian which belonged of right
to her. I was about also to withdraw, but the emperor
constraining me as he often does, I remained, although
holding the priest in still greater abhorrence I believe
than Livia herself.
`While you have been absent from the city, Fronto,'
said Aurelian, `I have revolved the subjects upon which
we last conversed, and no longer doubt where lie for me
both duty and the truest glory. The judgment of the
colleges, lately rendered, agrees both with yours and
mine. So that the very finger of the god we worship
points the way.'
`I am glad,' replied Fronto, `for myself, for you, for
Rome, and for the world, that truth possesses and is to
sway you. It will be a great day for Rome, greater
than when your triumphal array swept through the
streets with the world at your chariot-wheels, when the
enemy, that has so long waged successful war within the
very gates, shall lie dead as the multitudes of Palmyra.'
`It will, Fronto. But first I have this to say, and by
the gods I believe it true, that it is the corruptions of our
own religion and its ministers that is the offence that
smells to heaven quite as much as the presumptuous
novelties of this of Judea. I perceive you neither assent
to this nor like it. But it is true, I am persuaded, as
the gods themselves. I have long thought so; and
while with one hand I aim at the Gallilean atheism,
with the other I shall aim at those who dishonor by
their vices and hypocrisies the religion they profess to
serve.'
Fronto was evidently disturbed. His face grew pale
as the frown gathered and darkened on the brow of
Aurelian
.
He answered not, and Aurelian went on.
`Hellenism, Fronto, is disgraced and its very life
threatened by the vices of her chief ministers. The gods
forgive me in that while I have purged my legions of
drunkards and adulterers, I have left them in the
temples
.
Truly did you say, I have had but one thought
in my mind, I have looked but to one quarter of the
heavens. My eyes are now unsealed, and I see both
ways and every way. How can we look for the favor
of the gods while their houses of worship, I speak it,
Fronto, with sorrow, but with the knowledge too of the
truth of what I say, are houses of appointment, while
the very inner sanctuaries and the altars themselves are
little better than the common stews, while the priests
are the great fathers of iniquity, corrupters of innocence,
the seducers of youth, examples themselves beyond the
fear of rivalry of all the vice they teach. At their tables
too, who so swollen with meats and drink as the priests?
Who but they are a by-word throughout the city for all
that is vilest? What word but priest stands with all as
an abbreviation and epitome of whatever pollutes and
defiles the name of man? Porphyrius says `that since
Jesus has been worshipped in Rome no one has found
by experience the public assistance of the gods.' I
believe
it; and Rome will never again experience it till
this black atheism is rooted out. But it is as true, I doubt
not, that since their ministers have become ministers of
demons, and from teachers of morals have turned
instructers
in vice  for this reason too as well as for the
other the justly offended deities of Rome have hid
themselves
from their impious worshippers. Here then,
Fronto, is a double labor to be undergone, a double duty
to be done, not less than some or all of the labors of
Hercules. We are set for this work, and not till I have
begun it  if not finished  will I so much as dream of
Persia. What say you?'
Fronto looked like one who had kindled a larger
flame than he intended, or knew well how to manage.
`The faults of which you speak, great emperor, it can
be denied by none are found in Rome, and can never be
other than displeasing to the gods. But then I would
ask when was it ever otherwise? In the earlier ages of
the republic, I grant, there was a virtue in the people
which we see not now. But that grew not out of the
purer administration of religion, but was the product of
the times in part  times in comparison with these of a
primeval simplicity. To live well was easier then.
Where no temptation is, virtue is necessary. But then
it ceases to be virtue. It is a quality, not an acquisition
a gift of the gods rather than man's meritorious
work.'
`That is very true  well.'
`There may be as much real virtue now, as then.
May it not be so?'
`Perhaps it may. What then?'
`Our complaints of the present should be softened.
But what chiefly I would urge is this, that since those
ages of early virtue  after all perhaps, like all else at
the same period, partly fabulous  Rome has been but
what it is, adorned by virtues that have claimed the
admiration
of the world, and polluted by vices that have
drawn upon her the reprobation of the good, yet which
are but such as the world shows its surface over, from
the farthest India to the bleak wastes of Britain. It is,
Aurelian, a thing neither strange nor new that vices
thrive in Rome. And long since have there been those
like Nerva and the good Severus, and the late censor
Valerian, who have aimed at their correction. These,
and others who before and since have wrought in the
same work, have done well for the empire. Their aim
has been a high one, and the favor of the gods has been
theirs. Aurelian may do more and better in the same
work, seeing his power is greater and his piety more
zealous.'
`These are admitted truths, Fronto, save the last; but
whither do they tend?'
`To this. Because, Aurelian, vice has been in Rome;
because even the priesthood has been corrupt, and the
temples themselves the sties you say they now are
for this have the gods ever withdrawn their protection?
Has Rome ever been the less prosperous? What is
more, can we conceive that they who made us of their
fiery mould, so prone to violate the bounds of
moderation
,
would for yielding to such instincts interpose in
wrath as if that had happened which was not foreseen,
and against which they had made sure provision? Are
the heavens to blaze with the fires of the last day,
thunders
to roll as if earth were shaken to her centre, the
entrails of dumb beasts to utter forth terrific prophecy of
VOL. I. 15*
great and impending wo, because forsooth the people
of Rome are by no means patterns of purity  because
perchance within the temples themselves an immorality
may have been purposed or perpetrated  because even
the priests themselves have not been or are not white
and spotless as their robes?'
`There seems some reason in what you say.'
`But, great emperor, take me not as if I would make
myself the shield of vice, to hide it from the blow that
would extirpate or cure it. I see and bewail the
corruptions
of the age; but as they seem not fouler than those
of ages which are past, especially than those of Nero
and of Commodus, I cannot think that it is against these
the gods have armed themselves, but, Aurelian, against
an evil which has been long growing and often assailed
and checked, but which has now got to such giant size
and strength, that except it be absolutely hewn down,
and the least roots torn up and burned, both the altars
of our gods, and their capital called Eternal  and the
empire itself now holding the world in its wide-spread,
peace-giving arms, are vanished, and anarchy, impiety,
atheism, and the rank vices which in such times would
be engendered, shall then reign omnipotent, and fill the
very compass of the earth, Christ being the universal
king. It is against this the heavens have arrayed their
power, and to arouse an ungrateful, thoughtless,
impious
people, and their sleeping king, that they have
spoken in thunder.'
`Fronto, I almost believe you right.'
`Had we, Aurelian, but the eyes of moles when the
purposes of the gods are to be deciphered in the
character
of events, we should long since have seen that the
long series of disasters which have befallen the empire
since the Gallilean atheism has taken root here, have
pointed but to that  that they have been a chastisement
of our supineness and sloth. When did Rome,
almighty
Rome, ever before tremble at the name of
barbarian
,
or fly before their arms? While now is it not
much that we are able to keep them from the very walls
of Rome? They now swarm the German forests in
multitudes
which no man can count; their hoarse murmurs
can be heard even here, ready, soon as the reins of
empire
shall fall into the hands of another Gallienus, to
pour themselves upon the plains of Italy, changing our
fertile lands and gorgeous cities into another Dacia.
These things were not so once; and what cause there is
in Rome so deep and high and broad to resolve for us
the reason of this averted face of heaven, save that of
which I speak, I cannot guess.'
`Nor I,' said Aurelian; `I confess it. It must be so.
My work is not three nor two; but one. I have brought
peace to the empire in all its borders. My legions all
rest upon their arms. Not a sword but is in its sheath
there for the present let it be glued fast. The season,
so propitious for the great work of bringing again the
empire into peace and harmony with the angry gods,
seems to have been provided by themselves. How think
you, Nichomachus?'  turning suddenly to me as if now
for the first time aware that I was standing at his side.
I answered `that I was slow to receive the judgment
of Fronto or of himself in that matter. That I could
not believe that the gods, who should be examples of the
virtues to mankind, would ever ordain such sufferings
for their creatures as must ensue were the former
violences
to be renewed against the Christians. So far
from thinking them a nuisance in the state, I considered
them a benefit.'
`The Greek too,' said Fronto, breaking in, `is then a
Christian.'
`I am not a Christian, priest, nor as I think shall ever
be one; but far sooner would I be one than take my
faith from thee, which however it might guide me well
through the wine vaults of the temple, or to the best
stalls of the market, or to the selectest retreats of the
suburra, would scarce show the way to heaven. I
affront
but the corruptions of religion, Aurelian.
Sincerity
I honor everywhere. Hypocrisy nowhere.' I
thought Fronto would have torn me with his teeth and
nails. His white face grew whiter, but he stood still.
`Say on,' said the emperor, `though your bluntness
be more even than Roman.'
`I think,' I continued, `the Christians a benefit to the
state, for this reason; not that their religion is what
they pretend, a heaven-descended one, but that by its
greater strictness it serves to rebuke the common faith
and those who hold it, and infuse into it something of
its own spirit. All new systems, as I take it, in their
first beginning are strict and severe. It is thus by this
quality they supercede older and degenerate ones; not
because they are truer perhaps, but because they are
purer. There is a prejudice among men, that the gods,
whoever they may be and whatever they may be, love
virtue in men, and for that accept them. When
therefore
a religion fails to recommend and enforce virtue, it
fails to meet the judgment of men concerning the true
character and office of a religion, and so, with the
exception
of such beasts, and such there always are, who
esteem a faith in proportion to its corruptions, they look
with favor upon any new one which promises to be
what they want. It is for this reason that this religion
from Judea has made its way so far and so soon. But
it will by and by degenerate from its high estate just as
others have done, and be succeeded by another that
shall raise still higher expectations. In the meantime,
it serves the state well, both by the virtue which it
enjoins
upon its own subjects and the influence it exerts
by indirection upon those of the prevalent faiths, and
upon the general manners and morals.'
`What you say,' observed Aurelian musingly, `has
some show of sense. So much at least may be said for
this religion.'
`Yet a lie,' said Fronto, `can be none the less hateful
to the gods, because it sometimes plays the part of truth.
It is a lie still.'
`Hold,' said Aurelian, `let us hear the Greek. What
else?'
`I little thought,' I replied, `as I rode toward the city
this morning, that I should at this hour be standing in
the presence of the Emperor of Rome, a defender of the
Christians. I am in no manner whatever fitted for the
task. My knowledge is nothing; my opinions
therefore
worth but little, grounded as they are upon the
loose reports which reach my ear concerning the
character
and doctrines of this sect, or upon what little
observation
I have made upon those whom I have known
of that persuasion. Still I honor and esteem them, and
such aid as I can bring them in their straits, shall be
very gladly theirs. I will however add only one thing
more to what I have said in answer to Fronto, who
represents
the gods as more concerned to destroy the
Christians
than to reform the common religion and the public
morals. I cannot think that. Am I to believe that the
gods, the supreme directors of human affairs, and whose
aim must be man's highest well-being, regard with more
abhorrence an error than a vice?  an error too that acts
more beneficently than most truth, and is the very seed
of the purest virtues? I can by no means believe it.
So that if I were interpreter of the late omens, I should
rather see them pointed at the vices which prevail; at
the corruptions of the public morals, which are fouler
than aught I had so much as dreamed of before I was
myself a witness of them, and may well be supposed to
startle the gods from their rest, and draw down their
hottest thunderbolts. But I will not say more, when
there must be so many able to do so much better in
behalf
of what I must still believe to be a good cause.
Let me entreat the emperor, before he condemns, to
hear. There are those in Rome, of warm hearts, sound
heads, and honest souls, from whom, if from any on
earth, truth may be heard, and who will set in its just
light a doctrine too excellent to suffer as it must in my
hands.'
`They shall be heard, Nichomachus. Not even a
Jew nor a Christian shall suffer without that grace;
though I see not how it can avail.'
`If it should not avail to plant in your mind so good
an opinion of their way as exists in mine,' I resumed,
`it might yet to soften it and dispose it to a more lenient
conduct; and so many are the miseries of life in the
natural order of events, that the humane heart must
desire
to diminish, not increase them. Has Aurelian ever
heard the name of Probus the Christian?'
The emperor turned toward Fronto with a look of
inquiry
.
`Yes,' said the priest, `you have heard his name.
But that of Felix, the bishop of the Christians, as he is
called, is more familiar to you.'
`Felix, Felix, that is the name I have heard most, but
Probus too, if I err not.'
`He has been named to you, I am certain,' added
Fronto. `He is the real head of the Nazarenes,  the
bishop but a painted one.'
`Probus is he who turned young Piso's head. Is it
not so?'
`The very same; and beside his, the lady Julia's.'
`No, that was by another, one Paul of Antioch, also
a bishop and a fast friend of the queen. The
Christians
themselves have of late set upon him, as they
were so many blood-hounds, being bent upon expelling
him from Antioch. It is not long since, in accordance
with the decree of some assembled bishops there, I issued
a rescript dislodging him from his post, and planting in
his place one Domnus. If our purposes prosper, the
ejected and dishonored priest may find himself at least
safer if humbler. Probus,  I shall remember him.
The name leads my thoughts to Thrace, where our
greater Probus waits for me.'
`From Probus the Christian,' I said, `you will receive,
whenever you shall admit him to your presence, a true
account of the nature of the Christian's faith and of the
actual condition of their community  all which can be
had only from a member of it.'
But little more was said, when I departed, and took
my way again towards Tibur.
It seemed to me, from the manner of the emperor
more than from what he said, that he was settled
bound up to the bad work of an assault upon the
Christians
.
To what extent it was in his mind to go, I could
not judge; for his language was ambiguous, and
sometimes
contradictory. But that the darkest designs were
harbored by him, over which he was brooding with a
mind naturally superstitious, but now almost in a state
of exasperation from the late events, was most evident.
LETTER VI.
FROM PISO TO FAUSTA.
Having confined myself, in my last letter, to the affairs
of Marcus and Lucilia, I now, Fausta, turn to those
which concern us and Rome.
I found on my return to the city that the general
anxiety
concerning the designs of Aurelian had greatly
increased. Many rumors were current of dark sayings
of his, which, whether founded in truth or not,
contributed
to alarm even the most hopeful, and raise serious
apprehensions
for the fate of this much and long-suffering
religion. Julia herself partakes  I cannot say of the
alarm  but of the anxiety. She has less confidence
than I have in the humanity of the emperor. In the
honors heaped upon Zenobia, and the favors shown
herself
and Vabalathus, she sees not so much the
outpouring
of benevolent feelings as a rather ostentatious
display
of imperial generosity, and what is called Roman
magnanimity. For the true character of the man she
looks into the graves of Palmyra  upon her smoking
ruins  and upon the blood yet hardly dry that stains
the pavements of the Clian. Julia may be right,
though I am unwilling to believe it. Her judgment is
entitled to the more weight in this severe decision, that it
is ever inclined to the side of a too favorable opinion of
character and motive. You know her nature too well,
to believe her capable of exaggerating the faults of even
VOL. I. 16
the humblest. Yet though such are her apprehensions,
she manifests the same calm and even carriage as on the
approach of more serious troubles in Palmyra. She is
full of deepest interest in the affairs of the Christians,
and by many families of the poorer sort is resorted to
continually for aid, for counsel, or sympathy. Not one
in the whole community is a more frequent and devout
attendant upon the services of the church; and I need
not add that I am her constant companion. The
performance
of this duty gives a value to life in Rome such
as it never had before. Every seventh day, as with the
Jews, only upon a different day, do the Christians
assemble
for the purposes of religious worship. And I can
assure you it is with no trifling accessions of strength,
for patient doing and patient bearing, that we return to
our every-day affairs, after having listened to the prayers
and the reasonings or exhortations of Probus.
So great is the difference in my feelings and opinions
from what they were before I left Rome for Palmyra,
that it is with difficulty I persuade myself that I am the
same person. Between Piso the Pyrronist and Piso the
Christian, the distance seems immeasurable  yet in
how short a time it has been past. I cannot say that I
did not enjoy existence and value it in my former state,
but I can say that my enjoyment of it is infinitely
heightened
as a Christian, and the rate at which I value it
infinitely
raised. Born and nurtured as I was, with
Portia
for my mother, a palace for my home, Rome for my
country and capital, offering all the luxuries of the earth,
and affording all the means I could desire for carrying
on researches in study of every kind; surrounded by
friends of the noblest and best families in the city, and I
could not but enjoy life in some very important sense.
While mere youth lasted and my thoughts never
wandered
beyond the glittering forms of things, no one could
be happier or more contented. All was fair and
beautiful
around me  what could I ask for more? I was
satisfied and filled. But by and by my dream of life was
disturbed  my sleep broken. Natural questions began
to propose themselves for my solution, such I suppose
as sooner or later spring up in every bosom. I began
to speculate about myself  about the very self that had
been so long, so busy, about everything else beside itself.
I wished to know something of my constitution, of my
origin
,
my present condition, my ultimate fate. It seemed
to me I was too rare and curious a piece of work to go to
ruin, final and inevitable  perhaps to-morrow  at all
events in a very few years. Of futurity I had heard
and of Elysium  just as I had heard of Jupiter,
greatest and best, but with my earliest youth these things
had faded from my mind, or had already taken upon
themselves the character of fable. My Virgil, in which
I early received my lessons of language, at once divested
them of all their air of reality, and left them naked
fiction
.
The other poets, (Livy helping them,) did the
same work and completed it. But bent with most
serious
and earnest desires toward truth on what seemed
to me the greatest theme, I could not remain where I
was, and turned with highest expectations to the
philosophers
.
I not only read, but I studied and pondered
them with diligence, and with as sincere a desire of
arriving at truth as ever scholar sat at the feet of his
instructer
.
The result was anything but satisfying. I
left off a universal sceptic, so far as human systems of
philosophy were concerned, so far as they pretended to
solve the enigma of God and man, of life and death;
but with a heart yearning after truth, and even full of
faith, if that may be called faith which would
instinctively
lay hold upon a God and a hope of immortality,
though beaten back once and again by every form which
the syllogism could assume.
This was my state, Fausta, when I was found by
Christianity. Without faith, and yet with it; doubting
and yet believing; rejecting philosophy but leaning upon
nature; dissatisfied but hoping. I cannot easily find
words to tell you the change which Christian faith has
wrought within me. All I can say is this, that I am a
new man; I am made over again; I am born as it were
into another world. Where darkness once was, there is
now light brighter than the sun. Where doubt was,
there is now certainty. I have knowledge and truth for
error and perplexity. The inner world of my mind is
resplendent with a day whose luminary will never set.
And even the outer world of appearances and forms
shines more gloriously, and has an air of reality which
before it never had. It used to seem to me like the
gorgeous fabric of a dream, and as if at some unexpected
moment it might melt into air and nothingness, and I
and all men and things with it; for there appeared to
be no purpose in it; it came from nothing, it achieved
nothing, and certainly seemed to conduct to nothing.
Men like insects came and went; were born and died,
and that was all. Nothing was accomplished, nothing
perfected. But now, nature seems to me stable and
eternal as God himself. The world being the great
birth-place and nursery of these myriads of creatures
made as I ever conceived, in a divine likeness, after some
godlike model, for what spirit of other spheres can be
more beautiful than a perfect man, or a perfect woman?
each animated with the principle of immortality
there is a reason for its existence and its perpetuity from
whose force the mind cannot escape. It is, and it ever
will be; and mankind upon it, a continually happier and
more virtuous brotherhood.
Yes, Fausta, to me as a Christian everything is new,
everything better; the inward world, the outward world,
the present and the future. Life is a worthier gift and
a richer possession. I am to myself an object of a
thousand-fold
greater interest, and every other human being,
from a poor animal that was scarce worthy its wretched
existence, starts up into a god, for whom the whole earth
may one day become too narrow a field either to till or
rule. I am accordingly ready to labor both for myself
and others. I once held myself too cheap to do much
even for myself; for others I would do nothing except
to feed the hunger that directly appealed to me, or
relieve
the wretchedness that made me equally wretched.
Not so now. I myself am a different being, and others are
different. I am ready to toil for such beings; to suffer
for them. They are too valuable to be neglected, abused,
insulted, trodden into the dust. They must be defended,
and rescued, whenever their fellow-men  wholly
ignorant
of what they are and what themselves are about
would oppress them. More than all, do they need truth,
effectually to enlighten and redeem them, and truth they
must have at whatever cost. Let them only once know
what they are, and the world is safe. Christianity tells
them this, and Christianity they must have. The state
VOL. I. 16*
must not stand between man and truth; or if it do, it
must be rebuked by those who have the knowledge and
the courage, and made to resume its proper place and
office. Knowing what has been done for me by
Christian
truth, I can never be content until to others the
same good is at least offered, and I shall devote what
power and means I possess to this task. The prospect
now is of opposition and conflict. But it dismays not
me, nor Julia, nor any of this faith who have truly
adopted its principles. For if the mere love of fame,
the excitement of a contest, the prospect of pay or
plunder
,
will carry innumerable legions to the battle-field to
leave there their bones, how much more shall the belief
of a Christian arm him for even worse encounters? It
were pitiful indeed, if a possession as valuable as that of
truth could not inspire a heroism, which the love of fame
or of money can.
These things I have said to put you fully in
possession
of our present position, plans, and purposes. The
fate of Christianity is to us now as absorbing an interest,
as once was the fate of Palmyra.
I had been in the city only long enough to give Julia
a full account of my melancholy visit in the country, and
to write a part of it to you, when I walked forth to
observe
for myself the signs which the city might offer,
either to confirm or allay the apprehensions which were
begun to be felt.
I took my way over the Palatine, desiring to see the
excellent Tacitus, whose house is there. He was absent,
being suddenly called to Bai. I turned toward the
Forum
,
wishing to perform a commission for Julia at the
shop of Civilis  still alive and still compounding his
sweets  which is now about midway between the slope
of the hill and the Forum, having been removed from
its former place where you knew it, under the eaves of
the Temple of Peace. The little man of `smells' was at
his post, more crooked than ever, but none the less
exquisitely
arrayed; his wig befitting a young Bacchus
rather than a dried shred of a man beyond his
seventieth
year. All the gems of the east glittered on his
thin fingers, and diamonds that might move the envy of
Livia hung from his ears. The gales of Arabia,
burdened
with the fragrance of every flower of that sunny
clime, seemed concentrated into an atmosphere around
him; and in truth, I suppose a specimen of every pot
and phial of his vast shop might be found upon his
person
concealed in gold boxes, or hanging in the merest
fragments of bottles upon chains of silver or gold, or
deposited in folds of his ample robes. He was odor in
substantial form. He saluted me with a grace, of which
he only in Rome is master, and with a deference that
could not have been exceeded had I been Aurelian. I
told him that I wished to procure a perfume of Egyptian
origin and name, called Cleopatra's tears, and which was
reputed to convey to the organs of smell an odor more
exquisite than that of the rarest Persian rose or choicest
gums of Arabia. The eyes of Civilis kindled with the
fires of twenty  when love's anxious brow is suddenly
cleared up by that little, but all comprehensive word,
yes  as he answered,
`Noble Piso, I honor you. I never doubted your
taste. It is seen in your palace, in your dress, nay, in
the very costume of your incomparable slave, who has
done me the honor to call here in your service. But
now have you given of it the last and highest proof.
Never has the wit of man before compounded an essence
like that which lies buried in this porphyry vase.'
`You do not mean that I am to take away a vase of
that size? I do not purchase essences by the pound!'
Civilis seemed as if he would have fainted, so
oppressed
was he by this display of ignorance. My
character
I found was annihilated in a moment. When his
presence of mind was recovered he said,
`This vase? Great Jupiter! The price of your
palace
upon the Clian would scarce purchase it! Were
its contents suddenly let loose and spilled upon the air,
not Rome only, but Italy, would be bathed in the
transporting
and life-giving fragrance! Now I shall remove
the cover, first giving you to know, that within this
larger vase there is a number of smallest bottles, some
of glass, others of gold, in each of which are contained
a few of the tears, and which are warranted to retain
their potency, and lend their celestial peculiarity to your
clothes or your apartments, without loss or diminution
in the least appreciable degree, during the life of the
purchaser. Now, if it please you, bend this way and
receive the air which I shall presently set free. How
think you, noble Piso? Art not a new man?'
`I am new in my knowledge such as it is, Civilis.
It is certainly agreeable, most agreeable.'
`Agreeable! So is mount Etna a pretty hill! So is
Aurelian a fair soldier! so is the sun a good sized
brazier
!
I beseech thee, find another word. Let it not go
forth to all Rome that the most noble Piso deems the
tears of Cleopatra agreeable!'
`I can think no otherwise,' I replied. `It is really
agreeable, and reminds me, more than anything else, of
the oldest Falernian just rubbed between the palms of
the hand, which you will allow is to compliment it in
no moderate measure. But confess now, Civilis, that
you have an hundred perfumes more delicious than
this?'
`Piso, I may say this,  they have been so.'
`Ah, I understand you; you admit then it is the
force of fashion that lends this extraordinary odor to the
porphyry vase.'
`Truly, noble Piso, it has somewhat to do with it, it
must be acknowledged.'
`It would be curious, Civilis, to know what name this
bore, and in what case it was bestowed, and at what
price sold, before the empress Livia fancied it. I think
it should have been named `Livia's smiles.' It would
at any rate be a good name for it at thy shop in
Alexandria
.'
`You are facetious, noble Piso. But that last hint is
too good to be thrown away. Truly, you are a man of
the world, whose distinction I suppose is, that he has
eyes in the hind part of his head as well as before. But
what blame can be mine for such dealing? I am
driven; I am a slave. It is fashion that works these
wonders, not I. And there is no goddess, Piso, like
her. She is the true creator. Upon that which is
worthless can she bestow in a moment inestimable
value. What is despised to-day, she can exalt
to-morrow
to the very pinnacle of honor. She is my maker.
One day I was poor, the goddess took me by the hand
and smiled upon me and the next day I was rich. It
was the favorite mistress of Maximin, who one day
her chariot, Piso, so chance would have it, broke down
at my door, when she took refuge in my little shop,
then at the corner of the street Castor as you turn
towards
the Tiber  purchasing a particular perfume, of
which I had large store and boasted much to her, gave
me such currency among the rich and noble, that from
that hour my fortune was secure. No one bought a
perfume afterwards but of Civilis. Civilis was soon the
next person to the emperor. And to this hour, has this
same goddess befriended me. And many an old jar,
packed away in the midst of rubbish in dark recesses
now valueless, do I look upon as nevertheless so much
gold  its now despised contents one day to disperse
themselves upon kings and nobles, in the senate and the
theatres. I need not tell you what this diminutive
bottle
might have been had for, before the Kalends. Yet,
by Hercules, should I have sold it even then for less?
for should I not have divined its fortune? The wheel
is ever turning, turning. But, most excellent Piso, men
of the world are ever generous '
`Fear nothing, Civilis, I will not betray you. I
believe
you have spoken real truths. Besides, with Livia
on your side, and what could all Rome do to hurt you?'
`Most true, most true. But may I ask?  for one
thing has made me astonished  how is it that you,
being
now as report goes a Christian, should come to me
to purchase essences? When I heard you had so
named yourself, I looked to lose your custom forever
after.'
`Why should not a Christian man smell of that which
is agreeable as well as another?'
`Ah, that I cannot say. I have heard  I know
nothing
,
Piso, beyond essences and perfumes  but I have
heard the Christians forbear such things, calling them
vanities; just as they withdraw too 't is said from the
theatres and the circuses.
`They do indeed withdraw from the theatres and
circuses
,
Civilis, because the entertainments witnessed
there do, as they judge, serve but to make beasts of
men; they minister to vice. But in a sweet smell they
see no harm, any more than in a silk dress or
well-proportioned
buildings, or magnificent porticos. Why
should it be very wrong or very foolish to catch the
odors, which the divine Providence plants in the rose,
and in a thousand flowers and gums, as they wander
forth upon the air for our delight, and fasten them up in
these little bottles? by which means we can breathe
them at all times  in winter as well as in summer.
Thy shop, Civilis, is but a flower garden in another form
and under another name.'
`I shall think better of the Christians for this. I
hardly believed the report indeed, for it were most
unnatural
and strange to find fault with odors such as
these. I shall lament the more that they are to be so
dealt with by the emperor. Hast thou heard what is
reported this morning?'
`No; I am but just from home. How does it go?'
`Why, 't is nothing other nor less than this, that
Aurelian
,
being resolved to change the Christians all back
again into what they were, has begun with his niece the
princess Aurelia, and with violence insists that she shall
sacrifice  which she steadfastly refuses to do. Some
say, that she has not been seen at the palace for several
days, and that she is fast locked up in the great prison
on the Tiber.'
`I do not believe a word of it, Civilis. The emperor
has of late used harsh language of the Christians, I
know. But for one word he has spoken, the city has
coined ten. And moreover, the words of the priest
Fronto are quoted for those of Aurelian. It is well
known he is especially fond of Aurelia; and Mucapor
to whom she is betrothed, is his favorite among all his
generals, not excepting Probus.'
`Well, well, may it be as you say! I for my part should
be sorry that any mishap should befall those with whom
the most noble Piso is connected; especially seeing they
do not quarrel, as I was fain to believe, with my calling.
Yet never before, as I think, have I seen a Christian
in my shop!'
`They may have been here without your knowing it.'
`Yes, that is true.'
`Besides, the Christians being in the greater
proportion
of the middle or humbler classes, seek not their
goods at places where emperors resort. They go
elsewhere
.'
Civilis bowed to the floor as he replied,
`You do me too much honor.'
`The two cases of perfume which I buy,' I then said,
`are to travel into the far East. Please to secure them
accordingly.'
`Are they not then for the Princess Julia, as I
supposed
?'
`They are for a friend in Syria. We wish her to
know what is going on here in the capital of all the
world.'
`By the gods! you have devised well. It is the talk
all over Rome. Cleopatra's tears have taken all hearts.
Orders from the provinces will soon pour in. They
shall follow you well secured as you say.'
I enjoy a call upon this whole Roman, and yet half
Jew, as much as upon the first citizens of the capital.
The cup of Aurelian is no fuller than the cup of Civilis.
The perfect bliss that emanates from his countenance
and breathes from his form and gait, is pleasing to
behold
upon whatever founded  seeing it is a state that
is reached by so few. No addition could be made to
the felicity of this fortunate man. He conceives his
occupation
to be more honorable than the proconsulship of
a province, and his name, he pleases himself with
believing
,
is familiar to more ears than any man's save
the emperor's; and has been known in Rome for a
longer period than any other person's living, excepting
only the head of the senate, the venerable Tacitus.
This is all legible in the lines about his mouth and eyes.
Leaving the heaven of the happy man, I turned to
the Forum of Augustus, to look at a statue of brass of
Aurelian, just placed among the great men of Rome in
front of the Temple of Mars the Avenger. This statue
is the work of Periander, who, with that universality of
power which marks the Greek, has made his genius as
distinguished here for sculpture as it was in Palmyra
for military defence and architecture. Who for
perfection
in this art of arts is to be compared with the Greek?
or for any work of either the head or the hands, that
implies the possession of what we mean by genius?
The Greeks have not only originated all that we know
of great and beautiful in letters, philosophy and the arts;
but what they have originated they have also perfected.
Whatever they have touched they have finished, at least
VOL. I. 17
so far as art and the manner of working is concerned.
The depths of all wisdom and philosophy they have not
sounded indeed, though they have gone deeper than any,
only because they are in their own essence
unfathomable
.
Time as it flows on bears us to new regions to be
explored, whose riches constantly add new stores to our
wisdom, and open new views to philosophy. But in all
art they have reached a point beyond which none have
since advanced, and beyond which it hardly seems
possible
to go. A doric column, a doric temple, a
corinthian
capital, a corinthian temple  these perfectly satisfy
and fill the mind; and for seven hundred years no
change nor addition has been made or attempted that has
not been felt to be an injury. And I doubt not that
seven thousand years hence, if time could but spare it
so long, pilgrims would still go in search of the
beautiful
from the remotest parts of the world, from parts now
unknown, to worship before the Parthenon, and, may I
not add, the Temple of the Sun in Palmyra!
Periander has gained new honors by this admirable
piece of work. I had hardly commenced my
examination
of it, when a grating voice at my elbow, and never
once heard to be mistaken for any other, croaked out
what was meant as a challenge,
`The greatest captain of this or any age.'
It was Spurius, a man whom no slight can chill, nor
even an insult cause to abate the least of his intrusive
familiarity  a familiarity which he covets too only for
the sake of disputation and satire. To me however he
is never other than a source of amusement. He is a
variety of the species I love occasionally to study.
I told him I was observing the workmanship, without
thinking of the man represented.
`If you will allow me to say it,' he rejoined, `a very
inferior subject of contemplation. A statue, as I take
it, the thing for which it is made, is commemoration.
If one wants to see fine work in marble, there is the
cornice for him just overhead: or in brass, let him look
at the doors of the new temple, or the last table or couch
of Syphax. The proper subject for man is man.'
`Well, Spurius, on your own ground then. In this
brass I do not see brass, nor yet Aurelian '
`What then, in the name of Hecate?'
`Nothing but intellect. The mind, the soul of the
greater artist, Periander. That drapery never fell so
upon Aurelian; nor was Aurelian's form or bearing
ever like this. It is all ennobled, and exalted above pure
nature, by the divine power of genius. The true artist,
under every form and every line of nature, sees another
form and line of more perfect grace and beauty, which
he chooses instead, and makes it visible and permanent
in stone or brass. You see nothing in me, but merely
Piso as he walks the streets. Periander sees another
within, bearing no more resemblance to me  yet as
much  than does this to Aurelian.'
`That I simply conceive to be so much sophistry,'
rejoined
the poet, `which no man would be guilty of,
except
he had been for the very purpose, as one must
think, of degrading his intellect, to the Athenian schools.
Still, as I said and think, the statue is made to
commemorate
the man represented, not the artist.'
`It is made for that. But oftentimes the very name
of the man commemorated is lost, while that of the
artist
lives forever. In my judgment there is as much of
Periander in this statue as there is of Aurelian.'
`I know not what the fame of this great Periander
may be ages hence. It has not till now reached my
ear.'
`It is not easy to reach the ears of some who dwell
in the via cli.' I could not help saying that.
`My rooms, sir, I would inform you,' he rejoined
sharply, `are on the third floor.'
`Then I do wonder you should not have heard of
Periander.'
`Greater than Aurelian, and I must wonder too! A
poet may be greater than a general or an emperor, I
grant: he is one of the family of the gods; but how a
worker in brass or marble can be, passes my poor
understanding
.
It is vain to attempt to raise the mere
artist to the level of the historian or poet.'
`I think that too. I only said he was greater than
Aurelian '
`Than Aurelian,' replied Spurius, `who has extended
the bounds of the empire!'
`But narrowed those of human happiness,' I
answered
.
`Which is of more consequence, empire or
man? But now, man was the great object! I grant
you he is, and for that reason a man who, like an artist
of genius, adds to the innocent sources of human
enjoyment
,
is greater than the soldier and conqueror, whose
business is the annoyance and destruction of life.
Aurelian
has slain hundreds of thousands. Periander
never injured a worm. He dwells in a calm and
peaceful
world of his own, and his works are designed to
infuse
the same spirit that fills himself into all who
behold
them. You must confess the superior power of
art and the artist in this very figure. Who thinks of
conquest, blood, and death, as he looks upon these
flowing
outlines, this calm, majestic form  upon that still
face? The artist here is the conqueror of the
conqueror
,
and makes him subserve his own purposes; purposes
of a higher nature than the mere soldier ever dreamed
of. No one can stand and contemplate this form,
without
being made a lover of beauty rather than of blood
and death; and beauty is peace.'
`It must be impossible,' replied the sour spirit, `for
one who loves Palmyra better than his native Rome, to
see much merit in Aurelian. It is a common saying,
Piso is a Palmyrene. The report is current too that
Piso is about to turn author, and celebrate that great
nation
in history.'
`I wish I were worthy to do so,' I answered, `I might
then refute certain statements in another quarter. Yet
events have already refuted them.'
`If my book,' replied Spurius, `be copied a thousand
times, the statements shall stand as they are. They are
founded upon indisputable evidence and philosophical
inferences.'
`But, Spurius, they are every one contradicted by the
late events.'
`No matter for that, if they were ever true they must
always be true. Reasoning is as strong as fact. I
found Palmyra a vulgar, upstart, provincial city; the
most distasteful of all spots on earth to a refined mind;
such I left it, and such I have shown it to the world.'
`Yet,' I urged, `if the Palmyrenes in the defence of
their country showed themselves a brave, daring, and
VOL. I. 17*
dangerous foe, as they certainly were magnanimous; if
so many facts and events prove this, and all Rome admits
it, it will seem like little else than malice for such pages
to circulate in your book. Besides, as to a thousand
other things I can prove you wrong.'
`Because I have but one eye, am I incapable of
vision
?
Am I to be reproached with my misfortunes?
One eye is the same as two; who sees two images
except
he squint? I can describe that wain, loaded down
with wine casks drawn by four horses with scarlet
trappings
,
the driver with a sweeping Juno's favor in his
cap, as justly as you can. Who can see more?'
`I thought not, Spurius, of your misfortune, though I
must think two eyes better for seeing than one, but only
of favorable opportunities for observation. You were in
Palmyra from the ides of January to the nones of
February
,
and lived in a tavern. I have been there for
more than half a year, and dwelt among the citizens
themselves. I knew them in public and in private, and
saw them under all circumstances most favorable to a
just opinion, and I can affirm that a more discolored
picture
of a people was never drawn than yours.'
`All the world,' said the creature, `knows that Spurius
is no flatterer. I have not only published travels among
the Palmyrenes, but I intend to publish a poem also
yes, a satire  and if it should be entitled Woman's
pride humbled, or The downfall of false greatness,
or, The gourd withered in a day, or Mushrooms not
oaks, or Ants not elephants, what would there be
wonderful in it?  or if Romans should figure largely
in it, eh?'
`Nothing is less wonderful, Spurius, than the
obstinacy
and tenaciousness of error.'
`Periander greater than Aurelian!' rejoined he,
moving
off; `that is a good thing for the town.'
As I turned, intending to visit the shop of Demetrius,
to see what progress he was making in his silver
Apollo, I was accosted by the consul Marcellinus.
`A fair morning to you, Piso,' said he; `and I see
you need the salutation and the wish, for a black cloud
has just drifted from you, and you must still feel as if
under the shadow. Half the length of the street, as I
slowly approached, have I witnessed your earnest
discourse
with one whom I now see to have been Spurius.
But I trust your Christian principles are not about to
make an agrarian of you? Whence this sudden
intimacy
with one like Spurius?'
`One need not, I suppose, be set down as a lover of
an east wind because they both sometimes take the
same road, and can scarcely separate if they would?
But to speak the truth, a man is to me a man, and I
never yet have met one of the race from whom I could
not gain either amusement, instruction or warning.
Spurius is better than a lecture from a philosopher, upon
the odiousness of prejudice. To any one inclined to
harbor
prejudices would I recommend an hour's interview
with Spurius, sooner far than I would send him to
Cleanthes the Stoic, or Silius the Platonist, or, I had
almost
said, Probus the Christian.'
`May I ask,' said he, `Piso, if you have in sober
earnest
joined yourself to the community of the Christians,
or are you only dallying for a while with their doctrines,
just as our young men are this year infected by the
opinions of Cleanthes, the next followers of Silius, the
third of the nuisance Crito, and the fourth, adrift from
all, and the fifth, good defenders, if not believers, of the
popular superstitions? I presume I may believe that
such is the case with you. I trust so, for the times are
not favorable for the Christians, and I would like to
know that you were not of them.'
`I am however of them, heart and soul. I have been
a Christian ever since I first thoroughly comprehended
what it meant.'
`But how can it be possible that, standing as you do
at the head as it were of the nobility and wealth of
Rome, you can confound yourself with this obscure and
vulgar tribe? I know that some few of reputation are
with them beside yourself; but how few! Come, come,
disabuse yourself of this error and return to the old, safe,
and reputable side.'
`If mere fancy, Marcellinus, had carried me over to
the Christians, fancy or whim might bring me away
from them. But if it be, on the other hand, a question
of truth, then it is clear, fashion and respectability, and
even what is safest, or most expedient, are arguments
not to be so much as lisped.'
`No more, no more! I see how it is. You are fairly
gone from us. Nevertheless, though it may be thought
needful to check the growth of this sect, I shall hope
that your bark may sail safely along. But this reported
disappearance of Aurelia shows that danger is not far
off.'
`Do you then credit the rumor?'
`I can do no otherwise. It is in every part of the
town. I shall learn at the Capitol. I go to meet the
senate.'
`One moment: Is my judgment of the senate a right
one in this, that it would not second Aurelian in an
attack
upon the privileges, property, or lives of the
Christians
?'
`I think it is. Although, as I know, there are but
few Christians in the body  how many you know
surely better than I  yet I am persuaded it would be
averse to acts of intolerance and persecution. Will you
not accompany me to the sitting?'
`Not so early. I am first bound elsewhere.'
You know, Fausta, that I avoid the senate. Being
no longer a senate, a Roman senate, but a mere
gathering
of the flatterers of the reigning emperor, whoever
he may be, neither pleasure nor honor can come of their
company. There is one aspect however, at the present
moment, in which this body is to be contemplated with
interest. It is not, in matters of religion, a superstitious
body. Here it stands, between Aurelian with the
populace
on his side, and the Christians, or whatever
religious
body or sect there should be any design to oppress
or exterminate. It consists of the best and noblest, and
richest, of Rome; of those who have either imbibed their
opinions in philosophy and religion from the ancient
philosophers
or their living representatives, or are indifferent
and neglectful of the whole subject; which is the more
common case. In either case they are as a body
tolerant
of the various forms which religion or superstition
may assume. The only points of interest or inquiry
with them would be, whether any specified faith or
ceremonies
tended to the injury of the state? whether they
affected to its damage the existing order of civil affairs?
These questions being answered favorably on the part
of the greater number, there would be no disposition to
interfere. Of Christianity, the common judgment in
that body, and among those in the capital who are of
the same general rank, is for the most part favorable.
It is commended for its modesty, for the quiet and
unostentatious
manner in which its religious affairs are
managed
,
and for the humble diligence with which it
concerns
itself with the common people and the poor,
teaching them their truths, whatever they may be, and
especially ministering so largely to their outward
necessities
.
I am persuaded, any decision of the senate
concerning
the Christians would be indulgent and
paternal
,
and that it would in opinion and feeling be
opposed
to any violence whatever on the part of Aurelian.
But then, alas! it is little that they can do with even
the best purposes. The emperor is absolute  the only
power, in truth, in the state. The senate exists but
in name and form. It has even less independent
power than that of Palmyra had under Zenobia.
Yours indeed was dependent through affection and trust,
reposing in a higher wisdom than its own. This,
through fear and the spirit of flattery. So many
members
too were added, after the murderous thinning of its
seats in the affair of the mint, that now scarce a voice
would be raised in open opposition to any course the
emperor might adopt. The new members being
moreover
of newer families, nearer the people, are less
inclined
than the others to resist any of his measures.
Still it is most evident, that there is an under current of
ill-will, opposition, jealousy, distrust, running through
the body, which, if the opportunity should present itself
and there were courage enough for the work, may show
itself and make itself felt and respected. The senate, in
a word, though slavish and subservient, is not friendly.
But I am detaining you from the company of
Demetrius
,
of which you were always fond. I soon reached
his rich establishment, and being assured that he of
Palmyra
was within, I entered. I was carried through
many apartments, filled with those who were engaged in
some one of the branches of this beautiful art, to that
which was sacred to the labors of the two brothers, who
are employed solely in the invention of the designs of
their several works, in drawing the plans, in preparing
the models, and then of overseeing the younger artists at
their tasks, themselves performing all the higher and
more difficult parts and processes of their art.
Demetrius
was working alone at his statue; the room, in
which he was, being filled either with antiquities in
brass, ivory, silver, or gold, or with finished specimens
of their own skill, all disposed with the utmost taste and
with all the advantages to be derived from the
architecture
of the room, from a soft and mellowed light,
resembling
moonlight, which came through alabaster
windows
,
and from the rich cloths, silks, and other stuffs,
and the highly ornamented cases in which various
articles
of greatest perfection and value were kept and
exhibited
.
Here stood the enthusiast, applying himself so
intently to his task, that he neither heard the door of the
apartment as it opened, nor the voice of the slave who
announced my name. But in a moment, as he
suddenly
retreated to a dark recess to observe from that
point the effect of his touches as he proceeded, he saw
me, and cried out,
`Most glad to greet you here, Piso; your judgment
is at this very point what I shall be thankful for. Here,
if it please you, move to the very spot in which I now
am in, and tell me especially this, whether the finger of
the right hand should not be turned a line farther
toward
the left of the figure. The metal is obstinate, but
still it can be bent if necessary. Now judge, and speak
your judgment frankly, for my sake.'
I sank back into the recess as desired, and considered
attentively the whole form, rough now and from the
moulds, and receiving the first finishing touches from
the rasp and the chisel. I studied it long and at my
leisure, Demetrius employing himself busily about
some other matters. It is a beautiful and noble figure,
worthy any artist's reputation of any age, and of a
place in the magnificent temple for which it is designed.
So I assured Demetrius, giving him at length my
opinion
upon every part. I ended with telling him I did
not believe that any effect would be gained by altering
the present direction of the finger. It had come perfect
from the moulds.
`Is that your honest judgment, Piso? Christians,
they say, ever speak the exact truth. Fifty times have
I gone where you now are to determine the point. My
brother says it is right. But I cannot tell. I have
attempted
the work in too much haste; but Aurelian
thinks, I believe, that a silver man may be made as
easily as a flesh one may be unmade. Rome is not
Palmyra, Piso. What a life there for an artist! Calm
as a summer sea. Here! by all the gods and
goddesses
!
if one hears of anything but of blood and death!
Heads all on where they should be to-day, to-morrow
are off. To-day, captives cut up on the altars of some
accursed god, and to-morrow thrown to some savage
beast no better and no worse for the entertainment of
savages worse than either or all. The very boys in the
streets talk of little else than of murderous sports of
gladiators
or wild animals. I swear to you, a man can
scarce collect or keep his thoughts here. What's this
about the Christians too? I marvel, Piso, to see you
here with your head on! They say you are to be all
cut up root and branch. Take my advice, and fly with
me back to Palmyra! Not another half year would I
pass among these barbarians for all the patronage of the
emperor, his minions, and the senate at their back.
What say you?'
`No, Demetrius, I cannot go; but I should not blame
you for going. Rome is no place, I agree with you, for
the life contemplative, or for the pure and innocent
labors
of art. It is the spot for intense action; but '
`Suffering you mean '
`That too, most assuredly, but of action too. It is the
great heart of the world.'
`Black as Erebus and night.'
`Yes, but still a great one, and which, if it can be
once made to beat true, will send its blood then a pure
and life-giving current to the remotest extremities of the
world, which is its body. I hope for the time to come
when this will be true. There is more goodness in
Rome, Demetrius, than you have heard of or know of.
There is a people here worth saving: I, with the other
Christians, am set to this work. We must not
abandon
it.'
`'T will be small comfort though, should you all
perish
doing it.'
`Our perishing might be but the means of new and
greater multitudes springing up to finish what we had
VOL. I. 18
begun, but left incomplete. There is great life in death.
Blood spilled upon the ground is a kind of seed that
comes up men. Truth is not extinguished by putting
out life. It then seems to shine the more brightly as if
the more to cheer and comfort those who are suffering
and dying for it.'
`That may be or may not,' said the artist, `here and
there; but, in my judgment, if this man-slayer, this
world-butcher once fastens his clutches upon your tribe
he will leave none to write your story. How many
were left in Palmyra?  Just, Piso, resume your point of
observation, and judge whether this fold of the drapery
were better as it is, or joined to the one under it, an
alteration
easily made.'
I gave him my opinion, and he went on filing and
talking.
`And now, Piso, if I must tell you, I have conceived
a liking for you Christians, and it is for this reason
partly I would have you set about to escape the evil that
is threatened at least. Here is my brother, whose equal
the world does not hold, is become a Christian. Then
do you know here is a family, just in the rear of our
shop, of one Macer, a Christian and a preacher, that has
won upon us strangely. I see much of them. Some
of his boys are in a room below, helping on by their
labor the support of their mother and those who are
younger, for I trow Macer himself does little for them,
whatever he may be doing for the world at large, or its
great heart as you call it. But what is more still,' cried
he with emphasis and a jump at the same moment,
throwing down his tools, `do you know the Christians
have some sense of what is good in our way? they
aspire to the elegant as well as others who are in better
esteem.'
And as he finished, he threw open the doors of a
small cabinet, and displayed a row of dishes, cups, and
pitchers, of elegant form and workmanship.
`These,' he went on, `are for the church of Felix the
bishop of the Christians. What they do with them I
know not, but as I was told by the bishop, they have a
table or altar of marble on which at certain times they are
arranged for some religious rite or other. They are not
of gold, as they seem, but of silver gilded. My brother
furnished the designs and put them into the hands of
Flaccus, who wrought them. Neither I nor my brother
could labor at them, as you may believe, but it shows a
good ambition in the Christians to try for the first skill
in Rome or the world,  does it not? They are a
promising people.'
Saying which he closed the doors and flew to his
work again.
At the same moment the door of the apartment
opened, and the brother Demetrius entered accompanied
by Probus. When our greetings were over, Probus
said, continuing as it seemed a conversation just broken
off,
`I did all I could to prevent it, but the voice of
numbers
was against me, and of authority too, and both
together
they prevailed. You, I believe, stood neuter, or
indeed I may suppose knew nothing about the
difference
?'
`As you suppose,' replied the elder Demetrius, `I
knew nothing of it, but designed the work and have
completed it. Here it is.' And going to the same
cabinet
,
again opened the doors and displayed the contents.
Probus surveyed them with a melancholy air, saying,
as he did so,
`I could bear that the vessels used for the purpose to
which these are destined should be made of gold, or
even of diamond itself, could mines be found to furnish
it, and skill to hollow it out. For the wine which these
shall hold is that which, in the way of symbol, shadows
forth the blood of Christ which, by being shed on the
cross, purchased for us this truth, this faith, and hope,
from which we derive so much happiness, and which
are to be an inheritance of happiness infinitely better
and more complete than that which we enjoy in these
days of fear, to the world through all ages. What
should be set out with every form of human honor and
decoration, if not this?'
`I think so,' replied Demetrius; `to that which we
honor and reverence in our hearts we must add the
outward
sign and testimony, especially if we would affect
in the same way that ours are the minds of others.
Paganism
understands this; and it is the pomp and
magnificence
of her ceremony, the richness of the temple
service, the grandeur of her architecture, and the
imposing
array of her priests in their robes, ministering at
the altars or passing through the streets in gorgeous
procession, with banners, victims, garlands, and music,
by which the populace are gained and kept. That must
be excellent and highly to be esteemed, they say, on
which the great, the learned, and the rich, above all the
state itself, are so prompt to lavish so much splendor
and wealth.'
`But here is a great danger,' Probus replied. `This
carried too far may convert religion into show and
ostentation
.
Form and ceremony, and all that is merely
outward
and material, may take the place of the moral and
spiritual. Religion may come to be a thing apart by
itself
,
a great act, a tremendous and awful rite, a
magnificent
and imposing ceremony, instead of what it is in
itself, simply a principle of right action toward man and
toward God. This is at present just the character and
position of the Roman religion. It is a thing that is to
be seen at the temples, but nowhere else; it is a worship
through sacrifices and prayers, and that is all. The
worshipper
at the temple may be a tyrant at home, a
profligate
in the city, a bad man everywhere, and yet none
the less a true worshipper. May God save the religion
of Christ from such corruption! Yet is the beginning
to be discerned. A decline has already begun. Rank
and power are already sought with an insane ambition,
and to perpetuate and render more imposing the power,
the same means are resorted to by Christian ministers
that have been by Roman emperors. The people are
dazzled by state and show, and so blinded to the
encroachments
made upon their liberty. Some too, with
a less criminal motive, but with an aim quite as
mistaken
,
seek to transfer to Christianity the same outward
splendor and the same gilded trappings which they see
so to subdue the imagination  and by that lead them
captive  of the common people. Hence, Piso and
Demetrius
,
the golden chair of Felix, and his robes of
audience
,
on which there is more gold as I believe than
would gild all these cups and pitchers; hence too the
finery of the table, the picture behind it, and, in some
churches the statues of Christ and of Paul and Peter.
VOL. I. 18*
These golden vessels for the supper of Christ's love, I
can forgive  I can welcome them  but in the rest
that has come and is coming, I see signs of danger.'
`But, most excellent Probus,' said the younger
Demetrius
,
`I like not to hear the arts assailed and
represented
dangerous, and I like your way the less for what
you have now said. I have just been telling Piso, that
you are a people to be respected, for you were
beginning
to honor the arts. But here now have you just
denounced them. What harm could it do any good
man among you to come and look at this figure of
Apollo, or a statue of your Paul or Peter, as you name
them  supposing they were just men and benefactors
of their race?'
`There ought to be none,' Probus replied. `It ought
to be a source of innocent pleasure, if not of wholesome
instruction, to gaze upon the imitated form of a good
man  of a reformer, a benefactor, a prophet. But man
is so prone to religion, that you can scarce place before
him an object of reverence but he will straightway
worship
it. What were your gods but once men, first
revered
,
then worshipped, and now their stone images
deemed to be the very gods themselves? Thus the
original and natural idea of one supreme Deity has been
almost lost out of the world. Let the figure of Christ
be everywhere set before the people, and what with the
natural tendency of the mind, and what with the force
of example in the common religion, I fear it would not
be long before he, whom we now revere as a prophet,
would be worshipped as a god; and the disciples whom
you have named, soon in like manner, would no longer
be remembered with gratitude and affection as those who
devoted their lives to the service of their fellow-men,
but adored superstitiously as inferior Deities, like your
Castor and Pollux. I can conceive that in the lapse of
ages men shall be so redeemed from the gross
conceptions
that now inthrall them concerning both God and
his worship, and so nourished up to a divine strength
by the power of truth, that they shall be in no danger
from such sources, but shall reap all the pleasure and
advantage which can be derived either from beautiful
forms of art and the representation of great and
excellent
characters, without ever dreaming that any other
than the infinite and invisible Spirit of the universe is
to be worshipped, or held divine. The religion of Christ
will itself, if aught can do it, bring about such a period.'
`That then will be the time for artists to live, next
after now,' said Demetrius of Palmyra. `In the
meantime
,
Probus, if Hellenism should decline and die, and
your strict faith take its place, art will decline and
perish
.
We live chiefly by the gods and their worship.'
`If our religion,' replied Probus, `should suffer injury
from its own professors, in the way it has, for a century
or two more, it will give occupation enough to artists.
Its corruptions will do the same for you that the reign of
absolute and perfect truth would.'
`The gods then grant that the corruptions you speak
of may come in season, before I die. I am tired of
Jupiters
,
Mercuries, and Apollos. I have a great fancy to
make a statue of Christ. Brother! what think you,
should I reach it? Most excellent Probus, should I
make you such an one for your private apartments I do
not believe you would worship it, and doubtless it would
afford you pleasure. If you will leave a commission for
such a work, it shall be set about so soon as this god of
the emperor's is safe on his pedestal. What think
you?'
`I should judge you took me, Demetrius, for the priest
of a temple, or a noble of the land. The price of such
a piece of sculpture would swallow up more than all I
am worth. Besides, though I might not worship
myself
though I say not but I might  I should give an
ill example to others, who, if they furnished themselves
or their churches with similar forms, might not have
power over themselves, but relapse into the idolatry
from which they are but just escaped.'
`All religions, as to their doctrine and precept, are
alike to me,' replied Demetrius, `only as a general
principle
I should ever prefer that which had the most gods.
Rome shows excellent judgment in adopting all the gods
of the earth, so that if the worship of one god will not
bring prosperity to the nation, there are others in plenty
to try their fortune with again. Never doubt, brother,
that it is because you Christians have no gods, that the
populace and others are so hostile to you. Only set up
a few images of Christ, and some of the other founders
of the religion, and your peace will be made.
Otherwise
I fear this man-killer will, like some vulture, pounce
upon you and tear you piecemeal. What, brother,
have you learned of Aurelia?'
`Nothing with certainty. I could find only a
confirmation
from every mouth, but based on no certain
knowledge, of the rumor that reached us early in the
morning. But what is so universally reported,
generally
turns out true. I should however, if I believed the
fact of her imprisonment, doubt the cause. I said that
I could conceive of no other cause, and feared that
if the fact were so, the religion of Aurelian was the
reason of her being so dealt with. It was like
Aurelian
,
if he had resolved upon oppressing the
Christians
to any extent whatever, that he should begin with
those who were nearest to him; first with his own
blood, and then with those of his household.'
With this and such like conversation I passed a
pleasant hour at the rooms of Demetrius.
My wish was, as I turned from the apartments of
Demetrius
,
to seek the emperor or Livia, and learn from
them the exact truth concerning the reports current
through the city. But giving way to that weakness
which defers to the latest possible moment the
confirmation
of painful news and the resolution of doubts which
one would rather should remain as doubts than be
determined
in the wrong way, in melancholy mood I
turned and retraced my steps. My melancholy was
changed to serious apprehension by all that I observed
and heard on my way to the Clian. As the crowd in
this great avenue, the Suburra, pressed by me, it was
easy to gather that the Christians had become the
universal
topic of conversation and dispute. The name of
the unhappy Aurelia frequently caught my ear.
Threatening
and ferocious language dropt from many, who
seemed glad that at length an emperor had arisen who
would prove faithful to the institutions of the country.
I joined a little group of gazers before the window of
the rooms of Periander, at which something rare and
beautiful is always to be seen, and who I found were
looking intently at a picture, apparently just from the
hands of the artist, which represented Rome under the
form of a beautiful woman  Livia had served as the
model  with a diadem upon her head, and the badges
of kingly authority in her hands, and at her side a
priest of the Temple of Jupiter, Greatest and Best,
in whose face and form might plainly be traced the
cruel features of Fronto. The world was around
them. On the lowest earth, with dark shadows
settling
over them, lay scattered and broken, in
dishonor
and dust, the emblems of all the religions of
the world, their temples fallen and in ruins. Among
them, in the front ground of the picture, was the
prostrate cross, shattered as if dashed from the church
whose dilapidated walls and wide-spread fragments
bore testimony not so much to the wasting power of
time as to the rude hand of popular violence; while
rearing themselves up into a higher atmosphere the
temples of the gods of Rome stood beautiful and
perfect
,
bathed in the glowing light of a morning sun.
The allegory was plain and obvious enough. There
was little attractive save the wonderful art with which
it was done. This riveted the eye; and that
being
gained, the bitter and triumphant bigotry of the
ideas set forth had time to make its way into the heart
of the beholder, and help to change its warm blood to
gall. Who but must be won by the form and
countenance
of the beautiful Livia? and confounding Rome
with her, be inspired with a new devotion to his country,
and its religion, and its lovely queen? The work was
inflaming and insidious, as it was beautiful. This was
seen in what it drew from those among whom I stood.
`By Jupiter!' said one, `that is well done. They
are all down, who can deny it! Those are ruins not to
be built up again. Who knows who the artist is? He
must be a Roman to the last drop of his blood and the
least hair of his beard.'
`His name is Sporus,' replied his companion, `as I
hear, a kinsman of Fronto the priest of Apollo.'
`Ah, that 's the reason the priest figures here,' cried
the first, `and the empress too; for they say nobody is
more at the Gardens than Fronto. Well, he 's just the
man for his place. If any man can bring up the
temples
again, it 's he. Religion is no sham at the Temple
of the Sun. The priests are all what they pretend to
to be. Let others do so, and we shall have as much
reason to thank the emperor for what he has done for
the gods  and so for us all  as for what he has done
for the army, the empire, and the city.'
`You say well. He is for once a man who, if he
will, may make Rome what she was before the empire,
a people that honored the gods. And this picture seems
as if it spoke out his very plans, and I should not
wonder
if it were so.'
`Never doubt it. See, here lies a Temple of Isis flat
enough; next to it one of the accursed tribe of Jews,
and what ruder pile is that?'
`That must be a temple of the British worship, as I
think. But the best of all is this Christian church: see
how the wretches fly while the work goes on! In my
notion, this paints what we may soon see.'
`I believe it. The gods grant it so! Old men, in my
judgment, will live to see it all acted out. Do you hear
what is said? That Aurelian has put to death his own
niece, the princess Aurelia?'
`That 's likely enough,' said another, `no one can
doubt it. 'T is easy news to believe in Rome. But the
question is, what for?'
`No doubt for her impiety, and her aims to convert
Mucapor to her own ways.'
`Well, there is no telling, and it 's no great matter;
time will show. Meanwhile, Aurelian forever! He 's
the man for me!'
`Truly is he,' said one at his side who had not spoken
before, `for thy life is spent at the amphitheatres, and
he is a good caterer for thee, sending in ample supplies
of lions and men.'
`Whew! who is here? Take care! Your tongue,
old man, has short space to wag in.'
`I am no Christian, knave, but I trust I am a man:
and that is more than any can say of you, that know
you. Out upon you for a savage!'
The little crowd burst into loud laughter at this, and
with various abusive epithets moved away. The old
man addressed himself to me, who alone remained as
they withdrew,
`Aurelian I believe would do well enough were he
let alone. He is inclined to cruelty I know: but nobody
can deny that, cruel or not, he has wrought most
beneficial
changes both in the army and in the city. He has
been in some sort, up to within the last half year, a
censor
greater than Valerian; a reformer, greater and
bettor
than even he. Had he not been crazed by his
successes
in the East, and were he not now led, and driven,
and maddened, by the whole priesthood of Rome, with
the hell-born Fronto at their head, we might look for a
new Rome. But as it is, I fear these young savages
who are just gone will see all fulfilled they are praying
for. A fair day to you.'
And he too turned away. Others were come into the
same spot, and for a long time did I listen to similar
language
.
Many came, looked, said nothing, and took their
way, with paler face, and head depressed, silent under
the imprecations heaped upon the atheists, but
manifestly
either of their side in sympathy, or else of the
very atheists themselves. I now sought my home, tired
of the streets, of all I had seen and heard. Many of
my acquaintance and friends passed me on the way, in
whose altered manner I could behold the same signs
which in ruder form I had just seen at the window of
Periander. Not, Fausta, that all my friends of the
Roman
faith are summer ones, but that perhaps most are.
Many among them, though attached firmly as my
mother to the existing institutions, are yet like her
possessed
of the common sentiments of humanity, and
would venture much or all to divert the merest shadow
of harm from my head. Among these I still pass some
of my pleasantest and most instructive hours  for with
them the various questions involved in the whole
subject
of religion are discussed with the most perfect
freedom
and mutual confidence. Varus the prefect, whom
I met among others, greeted me with unchanged
courtesy
.
His sweetest smile was on his countenance as he
swept by me, wishing me a happy day. How much
more tolerable is the rude aversion or loud reproaches
of those I have told you of, than this honied suavity,
that means nothing and would be still the same though
I were on the way to the block.
As I entered my library, Solon accosted me to say,
that there had been one lately there most urgent to see
me. From his account, I could suppose it to be none
other than the Jew Isaac, who, Milo has informed me,
VOL. I. 19
is now returned to Rome, which he resorts to as his
most permanent home. Solon said that, though assured
I was not at home, he would not be kept back, but
pressed on into the house, saying that `these Roman
nobles often sat quietly in their grand halls, while they
were denied to their poor clients. Piso was an old
acquaintance
of his when in Palmyra, and he had
somewhat
of moment to communicate to him and must see
him.'
`No sooner,' said Solon, `had he got into the library,
the like of which I may safely affirm he had never seen
before, for his raiment betokened a poor and ragged life,
than he stood and gazed as much at his ease as if it had
been his own, and then, by Hercules! unbuttoning his
pack, for he was burdened with one both before and
behind
,
he threw his old limbs upon a couch and began to
survey the room! I could not but ask him, `If he were
the elder Piso, old Cneius Piso, come back from Persia,
in Persian beard and gown?'`Old man,' said he, `your
brain is turned with many books, and the narrow life
you live here, shut out from the living world of man.
One man is worth all the books ever writ, save those of
Moses. Go out into the streets and read him, and your
senses will come again. Cneius Piso! Take you me
for a spirit? I am Isaac the Jew, citizen of the world,
and dealer in more rarities and valuables than you ever
saw or dreamed of. Shall I open my parcels for thee?'
`No,' said I, `I would not take thy poor gewgaws for a
gift. One worm-eaten book is worth them all.'`God
restore thy reason!' said he, `and give thee wisdom
before
thou diest; and that, by thy wrinkles and hairless
pate, must be soon.' What more of false he would have
added I know not, for at that moment he sprang from
where he sat like one suddenly mad, exclaiming `Holy
Abraham! what do my eyes behold, or do they lie?
Surely that is Moses! Never was he on Sinai, if his
image be not here! Happy Piso! and happy Isaac to
be the instrument of such grace! Who could have
thought it? And yet many a time in my dreams have
I beheld him with a beard like mine, his hat on his
head, his staff in his hand, as if standing at the table of
the Passover, the princess with him, and  dreams will
do such things  a brood of little chickens at their side.
And now  save the last  it is all come to pass. And
here too  who may this be? who but Aaron, the
younger and milder. He was the speaker, and lo! his
hand is stretched out! And this young Joseph is at his
knee the better to interpret his character to the beholder.
Moses and Aaron in the chief room of a Roman senator,
and he a Piso! Now, Isaac, thou mayest tie on thy
pack and take thy leave with a merry heart, for God if
never before now accepteth thy works.' And much
more, noble sir, in the same raving way, which was
more dark to my understanding than the darkest pages
of Aristotle.'
I gathered from Solon that he would return in the
evening in the hope to see me, for he had that to impart
which concerned nearly my welfare.
I was watching with Julia, from the portico which
fronts the Esquiline and overlooks the city, the last rays
of the declining sun, as they gilded the roofs and domes
of the vast sea of building before us, lingering last upon,
and turning to gold, the brazen statues of Antonine and
of Trajan, when Milo approached us, saying that Isaac
had returned. He was in a moment more with us.
`Most noble Piso,' said he, `I joy to see thee again;
and this morning I doubt not I should have seen thee
but for the obstinacy of an ancient man, whose wits
seem to have been left behind as he has gone onward.
I seek thee, Piso, for matters of moment. Great
princess
,'
he suddenly cried, turning to Julia with as
profound
a reverence as his double burden would allow,
`glad am I to greet thee in Rome; not glad that thou
wert forced to flee here, but glad that if out of
Palmyra
thou art here in the heart of all that can best
minister to thy wants. Not a wish can arise in the
heart but Rome can answer it. Nay, thou canst have
few for that which is rare and costly but even I can
answer
them. Hast thou ever seen, princess, those
diamonds
brought from the caves of mountains a thousand
miles in the heart of India, in which there lurks a tint,
if I may so name it, like this last blush of the western
sky? They are rarer than humanity in a Roman, or
apostacy in a Jew, or truth in a Christian. I shall show
thee one.' And he fell to unlacing his pack and drawing
forth its treasures.
Julia assured him she should see with pleasure
whatever
he could show her of rich or rare.
`There are, lady, jewelers, as they name themselves
in Rome, who dwell in magnificent houses, and whose
shops are half the length of a street, who cannot show
you what Isaac can out of an old goatskin pack. And
how should they? Have they, as I have, traveled the
earth's surface and trafficked between crown and crown?
What king is there, whose necessities I have not
relieved
by purchasing his useless gems; or whose vanity
I have not pleased by selling him the spoils of another?
Old Sapor, proud as he was, was more than once in
the grasp of Isaac. There! it is in this case  down,
you see, in the most secret part of my pack  but
who would look for wealth under this sordid covering?
as who, lady, for a soul within this shriveled and
shattered
body? yet is there one there. In such outside,
both of body and bag, is my safety. Who cares to stop
the poor man, or hold parley with him? None so free
of the world and its high ways as he; safe alike in the
streets of Rome and on the deserts of Arabia. His rags
are a shield stouter than one of seven-fold bull's hide.
Never but in such guise could I bear such jewels
over the earth's surface. Here, lady, is the gem; never
has it yet pressed the finger of queen or subject. The
stone I brought from the East, and Demetrius here in
Rome hath added the gold. Give me so much
pleasure
'
And he placed it upon Julia's finger. It flashed a
light such as we never before saw in stone. It was
evidently
a most rare and costly gem. It was of great size
and of a hue such as I had never before seen.
`This is a queen's ring, Isaac,' said Julia  `and for
none else.'
`It well becomes the daughter of a queen'  replied
the Jew, `and the wife of Piso  specially seeing that
Ah, Piso! Piso! how was I overjoyed to-day to see
in thy room the evidence that my counsels had not been
thrown away. The Christian did not gain thee with all
his cunning.'
`Nay, Isaac'  I here interrupted him  `you must
not let your benevolent wishes lead you into error. I
am not yet a Jew. Those images that caught your eye
were not wholly such as you took them for.'
VOL. I. 19*
`Well, well,' said the philosophic Jew, `rumor then
has for once spoken the truth. She has long, as I learn,
reported thee Christian: but I believed it not. And
to-day
,
when I looked upon those statues, I pleased myself
with the thought that thou, and the princess like her
august mother, had joined yourselves to Israel. But if
it be not so, then have I an errand for thee, which but
now I hoped I might not be bound to deliver. Piso,
there is danger brewing for thee, and for all who hold
with thee!'
`So I hear, Isaac, on all sides and partly believe it.
But the rumor is far beyond the truth, I do not doubt.'
`I think not so,' said Isaac. `I believe the truth is
beyond the rumor. Aurelian intends more and worse
than he has spoken; and already has he dipt his hand
in blood!'
`What say you? how is it you mean?' said Julia.
`Whose name but Aurelia's has been in the city's
ears these many days? I can tell you, what is known
as yet not beyond the emperor's palace and the priest's,
Aurelia is dead!'
`Sport not with us, Isaac.'
`I tell you, Piso, the simple truth. Aurelia has paid
with her life for her faith. I know it from more than
one whose knowledge in the matter is good as sight.
It was in the dungeons of the Fabrician bridge that she
was dealt with by Fronto the priest of Apollo.'
`Aurelian then,' said Julia, `has thrust his sickle into
another field of slaughter, and will not draw it out till
he swims in Christian blood, as once before in Syrian.
God help these poor souls! What, Isaac, was the
manner
of her death, if you have heard so much?'
`I have heard only,' replied Isaac, `that after long
endeavor on the part of Aurelian and the priest to draw
her from her faith while yet at the palace, she was
conveyed
to the prisons I have named, and there given over
to Fronto and the executioners, with this only
restriction
,
that if neither threats, nor persuasions, nor the
horrid
array of engines, could bend her, then should she be
beheaded without either scourging or torture. And so
it was done. She wept, 't is said, as it were without
ceasing, from the time she left the gardens; but to the
priest would answer never a word to all his threats,
entreaties, nor promises; except once, when that wicked
minister said to her, `that except she in reality and truth
would curse Christ and sacrifice, he would report that
she had done so, and so liberate her and return her to
the palace:'  at which, 't is said, that on the instant
her tears ceased, her eyes flashed lightning, and with a
voice, which took the terrific tones of Aurelian himself,
she said, `I dare thee to it, base priest! Aurelian is an
honorable man  though cruel as the grave  and my
simple word, which never yet he doubted, would weigh
more than oaths from thee, though piled to heaven!
Do thy worst then, quick!' Whereupon the priest white
with wrath, first sprang toward her as if he had been a
beast set to devour her, drawing at the same moment a
knife from his robes; but others being there he stopped,
and cried to the executioner to do his work  raving
that he had it not in his power first to torment her.
Aurelia was then instantly beheaded.'
We were silent as he ended, Julia dissolved in tears.
Isaac went on.
`This is great testimony, Piso, which is borne to thy
faith. A poor, weak girl, alone, with not one to look
on and encourage, in such a place, and in the clutches
of such a hard-hearted wretch  to die without once
yielding to her fears or the weakness of her tender
nature
it is a thing hardly to be believed, and full of pity.
Piso, thou wilt despise me when I say that my tribe
rejoices
at this and laughs; that the Jew is seen carrying
the news from house to house, and secretly feeding on
it as a sweet morsel! And why should he not?
Answer
me that, Roman! Answer me that, Christian!
In thee, Piso, and in every Roman like thee, there is
compacted into one the enmity that has both desolated
my country and  far as mortal arm may do so
dragged down to the earth her altars and her worship.
Judea was once happy in her ancient faith; and
happier
than all in that great hope inspired by our prophets
in endless line, of the advent in the opening ages of one
who should redeem our land from the oppressor, and
give to her the empire of the world. Messiah, for whom
we waited, and while we waited were content to bear
the insults and aggressions of the whole earth
knowing
the day of vengeance was not far off  was to be to
Judea more than Aurelian to Rome. He was to be our
prophet, our priest, and our king all in one; not man
only, but the favored and beloved of God, his Son; and
his empire was not to be like this of Rome, hemmed in
by this sea and that, hedged about by barbarians on this
side and another, bounded by rivers and hills, but was
to stretch over the habitable earth, and Rome itself to be
swallowed up in the great possession as a little island
in the sea. And then this great kingdom was never to
end. It could not be diminished by an enemy taking
from it this province and another, as with Rome, nor
could there be out of it any power whatever that could
assail it, for by the interference of God, through the
right arm of our great Prince, fear and the very spirit of
submission were to fall on every heart. All was to be
Judea's, and Judea's forever; the kingdom was to be
over the whole earth; and the reign forever and ever.
And in those ages peace was to be on the earth, and
universal love. God was to be worshipped by all
according
to our law, and idolatry and error cease and
come to an end. In this hope, I say, we were happy,
in spite of all our vexations. In every heart in our
land, whatever sorrows or sufferings might betide, there
was a little corner where the spirit could retire and
comfort
itself with this vision of futurity. Among all the
cities of our land, and far away among the rocks and
vallies
by Jordan and the salt sea, and the mountains of
Lebanon
,
there were no others to be found than men, women,
and children, happy in this belief, and by it bound into
one band of lovers and friends. And what think you
happened
?
I need not tell you. There came, as thou
knowest, this false prophet of Gallilee, and beguiled the
people with his smooth words, and perverted the sense
of the prophets, and sowed difference and discord among
the people; and the cherished vision, upon which the
nation had lived and grown, fled like a dream. The
Gallilean impostor planted himself upon the soil, and his
roots of poison struck down, and his broad limbs shot
abroad, and half the nation was lost. Its unity was
gone, its peace was gone, its heart broken, its hope,
though living still, yet obscured and perplexed. Canst
thou wonder then, Piso, or thou, thou weeping princess,
that the Jew stands by and laughs when the Christian's
turn comes, and the oppressor is oppressed, the destroyer
destroyed? And when, Piso, the Christian had done
his worst, despoiling us of our faith, our hope, our prince
and our God; not satisfied, he brought the Roman upon
us, and despoiled us of our country itself. Now, and
for two centuries all has been gone. Judea, the
beautiful
land, sits solitary and sad. Her sons and daughters
wanderers over the earth, and trodden into the dust.
When shall the light arise! and he, whom we yet look
for, come and turn back the flood that has swept over
us, and reverse the fortunes befallen to one and the
other? The chariot of God tarries; but it does not
halt. The wheels are turning, and when it is not
thought of, it will come rolling onward with the voice of
many thunders, and the great restorations shall be made,
and a just judgment be meted out to all. What
wonder
I say then, Piso, if my people look on and laugh,
when this double enemy is in straits? when the
Christian
and Roman, in one is caught in the snare and
cannot
escape? That laugh will ring through the streets
of Rome, and will out-sound the roaring of the lions and
the shouts of the theatre. Nature is strong in man,
Piso, and I do not believe thou wilt think the worse of
our people, if bearing what they have, this nature should
break forth. Hate them not altogether, Roman, when
thou shalt see them busy at the engines or the stake, or
the theatres. Remember the cause! Remember the
cause! But we are not all such. I wish, Piso, thou
couldst abandon this faith. There will else be no safety
to thee I fear ere not many days. What has overtaken
the lady Aurelia, of the very family of the emperor, will
surely overtake others. Piso, I would fain serve thee if
I may. Though I hate the Roman, and the Christian,
and thee, as a Jew, yet so am I, that I cannot hate them
as a man, or not unto death; and thee do I love. Now
it is my counsel that thou do in season escape. Now
thou canst do it; wait but a few days and perhaps thou
canst no longer. What I say is, fly! and it were best
to the farthest east; first to Palmyra, and then, if need
be, to Persia. This, Piso, is what I am come for.'
`Isaac, this all agrees with the same goodness '
`I am a poor, miserable wretch, whom God may
forgive
,
because his compassions never fail, but who has no
claim on his mercy, and will be content to sit hereafter
where he shall but just catch now and then a glimpse
of the righteous.'
`I must speak my thoughts, not yours, Isaac. This
all agrees with what we have known of you; and with
all our hearts you have our thanks. But we are bound
to this place by ties stronger than any that bind us to
life, and must not depart.'
`Say not so! Lady, speak! Why should ye remain
to add to the number that must fall? Rank will not
stand in the way of Aurelian.'
`That we know well, Isaac,' said Julia. `We should
not look for any shield such as that to protect us, nor
for any other. Life is not the chief thing, Isaac. What
is life without liberty? Would you live a slave? and
is not he the meanest slave, who bends his will to
another? who renounces the thoughts he dearly
cherishes
,
for another's humor? Who will beggar the soul
to save or serve the body?
`Alas, princess, I fear there is more courage in thee,
woman as thou art, than in this old frame! I love my
faith too, princess, and I labor for it in my way; but
may the God of Abraham spare me from the last trial!
And wouldst thou give up thy body to the tormentors
and the executioner, to keep the singleness of thy mind,
so that merely a few little thoughts, which no man can
see, may run in and out of it as they list?'
`Even so, Isaac.'
`It is wonderful,' exclaimed the Jew, `what a strength
there is in man! how for an opinion, which can be
neither
bought nor sold, nor weighed, nor handled, nor
seen; a thing that, by the side of lands, and gold, and
houses, seems less than the dust of the balance, men and
women, yea, and little children, will suffer and die,
when a word too, which is but a little breath blown out
of the mouth, would save them!'
`But it is no longer wonderful,' said Julia, `when we
look at our whole selves, and not only at one part. We
are all double, one part of earth, another of heaven;
one part gross body, the other etherial spirit; one part
life of the body, the other life of the soul. Which of
these parts is the better, it is not hard to determine.
Should I gain much by defiling the heavenly, for the
sake of the earthly? by injuring the mind for the
preservation of the body; by keeping longer the life I
live now, and darkening over the prospect of the life that
is hereafter? If I possess a single truth, which I firmly
believe to be a truth, I cannot say that it is a lie, for the
sake of some present benefit or deliverance, without
fixing
a stain thereby, not on the body which by and by
perishes, but on the soul which is immortal; and which
should forever bear about with it the unsightly spot.
`It is so; it is as you say, lady; and rarely has the
Jew been known to deny his name and his faith. Since
you have spoken, I find thoughts called up which have
long slept. Despise me not, for my proposal, yet I
would there were a way of escape! Flight now would
not be denial nor apostacy?'
`It would not,' said I. `And we may not judge with
harshness those whose human courage fails them under
the apprehension of the horrible sufferings which often
await the persecuted. But with my convictions, and
Piso's, the guilt and baseness of flight or concealment
would be little less than that of denial or apostacy.
We have chosen this religion for its divine truth and its
immortal prospects; we believe it a good which God has
sent to us; we believe it the most valuable possession
we hold; we believe it essential to the world's
improvement
and happiness. Believing it thus, we must stand
by it; and if it come to this  as I trust in Heaven it
will not, notwithstanding the darkness of the portents
that our regard for it will be questioned except we die
for it  then we will die.'
Isaac rose and began to fasten on his pack. As he
did so, he said,
`Excellent lady, I grieve that thou shouldst be
brought from thy far home, and those warm and sunny
skies, to meet the rude shocks of this wintry land. It
was enough to see what thou didst there, and to know
what befell thy ancient friends. The ways of
Providence
to our eyes are darker than the Egyptian night,
brought upon that land by the hand of Moses. It is
darkness solid and impenetrable. The mole sees
farther
toward the earth's centre, than does my dim eye
VOL. I. 20
into the judgments of God. And what wonder? when
he is God looking down upon earth and man's ways as
I upon an ant-hill, and seeing all at once. To such
an eye, lady, that may be best which to mine is
worst.'
`I believe it is often so, Isaac,' replied Julia. `Just
as in nauseous drugs or rankest poisons there is hidden
away medicinal virtue, so is there spiritual balm for the
soul by which its worst diseases are healed and its
highest health promoted, in sufferings which, as they
first fall upon us, we lament as unmitigated evil. I
know of no state of mind so proper to beings like us,
as that indicated by a saying of Christ, which I shall
repeat
to you, though you honor not its source, and which
seems to me to comprehend all religion and philosophy,
Not my will, but thine, O God, be done! We never
take our true position, and so never can be contented
and happy till we renounce our own will, and believe
all the whole providence of God to be wisest and best,
simply because it is his. Should I dare, were the
power this moment given me, to strike out for myself
my path in life, arrange its events, fix my lot? Not
the most trivial incident can be named that I should
not tremble to order otherwise than as it happens.'
`There is wisdom, princess, in the maxim of thy
prophet, and its spirit is found in many of the sayings of
truer prophets who went before him, and whose words
are familiar to thy royal mother, though I fear they are
not to thee; a misfortune wholly to be traced to that
misadventure of thine, Piso, in being thrown into the
company of the Christian Probus on board the
Mediterranean
trader. Had I been alone with thee on that
voyage, who can say that thou wouldst not now have
been what but this morning I took thee for, as I looked
upon those marble figures?'
`But, Isaac, forget not your own principles,' said Julia.
`May you who cannot, as you have said, see the end
from the beginning, and whose sight is but a mole's,
dare to complain of the providence which threw Piso
into the society of the Christian Probus? I am sure you
would not, on reflection, re-arrange those events, were
it now permitted you. And seeing, Isaac, how much
better things are ordered by the Deity than we could do
it, and how we should choose voluntarily to surrender
all into his hands, whose wisdom is so much more
perfect
,
and whose power is so much more vast, than ours,
ought we not, as a necessary consequence of this, to
acquiesce
in events without complaint, when they have
once occurred? If Providence has made both Piso and
Probus Christians, then ought you not to complain, but
acquiesce; and more than that, revere the Providence
that has done it, and love those none the less whom it
has directed into the path in which it would have them
go. True piety is the mother of charity.'
`Princess,' rejoined Isaac, `you are right. The true
love of God cannot exist without making us true lovers
of man; and Piso I do love, and think none the worse
of him for his Christian name. But touching Probus
and others I experience some difficulty. Yet may I
perhaps escape thus  I may love them as men, yet
hate them as Christians; just as I would bind up the
wounds of a thief or an assassin whom I found by the
wayside, and yet the next hour bear witness against
him, and without compunction behold him swinging
upon the gibbet! It is hard, lady, for the Jew to love a
Christian and a Roman.  But how have I been led
away from what I wished chiefly to say before
departing
!
When I spake just now of the darkness of
Providence
,
I was thinking, Piso, of my journey across the
desert for thy Persian brother Calpurnius. That, as I
then said to thee, was dark to me. I could not
comprehend
how it should come to pass that I, a Jew, of no
less zeal than Simon Ben Gorah himself, should tempt
such dangers in the service of thee, a Roman and half a
Christian.'
`And is the enigma solved at length?' asked Julia.
`I could have interpreted it by saying that the merit of
doing a benevolent action was its solution.'
`That was little or nothing, princess. But I confess
to thee that the two gold talents of Jerusalem were
much. Still neither they, nor what profit I made in
the streets of Ecbatana, and even out of that new
Solomon
the hospitable Levi, clearly explained the riddle.
I have been in darkness till of late. And how think
you the darkness has been dispersed?'
`We cannot tell.'
`I believe not. Piso! princess! I am the happiest
man in Rome.'
`Not happier, Isaac, than Civilis the perfumer.'
`Name him not, Piso. Of all the men  he is no
man  of all the living things in Rome I hold him
meanest. Him, Piso, I hate. Why, I will not tell thee,
but thou mayest guess. Nay, not now. I would have
thee first know why I am the happiest man in Rome.
Remember you the woman and the child, whom in the
midst of that burning desert we found sitting more dead
than alive at the roots of a cedar? the wife, as we
afterwards
found, of Hassan the camel-driver; and how that
child, the living resemblance of my dead Joseph, wound
itself round my heart, and how I implored the mother
to trust it to me as mine and I would make it richer
than the richest of Ecbatana?'
`We remember it all well.'
`Well, rejoice with me! Hassan is dead!'
`Rejoice in her husband's death? Nay, that we
cannot
do. Milo will rejoice with thee.'
`Rejoice with me then that Hassan, being dead by the
providence of God, Hagar and Ishmael are now mine!'
and the Jew threw down his pack again in the excess
of his joy, and strode wildly about the portico.
`This is something indeed,' said Julia. `Now we
can rejoice sincerely with you. But how happened all
this? When and how have you obtained the news?'
`Hassan,' replied Isaac, `as Providence willed it, died
in Palmyra. His disconsolate widow, hearing of his
death, in her poverty and affliction bethought herself of
me, and applied for intelligence of me to Levi; from
whom a letter came, saying that Hagar had made now
on her part the proposal that had once been made on
mine  that Ishmael should be mine provided he was
not to be separated from his mother and a sister older
than he by four years. I indeed proposed not for the
woman, but for the child only  nor for the sister. But
they will all be welcome. They must by this be in
Palmyra on their way to Rome. Yes, they will be all
welcome! for now once more shall the pleasant bonds
of a home hold me, and the sounds of children's voices
sweeter to my ear than will ever be the harps of angels
VOL. I. 20*
though Gabriel sweep the strings. Already in the street
Janus, where our tribe most resort, have I purchased me
a house; not, Roman, such a one as I dwelt in in
Palmyra
,
where thou and thy foolish slave searched me
out, but large and well-ordered, abounding with all that
woman's heart could most desire. And now what think
you of all this? whither tends it? to what leads all this
long and costly preparation? what think you is to come
of it? I have my own judgment. This I know, it
cannot
be all for this, that a little child of a few years should
come and dwell with an old man little removed from
the very borders of the grave! Had it been only for
this, so large and long a train of strange and wild events
would not have been laid. This child, Piso, is more
than he seems! take that and treasure it up. It is to
this the finger of God has all along pointed. He is
more than he seems! What he will be I say not, but I
can dimly  nay clearly guess. And his mother! Piso,
what will you think when I say that she is a Jewess!
and his father  what will you think when I tell you
that he was born upon the banks of the Gallilean lake?
that misfortunes and the love of a wandering life drew
him from Judea to the farther East, and to a temporary
and but apparent apostacy, I am persuaded, from his
proper faith? This to me is all wonderful. Never
have I doubted, that by my hand, by me as a mediator
some great good was to accrue to Jerusalem. And now
the clouds divide, and my eye sees what has been so
long concealed. It shall all come to pass, before thy
young frame, princess, shall be touched by years.'
`We wish you all happiness and joy, Isaac,' replied
Julia; `and soon as this young family shall have
reached your dwelling, we shall trust to see them all,
specially this young object of thy great expectations.'
Isaac again fastened on his pack, and taking leave of
us turned to depart, but ere he did so, he paused  fixed
his dark eyes upon us  hesitated  and then said,
`Lady, if trouble flow in upon you here in Rome, and
thou wilt not fly as I have counseled to Palmyra; but
thou shouldst by and by change thy mind and desire
safety, or Piso should wish thee safe  perhaps that
by thy life thou mightest work more mightily for thy
faith than thou couldst do by thy death  for
oftentimes
it is not by dying that we best serve God, but by
living  then bethink thee of my dwelling in the street
Janus, where, if thou shouldst once come, I would
challenge
all the blood-hounds in Rome, and what is more
and worse, Fronto and Varus leagued, to find thee.
Peace be with you.'
And so saying, he quickly parted from us.
All Rome, Fausta, holds not a man of a larger heart
than Isaac the Jew. For us, Christians as we are,
there is I believe no evil to himself he would not
hazard
,
if in no other way he could shield us from the
dangers
that impend. In his conscience he feels bound to
hate us, and often from the language he uses it might
be inferred that he does so. But in any serious
expression
of his feelings his human affections ever obtain the
victory over the obligations of hatred which his love of
country as he thinks imposes upon him, and it would
be difficult for him to manifest a warmer regard toward
any of his own tribe than he does toward Julia and
myself
.
He is firmly persuaded that providence is using
him as an instrument by which to effect the redemption
and deliverance of his country; not that he himself is
to prove the messiah of his nation  as they term their
great expected prince  but that through him, in some
manner, by some service rendered or office filled, that
great personage will manifest himself to Israel. No
disappointment damps his zeal, or convinces him of the
futility of expectations resting upon no other foundation
than his own inferences, conjectures, or fanciful
interpretation
of the dark sayings of the prophets. When
in the East, it was through Palmyra that his country was
to receive her king; through her victories that
redemption
was to be wrought out for Israel. Being compelled
to let go that dear and cherished hope, he now fixes it
upon this little Joseph, and it will not be strange if
this child of poverty and want should in the end inherit
all his vast possessions, by which he will please himself
with thinking he can force his way to the throne of
Judea. Portia derives great pleasure from his
conversation
,
and frequently detains him long for that purpose,
and of her Isaac is never weary of uttering the loudest
and most extravagant praise. I sometimes wonder that
I never knew him before the Mediterranean voyage,
seeing he was so well known to Portia; but then again
I do not, when I remember by what swarms of
mendicants
,
strangers, and impostors of every sort, Portia was
ever surrounded, from whom I turned instinctively
away; especially did I ever avoid all intercourse with
Christians and Jews. I held them, of all, lowest and
basest.
We are just returned from Tibur, where we have
enjoyed
many pleasant hours with Zenobia. Livia was
there also. The day was in its warmth absolutely
Syrian, and while losing ourselves in the mazes of the
queen's extensive gardens, we almost fancied ourselves
in Palmyra. Nicomachus being of the company, as he
ever is, and Vabalathus, we needed but you,
Calpurnius
,
and Gracchus, to complete the illusion.
The queen devotes herself to letters. She is rarely
drawn from her favorite studies but by the arrival of
friends from Rome. Happy for her is it that, carried back
to other ages by the truths of history, or transported to
other worlds by the fictions of poetry, the present and
the recent can be in a manner forgotten; or at least
that in these intervals of repose the soul can gather
strength for the thoughts and recollections which will
intrude, and which still sometimes overmaster her.
Her correspondence with you is another chief solace.
She will not doubt that by and by a greater pleasure
awaits her, and that instead of your letters she shall
receive
and enjoy yourself. Farewell.
LETTER VII.
FROM PISO TO FAUSTA.
The
body of the Christians, as you may well suppose,
Fausta, is in a state of much agitation. Though they
cannot discern plainly the form of the danger that
impends
,
yet they discern it; and the very obscurity in
which it is involved perhaps adds to their fears. It is
several days since I last wrote, yet not a word has come
from the palace. Aurelian is seen as usual in all public
places; at the capitol; taking charge of the erection and
completion of various public edifices; or if at the palace
he rides as hard as ever and as much upon his
Hippodrome
;
or if at the Pretorian camp, he is exact and
severe as ever in maintaining the discipline of the
Legions
.
He has issued no public order of any kind that
bears upon us. Yet not only the Christians, but the
whole city, stand as if in expectation of measures of no
little severity, going at least to the abridgement of many
of our liberties, and to the deprivation of many
privileges
.
This is grounded chiefly doubtless upon the
reported
imprisonment of Aurelia; for though some have
little hesitation in declaring their belief that she has
been made way with, others believe it not at all, and
none can assign a reason for receiving one story rather
than another. How Isaac came to be possessed of his
information I do not know, but it bore all the marks of
truth. He would inform me neither how he came by
it, nor would he allow it to be communicated. But it
would never be surprising to discover, that of my most
private affairs he has a better knowledge than myself.
Do not, from what I have said, conceive of the
Christians
as giving any signs of unmanly fear. They
perceive
that danger threatens, but they change not their
manner of life, nor turn from the daily path of their
pursuits. Believing in a providence, they put their
trust in it. Their faith stands them in stead as a
sufficient
support and refuge. They cannot pretend, any
more than Isaac, to see through the plans and purposes
of Heaven. They pretend not to know, nor to be able
to explain to another, why, if what they receive is the
truth and they are true believers in a true religion, they
should be exposed to such sufferings for its sake; and
that which is false, and injurious as false, should
triumph
.
It is enough for them, they say, to be fully
persuaded; to know and possess the truth. They can
never relinquish it; they will rather die. But whether
Christianity die with them or not they cannot tell  that
they leave to God. They do not believe that it will
prophecy and the present condition of the world
notwithstanding
a present overhanging cloud, give them
confidence in the ultimate extension and power of their
faith. At any rate it shall receive no injury at their
hands. They have professed it during twenty years of
prosperity and have boasted of it before the world  they
shall profess it with the same boldness and the same
grateful
attachment now that adversity approaches. They are
fixed  calm  unmoved. Except for a deeper tone of
earnestness and feeling when you converse with them,
and a cast sadness upon the countenance, you would
discern no alteration in their conduct or manner.
I might rather say that in a very large proportion
there are observable the signs of uncommon and almost
unnatural exhilaration. They even greet the coming of
trouble as that which shall put their faith to the test,
shall give a new testimony of the readiness of
Christians
to suffer, and like the former persecution, give it a
new impulse forwards. They seek occasions of
controversy
and conversation with the Pagans at public places,
at their labor, and in the streets. The preachers assume
a bolder, louder tone, and declaim with ten times more
vehemence than ever against the enormities and
abominations
of the popular religions. Often at the
market-places
,
and at the corners of the streets, are those to be
seen, not authorized preachers perhaps, but believers and
overflowing with zeal, who at the risk of whatever
popular
fury and violence hold forth the truth in Christ and
denounce the reigning idolatries and superstitions.
At the head of these is Macer; at their head both as
respects the natural vigor of his understanding and the
perfect honesty and integrity of his mind, and his
dauntless courage. Every day, and all the day, is he
to be found in the streets of Rome, sometimes in one
quarter, sometimes in another, gathering an audience of
the passengers or idlers, as it may be, and sounding in
their ears the truths of the new religion. That he, and
others of the same character, deserve in all they do the
approbation of the Christian body, or receive it, is more
than can be said. They are often by their violences in
the midst of their harrangues, by harsh and uncharitable
denunciations, by false and exaggerated statements, the
causes of tumult and disorder, and contribute greatly to
increase the general exasperation against us. With
them it seems to be a maxim that all means are lawful
in a good cause. Nay, they seem rather to prefer the
ruder and rougher forms of attack. They seem
possessed
of the idea that the world is to be converted in a
day and that if men will not at once relinquish the
prejudices
or the faith of years, they are fit but for cursings
and burnings. In setting forth the mildest doctrine the
world ever knew, delivered to mankind by the gentlest,
and most patient, and compassionate being it ever saw,
they assume a manner and use a language so entirely
at variance with their theme, that it is no wonder if
prejudices
are strengthened oftener than they are set loose,
incredulity made more incredulous, and the hardened
heart yet harder. They who hear notice the discrepancy,
and fail not to make the use of it they may. When will
men learn that the mind is a fortress that can never be
taken by storm? You may indeed enter it rudely, and
by violence, and the signs of submission shall be made:
but all the elements of opposition are still there.
Reason
has not been convinced; errors and misconceptions
have not been removed, by a wise and logical and humane
dealing, and supplanted by truths well proved and shown
to be truths  and the victory is one in appearance only.
And the mere show of violence, on the part of the
reformer
and assailant, begets violence on the other side.
The whole inward man, with all his feelings, prejudices,
reason, is instantly put into a posture of defence; not
only of defence, for that were right, but of angry defence,
which is wrong. Passion is up, which might otherwise
have slept; and it is passion, never reason, which truth
has to fear. The intellect in its pure form, the advocate
VOL. I. 21
of truth would always prefer to meet, for he can never
feel sure of a step made till this has been gained. But
intellect, inflamed by passion, he may well dread, as
what there is but small hope even of approaching, much
less of convincing.
Often has Probus remonstrated with this order of men,
but in vain. They heed him not, but in return charge
him with coldness and indifference, worldliness, and all
other associated faults. Especially has he labored to
preserve Macer from the extremes to which he has run;
for he has seen in him as able advocate of Christian
truth, could he but be moderated and restrained. But
Macer, though he has conceived the strongest affection
for Probus, will not allow himself in this matter to be
influenced by him. He holds himself answerable to
conscience and God alone for the course he pursues. As
for the consequences that may ensue, either to himself
or his family, his mind cannot entertain them. It is for
Christ he lives, and for Christ he is ready to die.
I had long wished to meet him and witness his
manner
both of acting and of acting and yesterday I was
fortunate enough to encounter him. I shall give you,
as exactly as I can, what took place; it will show you
better than many letters could do what in one direction
our position is and our prospects are.
I was in the act of crossing the great avenue which
on the south leads to the Forum, when I was arrested
by a disorderly crowd, such as we often see gathered
suddenly in the street of a city about a thief who has
been caught, or a person who has been trodden down
on the pavement. It moved quickly in the direction of
the tribunal of Varus, and what was my surprise to
behold
Macer in the midst with head aloft and inflamed
countenance holding in his grasp and dragging onwards
one who would willingly have escaped. The crowd
seemed disposed, as I judged by the vituperations that
were directed against Macer to interfere, but were
apparently
deterred by both the gigantic form of Macer and
their vicinity to the tribunal, whither he was going.
Waiting till they were some distance in advance of me,
I then followed, determined to judge for myself of this
singular man. I was with them in the common hall
before
the prefect had taken his seat. When seated at his
tribunal he inquired the cause of the tumult, and who it
was that wished to appeal to him.
`I am the person,' said Macer; `and I come to drag
to justice this miscreant '
`And who may you be?'
`I should think Varus might recognize Macer.'
`It is so long since I met thee last at the emperor's
table
,
that thy features have escaped me.'
At which, as was their duty, the attendant rabble
laughed.
`Is there any one present,' continued the prefect, `who
knows this man?'
`Varus need apply to no other than myself,' said
Macer
.
`I am Macer, the son of that Macer who was
neighbor of the gladiator Pollex, '
`Hold, I say,' interrupted the prefect; `a man
witnesses
not here of himself. Can any one here say that
this man is not crazy or drunk?'
`Varus! prefect Varus ' cried Macer, his eyes
flashing
lightning and his voice not less than thunder; but
he was again interrupted.
`Peace, slave! or rods shall teach thee where thou
art.' And at the same moment, at a sign from Varus,
he was laid hold of with violence by officials of the
place armed with spears and rods, and held.
`What I wish to know then,' said Varus, turning to
the crowd, `is, whether this is not the street brawler,
one of the impious Gallileans, a man who should long
ago have been set in the stocks to find leisure for better
thoughts?'
Several testified, as was desired, that this was he.
`This is all I wish to know,' said the prefect. `The
man is either without wits, or they are disordered, or
else the pestilent faith he teaches has made the nuisance
of him he is, as it does of all who meddle with it. It
is scarcely right that he should be abroad. Yet has he
committed no offence that condemns him either to
scourging or the prison. Hearken therefore, fellow! I
now dismiss thee without the scourging thou well
deservest
;
but if thou keep on thy wild and lawless way,
racks and dungeons shall teach thee what there is in
Roman justice. Away with him!'
`Romans! Roman citizens!' cried Macer; `are
these your laws and this your judge? '
`Away with him, I say!' cried the prefect; and the
officers of the palace hurried him out of the hall.
As he went, a voice from the crowd shouted,
`Roman citizens, Macer, are long since dead. 'T is
a vain appeal.'
`I believe you,' replied Macer; `tyrant and slave stand
now for all who once bore the proud name of Roman.'
This violence and injustice on the part of Varus must
be traced  for though capricious and imperious, this is
not his character  to the language of Macer in the
shop of Publius, and to his apprehension lest the same
references to his origin, which he would willingly have
forgotten, should be made, and perhaps more offensively
still, in the presence of the people. Probus, on the
former
occasion, lamented deeply that Macer should have
been tempted to rehearse in the way he did some of the
circumstances of the prefect's history, as its only end
could be to needlessly irritate the man of power, and
raise up a bitterer enemy than we might otherwise have
found in him.
Upon leaving the tribunal, I was curious to watch still
further the movements of the Christian. The crowd
about him increased rather than diminished, as he left
the building and passed into the street. At but a little
distance from the hall of the prefect stands the Temple
of Peace, with its broad and lofty flights of steps.
When Macer had reached it he paused and looked
round upon the motley crowd that had gathered about
him.
`Go up! go up!' cried several voices. `We will
hear thee.'
`There is no prefect here,' cried another.
Macer needed no urging, but quickly strode up the
steps till he stood between the central columns of the
temple, and his audience had disposed themselves
below
him in every direction, when he turned and gazed
upon the assembled people, who had now, by the
addition
of such as passed along, and who had no more
urgent
business than to attend to that of any others whom
they might chance to meet, grown to a multitude.
After
looking upon them for the space of a minute, as if
VOL. I. 21*
studying their characters, and how he could best adapt
his discourse to their occasions, he suddenly and
abruptly
broke out
`You have asked me to come up here; and I am
here; glad for once to be in such a place by invitation.
And now I am here, and am about to speak to you, you
will expect me to say something of the Christians.'
`Yes, yes.'
`But I shall not  not yet. Perhaps by and by. In
the meantime my theme shall be the prefect! the prefect
Varus!'
`A subject full of matter,' cried one near Macer.
`Better send for him,' said another. `'T were a pity
he lost it.'
`Yes,' continued Macer, `it is a subject full ofmatter,
and I wish myself he were here to see himself in the
mirror I would hold before him; he could not but grow
pale with affright. You have just had a sample of
Roman
justice! How do you like it, Romans? I had
gone there to seek justice; not for a Christian, but
against a Christian. A Christian master had abused
his slave with cruelty, I standing by; and when to my
remonstrance  myself feeling the bitter stripes he laid
on  he did but ply his thongs the more, I seized the
hardened monster by the neck, and wrenching from his
grasp the lash, I first plied it upon his own back and
then dragged him to the judgment-seat of Varus, '
`O fool!'
`You say well  fool that I was, crying for justice!
How I was dealt with, some of you have seen. There,
I say, was a sample of Roman justice for you! So in
these times does power sport itself with poverty. It
was not so once in Rome. Were Cincinnatus or
Regulus
at the tribunal of Varus, they would fare like the
soldier Macer. And who, Romans, is this Varus? and
why is he here in the seat of authority? At the
tribunal
,
Varus did not know me. But what if I were to tell
you there was but a thin wall between the rooms where
we were born, and that when we were boys we were
ever at the same school!  not such schools as you are
thinking of, where the young go for letters and for
Greek, but the school where many of you have been
and are now at I dare say, the school of Roman vice,
which you may find always open all along the streets,
but especially where I and Varus were, in one of the
sinks near the Flavian. Pollex the gladiator was father
of Varus!  not worse, but just as bad, as savage, as
beastly in his vices, as are all of that butcher tribe. My
father  Macer too  I will not say more of him than
that he was keeper of the vivaria of the amphitheatre,
and passed his days in caging and uncaging the wild
beasts of Asia and Africa; in feeding them when there
were no games on foot, and starving them when there
were. Varus the prefect, Romans, and I were at
this school till I joined the legions under Valerian, and
he, by a luckier fortune as it would be deemed, found
favor in the eyes of Gallienus, to whom, with his fair
sister Fannia, he was sold by those demons Pollex and
Ccina. I say nothing of how it fared with him in that
keeping. Fannia has long since found the grave. Is
Varus one who should sit at the head of Rome? He is
a man of blood, of crime, of vice, such as you would not
bear to be told of! I say not this as if he were
answerable
for his birth and early vice, but that, being such,
this is not his place. He could not help it, nor I, that
we were born and nurtured where we were; that the
sight of blood and the smell of it, either of men or
beasts, was never out of our eyes and nostrils, during
all our boyhood and youth; that to him and me the
sweetest pleasure of our young life was when the games
came on and the beasts were let loose upon one another;
and, O the hardening of that life! when especially there
were prisoners or captives, on which to glut their raging
hunger! Those were the days and hours marked
whitest
in our calendar. And whitest of all were the days
of the Decian persecution, when the blood of thrice
cursed Christians, as I was taught to name them, flowed
like water. Every day then Varus and I had our sport;
working up the beasts by our torments to an unnatural
height of madness ere they were let loose, and then
rushing to the gratings, as the doors were thrown open,
to see the fury with which they would spring upon
their defenceless victims and tear them piecemeal.
The Romans required such servants  and we were
they. They require them now, and you may find any
number of such about the theatres. But if there must
be such there, why should they be taken thence and put
upon the judgment-seat? save for the reason that they
may have been thoroughly purged as it were by fire
which Varus has not. What with him was necessary
and forced when young, is now chosen and voluntary.
Vice is now his by election. Now I ask why has the
life of Varus been such? and why, being such, is he
here? Because you are so! Yes, because you are all
like him! It is you, Roman citizens, who rear the
theatres
,
the circuses, and the thousand temples of vice,
which crowd the streets of Rome, '
`No, no! it is the emperors.'
`But who made the emperors? You Romans of these
times, are a race of cowards and slaves, and it is
therefore
that tyrants rule over you. Were you freemen,
with the souls of freemen in you, do you think you
would bear as you do  and love and glory in the yoke
this rule of such creatures as Varus, and others whom
it were not hard to name? I know what you are  for
I have been one of you. I have not been, nor am I
now, hermit, as you may think, being a Christian. A
Christian is a man of the world  a man of action and
of suffering  not of rest and sleep. I have ever been
abroad among men, both before I was a Christian and
since; and I know what you are. You are of the same
stamp as Varus! nay, start not, nor threaten with your
eyes,  I fear you not. If you were not so, why, I say,
is Varus there? You know that I speak the truth.
The people of Rome are corrupt as their rulers! How
should it be much otherwise? You are fed by the
largesses
of the emperor, you have your two loaves a day
and your pork, and you need not and so do not work.
You have no employment but idleness, and idleness is
not so much a vice itself as the prolific mother of all
vices. When I was one of you, it was so; and so it is
now. My father's labor was nothing; he was kept by
the state. The emperor was not more a man of
pleasure
than he, nor the princes, than I and Varus. Was
that a school of virtue? When I left the service of the
amphitheatre I joined the Legions. In the army I had
work, and I had fighting, but my passions, in the early
days of that service, raged like the sea; and during all
the reign of Valerian's son there was no bridle upon
them;  for I served under the general Carinus, and
what Carinus was and is, most of you know. O the
double horrors of those years! I was older, and yet
worse and worse. God! I marvel that thou didst not
interpose and strike me dead! But thy mercy spared
me, and now the lowest, lowest hell shall not be mine.'
Tears forced by these recollections flowed down his
cheeks, and for a time he was speechless.
`Such, Romans, was I once. What am I now? I
am a changed man  through and through. There is
not a thought of my mind, nor a fibre of my body, what
they were once. You may possibly think the change
has been for the worse, seeing me thus thrust forth from
the tribunal of the prefect with dishonor, when I was
once a soldier and an officer under Aurelian. I would
rather a thousand times be what I am, a soldier of Jesus
Christ. And I would that by anything I could do, you,
any one of you, might be made to think so too; I would
that Varus might, for I bear him no ill will.
`But what am I now? I am so different a man from
what I once was, that I can hardly believe myself to be
the same. The life which I once led, I would not lead
again  no  not one day nor hour of it, though you
would depose Aurelian to-day and crown me Csar
to-morrow
.
I would no more return to that life, than I
would consent to lose my nature and take a swine's, and
find elysium where as a man I once did, in sinks and
sties. I would not renounce for the wealth of all the
world, and its empire too, that belief in the faith of
Christ, the head of the Christians, which has wrought
so within me.
`And what has made me so  would make you so
if you would but hearken to it. And would it not be a
good thing if the flood of vice, which pours all through
the streets of Rome, were stayed? Would it not be a
happy thing, if the misery which dwells beneath these
vaulted roofs and these humbler ones equally, the
misery
which drunkenness and lust, the love of money, and
the love of place, and every evil passion generates, were
all wiped away, and we all lived together observant of
the rights of one another, helping one another; not
oppressing
;
loving, not hating; showing in our conduct
as men, the virtues of little children? Would it not
be happier if all this vast population were bound together
by some common ties of kindred; if all held all as
brethren
;
if the poor man felt himself to be the same as
Aurelian
himself, because he is a man like him and weighs
just as much as he in the scales of God, and that it is
the vice in the one or the other, and that only, that sinks
him lower? Would it not be better, if you all could see
in the presiding power of the universe, one great and
good Being, who needs not to be propitiated by costly
sacrifices of oxen or bulls, nor by cruel ones of men,
but is always kindly disposed towards you, and desires
nothing so much as to see you living virtuously and
happily, and is never grieved as he is to see you ruining
your own peace,  not harming him  by your vices?
for you will bear witness with me that your vices are
never a cause of happiness. Would it not be better if
you could behold such a God over you, in the place of
those who are called gods, and whom you worship, as I
did once, because I feared to do otherwise, and yet sin
on never the less: who are your patterns not so much
in virtue as in vice?'
`Away with the wicked!'  `Away with the fellow!'
cried several voices; but others predominated, saying,
`Let him alone!'  `He speaks well! We will hear
him!'  `We will defend him! go on, go on!'
`I have little or nothing more to say,' continued
Macer
.
`I will only ask you whether you must not judge
that to be a very powerful principle of some kind that
drew me up out of that foul pit into which I was fallen,
and made me what I am now? Which of you now
feels that he has motive strong enough to work out such
a deliverance for him? What help in this way do you
receive from your priests, if perchance you ever apply
to them? What book of instructions concerning the
will of the gods have you, to which you can go at any
time and all times? Only believe as I do, Romans,
and you will hate sin as I do. You cannot help it.
Believe in the God that I do, and in the revealer of his
will, the teacher whom he sent into the world to save us
from our heathen errors and vices, and you will then be
more than the Romans you once were. You are now,
and you know it, infinitely less. Then you will be
what the old Romans were and more. You will be as
brave as they, and more just. You will be as generous
and more gentle. You will love your own country as
well, but you will love others too. You will be more
ready to offer up your lives for your country, for it will
be better worth dying for; every citizen will be a
brother; every ruler a brother; it will be like dying for
your own little household. If you would see Rome
flourish she must become more pure. She can stagger
along not much longer under this mountain weight of
iniquity that presses her into the dust. She needs a
new Hercules to cleanse her foul chambers. Christ is
he; and if you will invite him, he will come and sweep
away these abominations, so that imperial Rome shall
smell fragrantly as a garden of spices.'
Loud exclamations of approval here interrupted
Macer
.
The great proportion of those who were present
were now evidently with him, and interested in his
communications.
`Tell us,' cried one, as soon as the noise subsided,
`how you became what you are? What is to be done?'
`Yes,' cried many voices, `tell us.'
`I will tell you gladly,' answered Macer. `I first heard
the word of truth from the lips of Probus, a preacher of
the Christians, whom you too may hear whenever you
will, by seeking him out on the days when the
Christians
worship. Probus was in early life a priest of the
temple of Jupiter, and if any man in Rome can place
the two religions side by side, and make the differences
plain, it is he. Go to him such of you as can, and you
will never repent it. But if you would all learn the
first step toward Christian truth, and all truth, it is this;
lay aside your prejudices, be willing to bear, see, hear,
and judge for yourselves. Take not rumor for truth.
Do not believe without evidence both for and against.
You would not, without evidence and reason, charge
Aurelian with the death of Aurelia, though ten thousand
tongues report it. Charge not the Christians with worse
things then, merely because the wicked and ill-disposed
maliciously invent them and spread them. If you would
know the whole truth and doctrine of Christians; if you
would ascend to the fountain-head of all Christian
wisdom, take to your homes our sacred books and read
VOL. I. 22
them. Some of you at least can obtain them. Let one
purchase, and then twenty or fifty read. One thing
before
I cease. Believe not the wicked aspersions of the
prefect. He charges me as a brawler, a disturber of the
peace and order of the city. Romans, believe me, I am
a lover of peace, but I am a lover of freedom too.
Because
I am a lover of peace, and would promote it, do I
labor to teach the doctrines of Christ, which are doctrines
of peace and love, both at home and abroad, in the city
and throughout the world; and because I am the friend
of freedom, do I open my mouth at all times and in
every
place, wherever I can find those who, like you, are
ready to hear the words of salvation. When in Rome I
can no longer speak  no longer speak for the cause of
what I deem truth, then will I no longer be a Roman.
Then will I that day renounce my name and my
country
.
Thanks to Aurelian, he has never chained up the
tongue. I have fought and bled under him, and never
was there a braver man, or who honored courage more
in others. I do not believe he will ever do so cowardly
a thing as to restrain the freedom of men's speech.
Aurelian
is some things, but he is not others. He is
severe
and cruel, but not mean. Cut Aurelian in two,
and throw the worser half away, and t' other is as royal
a man as ever the world saw.
`One thing more, good friends and citizens: If I am
sometimes carried away by my passions to do that which
seems a disturbance of the common order, say that it is
the soldier Macer that does it, not his Christian zeal
his human passions, not his new-adopted faith. It is
not at once and perfectly that a man passes from one
life to another; puts off one nature and takes another.
Much that belonged to Macer of the amphitheatre, and
Macer the soldier, cleaves to him now. But make not
his religion amenable for that. You who would see
the law of Christ written, not only on a book but in the
character and life of a living man, go read the Christian
Probus.'
As he said these words he began to descend the steps
of the temple; but many crowded round him, assailing
him, some with reproaches, and others with inquiries
put by those who seemed anxious to know the truth.
The voices of his opponents were most violent and
prevailed
,
and made me apprehensive that they would
proceed
to greater length than speech. But Macer stood
firm, nothing daunted by the uproar. One, who
signalized
himself by the loudness and fierceness of his cries,
exclaimed, `that he was nothing else than an atheist like
all the rest of the Christians; they have no gods; they
deny the gods of Rome, and they give us nothing in
their stead.'
`We deny the gods of Rome, I know,' replied Macer,
`and who would not, who had come to years of
discretion
?
who had so much as left his nurse's lap? A
fouler brotherhood than they the lords of Heaven, Rome
does not contain. Am I to be called upon to worship a
set of wretches chargeable with all the crimes and vices
to be found on earth? It is this accursed idolatry, O
Romans, that has sunk you so low in sin? They are
your lewd, and drunken, and savage deities, who have
taught you all your refinement in wickedness; and
never, till you renounce them, never till you repent you
of your iniquities  never till you turn and worship the
true God will you rise out of the black Tartarean
slough in which you are lying. These two hundred
years and more has God called to you by his Son, and
you have turned away your ears; you have hardened
your hearts; the prophets who have come to you in his
name have you slain by the sword or hung upon the
accursed tree. Awake out of your slumbers! These
are the last days. God will not forbear forever. The
days of vengeance will come; they are now at hand: I
can hear the rushing of that red right arm hot with
wrath '
`Away with him! away with him!' broke from an
hundred voices!  `Down with the blasphemer!'
`Who is he to speak thus of the gods of Rome?'  `Seize
the impious Gallilean, and away with him to the
prefect
!'
These and a thousand exclamations of the same
kind, and more savage, were heard on every side, and
at the same moment, their denial and
counter-exclamations
from as many more.
`He has spoken the truth!'  `He is a brave fellow!'
`He shall not be touched except we fall first!'
came from a resolute band who encompassed the
preacher
,
and seemed resolved to make good their words by
defending him against whatever assault might be made.
Macer, himself a host in such an affray, neither spoke
nor moved, standing upright and still as a statue; but
any one might see the soldier in his kindling eye, and
that a slight cause would bring him upon the assailants
with a fury that would deal out wounds and death. He
had told them that the old Legionary was not quite dead
within him, and sometimes usurped the place of the
Christian; this they seemed to remember, and after
showering upon him vituperation and abuse in every
form, one after another they withdrew and left him with
those who had gathered immediately around him.
These too soon took their leave of him, and Macer,
unimpeded
and alone, turned towards his home.
When I related to Probus afterwards what I had
heard and witnessed, he said that I was fortunate in
hearing what was so much more sober and calm than
what usually fell from him; that generally he devoted
himself to an exposition of the absurdities of the heathen
worship, and the abominations of the mysteries, and the
vices of the priesthood; and he rarely ended without
filling with rage a great proportion of those who heard
him. Many a time had he been assaulted; and hardly
had escaped with his life. You will easily perceive,
Fausta, how serious an injury is inflicted upon us by
rash and violent declaimers like Macer. There are
others like him; he is by no means alone, though he is
far the most conspicuous. Together they help to kindle
the flame of active hostility, and infuse fresh bitterness
into the Pagan heart. Should the emperor carry into
effect
the purposes now ascribed to him, these men will
be sure victims, and the first.
Upon my return after hearing Macer, I found Livia
seated with Julia, to whom she often comes thus, and
then together  I often accompanying  they visit
Tibur
.
She had but just arrived. It was easy to see that
the light-heartedness, which so manifested itself always
in the beaming countenance and the elastic step, was
gone; the usual signs of it at least were not visible.
Her whole expression was serious and anxious; and
upon her face were the traces of recent grief. For a
long time, after the first salutations and inquiries were
through, neither spoke. At length Livia said,
VOL. I. 22*
`I am come now, Julia, to escape from what has
become
of late little other than a prison. The Fabrician
dungeons are not more gloomy than the gardens of
Sallust
are now. No more gaiety; no feasting by day and
carousal by night; the gardens never illuminated; no
dancing nor music. It is a new life for me: and then
the only creatures to be seen, that hideous Fronto and
the smiling Varus; men very well in their place, but
no inmates of palaces.'
`Well said, Julia; there is the greater reason why
we should see more of each other and of Zenobia.
Aurelian
is the same?'
`The same? There is the same form, and the same
face, and the same voice; but the form is motionless,
save when at the Hippodrome,  the face black as Styx,
and his voice rougher than the raven's. That agreeable
humor and sportiveness, which seem native to him,
though by reason of his thousand cares not often seen, is
now wholly gone. He is observant as ever of all the
forms of courtesy, and I am to him what I have ever
been; but a dark cloud has settled over him and all the
house, and I would willingly escape if I could. And
worse than all, is this of Aurelia! Alas, poor girl!'
`And what, Livia, is the truth?' said Julia; `the city
is filled with rumors but they are so at variance no one
knows which to believe, or whether none.'
`I hardly know myself,' replied Livia. `All I know
with certainty is, that I have lost my only companion
or the only one I cared for  and that Aurelian merely
says she has been sent to the prisons at the Fabrician
bridge. I cannot tell you of our parting. Aurelia was
sure something terrible was designed against her, from
the sharpness and violence of her uncle's language, and
she left me as if she were never to see me again. But
I would believe no such thing, and so I told her, and
tried to give to her some of the courage and cheerfulness
which I pretended to have myself; but it was to no
purpose
.
She departed weeping as if her heart were
broken. I love her greatly, notwithstanding her usual
air of melancholy and her preference of solitude, and I
have found in her, as you know, my best friend and
companion. Yet I confess there is that in her which I
never understood, and do not now understand. I hope
she will comply with the wishes of Aurelian, and that
I shall soon see her again. The difficulty is all owing
to this new religion. I wish, Julia, there were no such
thing. It seems to me to do nothing but sow discord
and violence.'
`That, dear Livia,' said Julia, `is not a very wise
wish; especially seeing you know, as you will yourself
confess, so little about it.'
`But,' quickly added Livia, `was it not better as it
was at Palmyra? who heard then of these bitter
hostilities
?
who were there troubled about their worship?
One hardly knew there was such a thing as a Christian.
When Paul was at the palace, it was still all the same;
only, if anything, a little more agreeable. But here, no
one at the gardens speaks of Christians but with an
assassin
air that frightens one. There must surely be
more evil in them than I ever dreamed of.'
`The evil, Livia,' answered her sister, `comes not
from the Christians nor Christianity, but from those who
oppose them. There were always Christians in
Palmyra
,
and as you say even in the palace, yet there was
always peace and good-will too. If Christianity were
in itself an element of discord and division, why were
no such effects seen there? The truth is, Livia, the
division
and discord are created, not by the new religion,
but by those who resist it, and will not suffer people to
act and think as they please about it. Under Zenobia
all had free liberty to believe as they would. And there
was under her the reign of universal peace and
good-will
.
Here, on the other hand, it has been the practice
of the state to interfere, and say what the citizens shall
believe and whom they shall worship, and what and
whom they shall not. How should it be otherwise than
that troubles should spring up, under legislation so absurd
and so wicked? Would it not be a certain way to
introduce
confusion, if the state  or Aurelian  should
prescribe our food and drink? or our dress? And if
confusion did arise, and bitter opposition, you could not
justly say it was owing to the existence of certain kinds
of food, or of clothes which people fancied, but to their
being interfered with. Let them alone, and they will
please themselves and be at peace.'
`Yes,' said Livia, `that may be. But the common
people are in no way fit judges in such things, and it seems
to me if either party must give way, it were better the
people did. The government has the power and they
will use it.'
`In so indifferent a matter as food or dress,' rejoined
the sister, `if a government were so foolish as to make
prohibitory and whimsical laws, it were better to yield
than contend. But in an affair so different from that as
one's religion, one could not act in the same way. I
may dress in one kind of stuff as well as another; it is
quite a possible thing: but is it not plainly impossible,
if I think one kind of stuff is of an exquisite fineness and
color, for me to believe and say at the same time, that its
texture is coarse and its hue dull? The mind cannot
believe according to any other laws than those of its own
constitution. Is it not then the height of wickedness to
set out to make people believe and act one way in
religion
?
The history of the world has shown that, in
spite of men's wickedness, there is nothing on earth they
value as they do their religion. They will die rather
than change or renounce it. Men are the same now.
To require that any portion of the people shall renounce
their religion is to require them to part with that which
they value most  more than life itself  and is it not
in effect pronouncing against them a sentence of
destruction
?
Some indeed will relinquish it rather than die;
and some will play the hypocrite for a season, intending
to return to a profession of it in more peaceful times:
But most, and the best, will die before they will disown
their faith,'
`Then if that is so,' said Julia, `and I confess what
you say cannot be denied, I would that Aurelian could
be prevailed upon to recede from a position which he
seems to be taking. His whole nature now seems to
have been set on fire by this priest Fronto.
Superstition
has wholly seized and possessed him. His belief
is that Rome can never be secure and great till the
enemies
of the gods, as well as of the state, shall perish;
and pushed on by Fronto he appears, so far as can be
gathered from their discourse, to be bent on their
destruction
.
I wish he could be changed back again to what
he was before this notion seized him. Piso, have you
seen him? Have you of late conversed with him?'
`Only, Livia, briefly; and on this topic only at
intervals
of other talk; for he avoids it, at least with me.
But from what we all know of Aurelian, it is not one's
opinion nor another's that can alter his will when once
bent one way.'
`How little did I once deem,' said Livia, `when I used
to wish so for greatness and empire, that they could be
so darkened over. I thought that to be great was
necessarily
to be happy. But I was but a child then.'
`How long since was that?' asked Julia, smiling.
`Ah! you would say I am little better than that now.'
`You are young yet, Livia, for much wisdom to have
come; and you must not wonder if it come slowly, for
you are unfortunately placed to gain it. An idol on its
pedestal can rarely have but two thoughts  that it is
an idol, and that it is worshipped. The entrance of all
other wisdom is quite shut out.'
`How pleasant a thing it is, Piso, to have an elder
sister as wise as Julia! But come, will you to Tibur?
I must have Faustula, now I have lost Aurelia.'
`O no, Livia,' said Julia; `take her not away from
Zenobia. She can ill spare her.'
`But there is Vabalathus.'
`Yes, but he is now little there. He is moreover
preparing
for his voyage. Faustula is her all.'
`Ah, then it cannot be! It were very wrong, I see.
Then I see not but I must go to her, or come live with
you. Only think of one's trying to escape from the
crown of Rome? I can hardly believe I am Livia; once
never to be satisfied with power and greatness  now
tired of them! No, not that exactly '
`You are tired, only, Livia, of some little attendant
troubles; you like not that overhanging cloud you just
spoke of; but for the empire itself, you love that none
the less. To believe that, it is enough to see you.'
`I suppose you are right. Julia is always right,
Piso.'
So our talk ran on; sometimes into graver and then
into lighter themes  often stopping and lingering long
over you, and Calpurnius, and Gracchus. You wished
to know more of Livia and her thoughts, and I have
given her to you in just the mood in which she
happened
to be.
The wife of Macer has just been here, seeking from
Julia both assistance and comfort. She implores us to
do what we may to calm and sober her husband.
`As the prospect of danger increases,' she said to
Julia, `he grows but the more impetuous and
ungovernable
.
He is abroad all the day and every day,
preaching
all over Rome, and brings home nothing for the
support of the family; and if it were not for the
empeperor's
bounty, we should starve.'
`And does that support you?'
`O no, lady! it hardly gives us food enough to subsist
upon. Then we have besides to pay for our lodging
and our clothes. But I should mind not at all our
labor
nor our poverty, did I not hear from so many that
my husband is so wild and violent in his preaching, and
when he disputes with the gentiles, as he will call them.
I am sure it is a good cause to suffer in, if one must
suffer; but if our dear Macer would only work half the
time, there would be no occasion to suffer  which we
should now were it not for Demetrius the jeweler  who
lives hard by, and who I am sure has been very kind to
us  and our good lia.'
`You do not then,' I asked, `blame your religion nor
weary of it?'
`O, sir, surely not. It is our greatest comfort. We
all look out with expectation of our greatest pleasure,
when Macer returns home, after his day's labors; and
labors they surely are, and will destroy him,
unless
he is persuaded to leave them off. For when he is
at home the children all come round him, and he teaches
them in his way what religion is. Sometimes it is a
long story he gives them of his life, when he was a little
boy and knew nothing about Christ, and what wicked
things he did, and sometimes about his serving as a
soldier
under the emperor. But he never ends without
showing them what Christ's religion tells them to think
of such ways of life. And then, sir, before we go to
bed he reads to us from the gospels  which he bought
when he was in the army, and was richer than he is
now  and prays for us all, for the city, and the
emperor
,
and the gentiles. So that we want almost nothing,
as I may say, to make us quite contented and happy.'
`Have you ever been disturbed in your dwelling on
Macer's account?'
`O yes, sir, and we are always fearing it. This is
our great trouble. Once the house was attacked by the
people of the street, and almost torn down  and we
escaped, I and the children, through a back way into the
shop of the good Demetrius. There we were safe; and
while we were gone our little cabin was entered, and
everything in it broken in pieces. Macer was not at
home, or I think he would have been killed.'
`Did you apply to the perfect?'
`No, sir, I do not believe there would be much use in
that: they say he hates the Christians so.'
`But he is bound to preserve order in the city.'
`Yes, sir; but for a great man like him it's easy to
see only one way, and to move so slowly that it does no
good. That is what our people say of him. When
the Christians are in trouble he never comes, if he
comes at all, till it is too late to do them any service.
The best way for us is I think to live quietly, and not
needlessly provoke the gentiles, nor believe that we can
make Christians of them all in a day. That is my
husband's
dream. He thinks that he must deliver his
message
to people, whether they will or not, and it almost
seems as if the more hostile they were, the more he
made it his duty to preach to them, which certainly was
not the way in which Christ did, as he reads his history
to us. It was just the other way. It almost makes me
believe that some demon has entered into him, he is so
different from what he was, and abroad from what he is
at home. Do you think that likely, sir? I have been
at times inclined to apply to Felix to see if he could not
exorcise him.'
`No, I do not think so, certainly; but many may. I
believe he errs in his notion of the way in which to do
good; but under some circumstances it is so hard to
tell which the best way is, that we must judge
charitably
of one another. Some would say that Macer is
right; others that the course of Probus is wisest; and
VOL. I. 23
others that of Felix. We must do as we think right,
and leave the issue to God.'
`But you will come and see us? We dwell near
the ruins, and behind the shop of Demetrius.
Everybody
knows Demetrius.'
I assured her I would go.
I almost wish, Fausta, that Julia was with you. All
classes seem alike exposed to danger. But I suppose it
would be in vain to propose such a step to her,
especially
after what she said to Isaac. You now, after
your storm, live at length in calm: not exactly in
sunshine
;
for you would say the sun never can seem to
shine that falls upon the ruins of Palmyra. But calm
and peace you certainly have, and they are much. I
wish Julia could enjoy them with you. For here, every
hour, so it now seems to me, the prospect darkens, and
it will be enough for one of us to remain to encounter
the evil, whatever it may be, and defend the faith we
have espoused. This is an office more appropriate to
man than to woman; though emergences may arise as
they have when woman herself must forget her
tenderness
and put on soldiers' panoply; and when it has
come, never has she been found wanting. Her
promptness
to believe that which is good and pure, has been
equaled by her fortitude and patience in suffering for it.
You will soon see Vabalathus. He will visit you
before he enters upon his great office. By him I shall
write to you soon again. Farewell.
END OF VOLUME ONE.